2019 M.L.B. Season Preview
With better development and technology at every level of the game, teams can draw from a player pool that is bigger — and cheaper — than ever.
CreditCreditDale Crosby Close
Supported by
ByTyler Kepner

BRADENTON, Fla. — The first player drafted this decade was Bryce Harper, who is now starting a 13-year, $330 million contract with the Philadelphia Phillies. The third player drafted was Manny Machado, who is now starting a 10-year, $300 million contract with the San Diego Padres.
Tucked within that $630 million sandwich, with the second overall pick in 2010, was Jameson Taillon, a starter for the Pittsburgh Pirates whose career has been sidetracked by a torn elbow ligament, a sports herniaand testicular cancer.
“I always made sure when I was hurt that my investments were going well and they were in a good place,” Taillon, 27, said, smiling last month at the Pirates’ training complex here. “You can still believe in yourself, but when an injury happens, there’s not much you can do. You never know what’s on the horizon.”
When Taillon was drafted, he could not have known the landscape that would greet him in his first full, healthy season in the majors, which came last year. In 2010, according to Fangraphs, there were 22 pitchers who worked at least 50 innings and averaged 95.2 miles per hour on their fastball. Last season, according to Fangraphs, there were 67, including Taillon.
[A.L. Preview: How Hard Will It Be for the Red Sox to Repeat? Ask the Astros]
The supply of prospects with big-league stuff — and the savvy to go with it — has skyrocketed. This is part of the reason that Major League Baseball’s player population has continued to balloon: According to the Elias Sports Bureau, a record 1,379 players appeared in a major league game last season, the sixth year in a row with an increase.
In 2010, Elias said, there were 1,249 overall players — meaning that teams have added the equivalent of five 25-man rosters, and then some, to the playing ranks since this decade began.
“I threw 95 and I was one of the hardest throwers in all of minor-league baseball,” Taillon said. “Now, you see guys across every level that throw hard. And a lot’s written about young guys throwing weighted balls and only focusing on throwing hard, but some of these guys are polished. They’re throwing three or four pitches for strikes at 22, 23 years old.
“We’re investing so much money in player development, you’re seeing kids coming to big-league camp that aren’t intimidated.”
Standout players like Taillon — who posted a 3.20 earned run average in 32 starts last season — can marvel at the trend while still expecting to someday sign a lucrative contract. But whileHarper and Machado scored big in free agency, many more veterans will open this season with much lower salaries than players of their caliber once commanded.
That has contributed to a growing sense among players that a system that once reliably rewarded their years of toil no longer works for them. The flurry of contract extensions late in spring training only underscored the point: Take what’s in front of you, because the open market can be a cold, lonely place.
“If you look at the guys that are having to sign these nonroster deals, or guys that still don’t have jobs, far and away most of them comprise that middle class of baseball players,” said Sean Doolittle, the All-Star closer for the Washington Nationals.
“They’re not the young guys anymore, and they’re not the superstars. They’re very serviceable big leaguers, they’re past arbitration, they’re veterans, and the market for those guys is evaporating. Teams are no longer looking at that eight-year veteran who they might have to spend several million on as someone that can help their team. They’ll take the cheaper labor — the guy that has options, gives them roster flexibility, and costs a lot less.”
[N.L. Preview: A Deep Talent Pool Should Keep the Dodgers Afloat]
Players need six years of major league service to become free agents, and between two and three years to be eligible for salary arbitration. It could be that the sophistication of player development — in the United States amateur ranks, the international market and major league farm systems — is producing a deeper pool of acceptable choices for major league rosters.
“When I first started scouting in 2007, veteran scouts would still talk about high school kids getting homesick, guys that had never left their hometown, and that’s just not the case anymore,” saidMike Elias, the Baltimore Orioles’ general manager. “These guys, when they enter professional baseball, they’ve already hit with wood, they’ve been on the travel circuit, they know each other from the summers. They’re ready.”
The rise in overall players can be traced almost entirely to pitchers. Last season included only six more position players than in 2010, but 124 more pitchers — up to a record 751. Starters work fewer innings, in part, because teams have better options to replace them as they get deep into games.
Many of those options can be shuttled back and forth between the majors and the minors while making close to the minimum salary of $555,000. They may also offer a higher ceiling of production — though a lower floor — than a midlevel veteran who costs much more and cannot be sent to the minors. For many teams, the choice is easy.
“One of the things teams have realized is the value in giving that opportunity to a player that you’ve signed, scouted and developed relative to the potential marginal upgrade in someone that has four or five years of major league service,” said Ross Atkins, the Toronto Blue Jays’ general manager. “Determining where that difference is, in a more thorough way, is occurring because of manpower, really.”
That realization has transformed franchises. Since Atkins and team president Mark Shapiro took over the Blue Jays’ baseball operations in late 2015, Toronto has added significantly toits front officein an effort to better cultivate its own talent. The Blue Jays have added at least six positions for research and development in addition to creating a high-performance department that emphasizes strength and conditioning, mental health and nutrition throughout their farm system.
Long gone are the days when minor leaguers subsisted on peanut butter and jelly sandwiches with threadbare coaching staffs to guide them. Teams employmore coaches than everin the minors and the majors, and arm them with increasingly sophisticated tools to develop players.
Jeff Luhnow, the general manager of the Houston Astros, noted that the first aim of the analytics revolution — think of the “Moneyball”-era Oakland Athletics, in the early 2000s — was using statistics to better predict future performance. Now, he said, teams emphasize technology to better identify tools in amateurs and attack the deficiencies of their own prospects.
“There’s much more actionable feedback today than there ever has been, so you don’t let a player go down a path for very long if it’s not a path that’s going to work for him, long term, in the big leagues,” Luhnow said.
He mentioned three companies many teams now use — Rapsodo, TrackMan and Blast Motion — that give coaches instant feedback on players’ movements. Objective, easy-to-visualize data appeals to players from a tech-savvy generation.
“Before, you relied on the scout or the coach to say, ‘Well, you need to make this adjustment, and just trust me on it because I’ve seen it before, and what you’re doing is not going to work at the next level, so you need to change something,’” Luhnow said. “Now, you can actually show them video, show their numbers, and say, ‘This is what you’re doing, and I’ll show you why that doesn’t work at the next level and show you what does work, and let’s work on changing you, or modifying what you’re doing.’
“That, by definition, will lead to a higher success rate in development. Let’s say 5 percent of players get developed into big leaguers and it goes up to 7 percent. That’s a massive difference, because we haven’t increased our capacity, but what we’ve done is increase our throughput. So the success rate is good for players, but it probably results in an abundance of an oversupply. Obviously, it doesn’t affect a Harper or Machado, but there are just more options.”
Other teams have noticed the Astros’ success. Two of Luhnow’s assistants have become general managers elsewhere — Baltimore’s Elias and the Milwaukee Brewers’ David Stearns — and several former Astros coaches have received promotions with other teams, including Alex Cora, who managed the Boston Red Sox to the World Series title last fall.
The same thing has happened to the Los Angeles Dodgers, who have won two National League pennants in a row with a knack for progressive methods. Their president of baseball operations, Andrew Friedman, said he got 39 requests last fall from other teams wanting to interview Dodgers personnel.
“The past two off-seasons, I’ve spent the first four to six weeks like an H.R. director,” Friedman said.
When the Dodgers lost their hitting coach, Turner Ward, to the Cincinnati Reds, they replaced him with Robert Van Scoyoc, 32, a private hitting instructor who never played professionally but who has helped otherwise ordinary hitters, like J.D. Martinez and Chris Taylor, develop into stars. Unlocking hitting secrets, Friedman said, remains a largely untapped field.
“Since I’ve been sitting in advance meetings and been closer to that prep, nothing has changed on the offensive side in 12, 13 years,” he said, “whereas on the run-prevention side, everything has changed.”
Whileruns per gamehave fluctuated in this decade, strikeouts — the ultimate way to fool or overpower a hitter — have increased every season since 2006. This month, the league and the union finally gave into the trend and legislated a change.
With no end in sight to the procession of polished, power arms, they agreed to expand the size of the active roster next season to 26 — virtually assuring that the record of 1,379 players in a season will not last long.
Tyler Kepner has been national baseball writer since 2010. He joined The Times in 2000 and covered the Mets for two seasons, then covered the Yankees from 2002 to 2009.@TylerKepner
2019 M.L.B. Season Preview
With better development and technology at every level of the game, teams can draw from a player pool that is bigger — and cheaper — than ever.
CreditCreditDale Crosby Close
Supported by
ByTyler Kepner

BRADENTON, Fla. — The first player drafted this decade was Bryce Harper, who is now starting a 13-year, $330 million contract with the Philadelphia Phillies. The third player drafted was Manny Machado, who is now starting a 10-year, $300 million contract with the San Diego Padres.
Tucked within that $630 million sandwich, with the second overall pick in 2010, was Jameson Taillon, a starter for the Pittsburgh Pirates whose career has been sidetracked by a torn elbow ligament, a sports herniaand testicular cancer.
“I always made sure when I was hurt that my investments were going well and they were in a good place,” Taillon, 27, said, smiling last month at the Pirates’ training complex here. “You can still believe in yourself, but when an injury happens, there’s not much you can do. You never know what’s on the horizon.”
When Taillon was drafted, he could not have known the landscape that would greet him in his first full, healthy season in the majors, which came last year. In 2010, according to Fangraphs, there were 22 pitchers who worked at least 50 innings and averaged 95.2 miles per hour on their fastball. Last season, according to Fangraphs, there were 67, including Taillon.
[A.L. Preview: How Hard Will It Be for the Red Sox to Repeat? Ask the Astros]
The supply of prospects with big-league stuff — and the savvy to go with it — has skyrocketed. This is part of the reason that Major League Baseball’s player population has continued to balloon: According to the Elias Sports Bureau, a record 1,379 players appeared in a major league game last season, the sixth year in a row with an increase.
In 2010, Elias said, there were 1,249 overall players — meaning that teams have added the equivalent of five 25-man rosters, and then some, to the playing ranks since this decade began.
“I threw 95 and I was one of the hardest throwers in all of minor-league baseball,” Taillon said. “Now, you see guys across every level that throw hard. And a lot’s written about young guys throwing weighted balls and only focusing on throwing hard, but some of these guys are polished. They’re throwing three or four pitches for strikes at 22, 23 years old.
“We’re investing so much money in player development, you’re seeing kids coming to big-league camp that aren’t intimidated.”
Standout players like Taillon — who posted a 3.20 earned run average in 32 starts last season — can marvel at the trend while still expecting to someday sign a lucrative contract. But whileHarper and Machado scored big in free agency, many more veterans will open this season with much lower salaries than players of their caliber once commanded.
That has contributed to a growing sense among players that a system that once reliably rewarded their years of toil no longer works for them. The flurry of contract extensions late in spring training only underscored the point: Take what’s in front of you, because the open market can be a cold, lonely place.
“If you look at the guys that are having to sign these nonroster deals, or guys that still don’t have jobs, far and away most of them comprise that middle class of baseball players,” said Sean Doolittle, the All-Star closer for the Washington Nationals.
“They’re not the young guys anymore, and they’re not the superstars. They’re very serviceable big leaguers, they’re past arbitration, they’re veterans, and the market for those guys is evaporating. Teams are no longer looking at that eight-year veteran who they might have to spend several million on as someone that can help their team. They’ll take the cheaper labor — the guy that has options, gives them roster flexibility, and costs a lot less.”
[N.L. Preview: A Deep Talent Pool Should Keep the Dodgers Afloat]
Players need six years of major league service to become free agents, and between two and three years to be eligible for salary arbitration. It could be that the sophistication of player development — in the United States amateur ranks, the international market and major league farm systems — is producing a deeper pool of acceptable choices for major league rosters.
“When I first started scouting in 2007, veteran scouts would still talk about high school kids getting homesick, guys that had never left their hometown, and that’s just not the case anymore,” saidMike Elias, the Baltimore Orioles’ general manager. “These guys, when they enter professional baseball, they’ve already hit with wood, they’ve been on the travel circuit, they know each other from the summers. They’re ready.”
The rise in overall players can be traced almost entirely to pitchers. Last season included only six more position players than in 2010, but 124 more pitchers — up to a record 751. Starters work fewer innings, in part, because teams have better options to replace them as they get deep into games.
Many of those options can be shuttled back and forth between the majors and the minors while making close to the minimum salary of $555,000. They may also offer a higher ceiling of production — though a lower floor — than a midlevel veteran who costs much more and cannot be sent to the minors. For many teams, the choice is easy.
“One of the things teams have realized is the value in giving that opportunity to a player that you’ve signed, scouted and developed relative to the potential marginal upgrade in someone that has four or five years of major league service,” said Ross Atkins, the Toronto Blue Jays’ general manager. “Determining where that difference is, in a more thorough way, is occurring because of manpower, really.”
That realization has transformed franchises. Since Atkins and team president Mark Shapiro took over the Blue Jays’ baseball operations in late 2015, Toronto has added significantly toits front officein an effort to better cultivate its own talent. The Blue Jays have added at least six positions for research and development in addition to creating a high-performance department that emphasizes strength and conditioning, mental health and nutrition throughout their farm system.
Long gone are the days when minor leaguers subsisted on peanut butter and jelly sandwiches with threadbare coaching staffs to guide them. Teams employmore coaches than everin the minors and the majors, and arm them with increasingly sophisticated tools to develop players.
Jeff Luhnow, the general manager of the Houston Astros, noted that the first aim of the analytics revolution — think of the “Moneyball”-era Oakland Athletics, in the early 2000s — was using statistics to better predict future performance. Now, he said, teams emphasize technology to better identify tools in amateurs and attack the deficiencies of their own prospects.
“There’s much more actionable feedback today than there ever has been, so you don’t let a player go down a path for very long if it’s not a path that’s going to work for him, long term, in the big leagues,” Luhnow said.
He mentioned three companies many teams now use — Rapsodo, TrackMan and Blast Motion — that give coaches instant feedback on players’ movements. Objective, easy-to-visualize data appeals to players from a tech-savvy generation.
“Before, you relied on the scout or the coach to say, ‘Well, you need to make this adjustment, and just trust me on it because I’ve seen it before, and what you’re doing is not going to work at the next level, so you need to change something,’” Luhnow said. “Now, you can actually show them video, show their numbers, and say, ‘This is what you’re doing, and I’ll show you why that doesn’t work at the next level and show you what does work, and let’s work on changing you, or modifying what you’re doing.’
“That, by definition, will lead to a higher success rate in development. Let’s say 5 percent of players get developed into big leaguers and it goes up to 7 percent. That’s a massive difference, because we haven’t increased our capacity, but what we’ve done is increase our throughput. So the success rate is good for players, but it probably results in an abundance of an oversupply. Obviously, it doesn’t affect a Harper or Machado, but there are just more options.”
Other teams have noticed the Astros’ success. Two of Luhnow’s assistants have become general managers elsewhere — Baltimore’s Elias and the Milwaukee Brewers’ David Stearns — and several former Astros coaches have received promotions with other teams, including Alex Cora, who managed the Boston Red Sox to the World Series title last fall.
The same thing has happened to the Los Angeles Dodgers, who have won two National League pennants in a row with a knack for progressive methods. Their president of baseball operations, Andrew Friedman, said he got 39 requests last fall from other teams wanting to interview Dodgers personnel.
“The past two off-seasons, I’ve spent the first four to six weeks like an H.R. director,” Friedman said.
When the Dodgers lost their hitting coach, Turner Ward, to the Cincinnati Reds, they replaced him with Robert Van Scoyoc, 32, a private hitting instructor who never played professionally but who has helped otherwise ordinary hitters, like J.D. Martinez and Chris Taylor, develop into stars. Unlocking hitting secrets, Friedman said, remains a largely untapped field.
“Since I’ve been sitting in advance meetings and been closer to that prep, nothing has changed on the offensive side in 12, 13 years,” he said, “whereas on the run-prevention side, everything has changed.”
Whileruns per gamehave fluctuated in this decade, strikeouts — the ultimate way to fool or overpower a hitter — have increased every season since 2006. This month, the league and the union finally gave into the trend and legislated a change.
With no end in sight to the procession of polished, power arms, they agreed to expand the size of the active roster next season to 26 — virtually assuring that the record of 1,379 players in a season will not last long.
Tyler Kepner has been national baseball writer since 2010. He joined The Times in 2000 and covered the Mets for two seasons, then covered the Yankees from 2002 to 2009.@TylerKepner
Supported by
Orioles 7, Yankees 5
ByJames Wagner
The Yankees and the Baltimore Orioles occupy different ends of the competition spectrum. The Yankees possess a far more talented roster, World Series expectations and a payroll that is around $130 million larger. The Orioles lost 115 games last season, and some analysts believe they could lose more this year with a pared-down roster.
Three games into the season, the Yankees have now lost to the Orioles twice, including a clunky 7-5 defeat on a chilly, wet Sunday.
“Not ideal,” the Yankees’ starting pitcher, J. A. Happ, said after Sunday’s game, which was delayed 3 hours 17 minutes because of rain. Happ took his first Yankee Stadium loss since August 2013; he had won seven consecutive decisions there.
A day after the star right fielder Aaron Judge said the Yankees needed to learn from the mistakes of last year and capitalize on opportunities regardless of opponent, the Yankees featured uneven pitching and sputtering hitting.
Over their two losses, the Yankees stranded 25 runners and went 5 for 21 with runners in scoring position.
Part of the difference between the Yankees, who won 100 games and earned a wild-card berth last year, and the Boston Red Sox, who won 108 and claimed the American League East crown and eventually the World Series, was how they fared against the Orioles. The Red Sox won 16 of 19 games; the Yankees won 12.
“We had them on the ropes and weren’t able to get the job done,” Judge said of the Orioles. “Like I said, we’ve got to play like our backs are against the wall.”
Much like their performance the day before, the Yankees’ hitters sputtered. They could not turn five walks by the Orioles’ starter, Dylan Bundy, over three and two-thirds innings into more than three runs.
Most of the Yankees’ runs came in the fourth inning when Brett Gardner drew a bases-loaded walk and Judge delivered a two-run single. But Judge finished the game with four strikeouts and left six men on base. Luke Voit, the designated hitter, stranded seven.
“Disappointed with the start we’ve gotten off to,” Gardner said. “We’ve got a lot of baseball left.”
Among the problems for the Yankees, besides the uneven offense, was catcher Gary Sanchez, who has been hoping to rebound from the worst all-around season of his career. For a second straight game, he had a throwing error on a stolen base attempt, with this one contributing to an Orioles run in the fifth inning.
He somewhat atoned for his defensive mistake — and strikeouts in his three previous at-bats — with a solo home run in the seventh inning off John Means.
The Yankees’ pitching did not help, either. Making his season debut after re-signing in the off-season, Happ allowed four runs over four innings. All of the scoring off Happ, who is a fly-ball pitcher, came on home runs: a three-run blast in the first inning by Renato Nunez and a bases-empty homer in the fourth by Trey Mancini.
Although Happ settled in after a jagged first inning, his high pitch count and coming matchups prompted Manager Aaron Boone to turn the game over to Luis Cessa and the bullpen.
Any chance of a comeback was lowered when Stephen Tarpley allowed a two-run homer to Joey Rickard in the eighth inning that pushed the Orioles’ lead to 7-4. And when the Yankees again threatened in the ninth, they squandered another opportunity with runners on base.
“That’s one part I feel good about: We’re creating opportunities,” Boone said. “Up and down the lineup, we’re getting those chances. Now we’ve got to break through.”



Supported by
ByVictor Mather
It is a term that goes back more than 100 years.
The first reference in the The New York Times to “disabled list” in a baseball contextdates to 1887, when Dick Buckley of the Syracuse Stars was said to be on such a list.
By 1915 it had become more codified, andThe Times reported: “Here-after the league will keep a ‘disabled’ list, which provides that an injured player can be kept out of the game at least ten days, and an extra player substituted for him.”
Now Major League Baseball will no longer use the phrase “disabled list” for the roster of injured players. In the future, it will be known as the “injured list.”
The change, firstreportedby ESPN, came after a push by advocates for disabled people, who objected to the term.
“The disability community identifies with the term ‘disabled,’” said Jay Ruderman, president of the Ruderman Family Foundation, which encourages greater inclusion of people with disabilities in society. “When it’s used incorrectly, when someone is injured, not disabled, that’s offensive.”
“People with disabilities do not consider themselves injured,” he added, noting that disabled people like the former Yankee Jim Abbott, a pitcher with one hand, had played baseball successfully. “Someone who tears an A.C.L. is not permanently disabled.”
Link20, a group of young activists sponsored by the Ruderman foundation, sent a letter to M.L.B. in November raising the issue. “Using the term ‘disabled list’ for players who are injured reinforces the belief that people with disabilities are injured and therefore are not able to participate or compete in any sports,” it said.
Ruderman said there had been little opposition from M.L.B. “They said, ‘Hey, you’re right, this needs to be changed.’”
“Baseball is hugely influential on American culture,’’ he said. “This is really refreshing that a major sport really got the issue very quickly. It’s a huge win for the disability community. Things like this really help break down stigma.”
The key connection for the group was Billy Bean, a vice president at Major League Baseball who works on issues of inclusion. Bean said in a statement that the change was “an example of our determination to get better off the field in the same way we try to improve on the field.”
"He has some power in the organization,” Ruderman said. “Usually the person dealing with inclusion is powerless in the organization.”
Some fans on Twitter lamented the change, complaining that they could no longer use the well-known abbreviation “D.L.” But a good number welcomed the switch.
The list will continue to work as it has in the past. Just not as the disabled list, or “the D.L.” — at least until people in baseball stop saying it.



Supported by
Yankees 15, Orioles 3
ByJames Wagner
BALTIMORE — Gary Sanchez stepped to the plate in the ninth inning on Sunday with a chance at history. Four-homer games are more rare than perfect games, and Sanchez had already gone long three times on Sunday as part of an offensive explosion by the wounded Yankees that produced 14 home runs against the Baltimore Orioles this weekend.
With the goal of the at-bat so clear, and with Hanser Alberto, an infielder, on the mound, Sanchez was under enormous pressure to go deep a fourth time.
“I tried to do what everyone was thinking about,” Sanchez said, smiling. “But some anxiety didn’t let me hit it.”
It did not matter that Sanchez flew out to left field. With seven home runs on Sunday, the Yankees still drubbed the Orioles, 15-3, to improve their record to 5-4 and cap a three-game sweep in which 26 of their 29 runs came via the long ball.
“That would’ve been a way to top off,” left fielder Clint Frazier, who clubbed two home runs himself, said of Sanchez. “But three homers isn’t too bad, either.”
Fault Sanchez, the Yankees’ primary catcher, for certain aspects of his game; he has made a handful of baserunning and defensive miscues a week and a half into the season. But do not fault him — or, for that matter, the Yankees’ depleted lineup — for a lack of power.
Serving as the designated hitter on Sunday, Sanchez produced career highs in home runs and runs batted in (six). The four hits and four R.B.I. by Frazier, who missed most of last season because of a concussion, were also career bests.
“I just feel healthier this year, and I feel better,” said Sanchez, who endured the worst all-around season of his career in 2018 along with off-season surgery on his nonthrowing shoulder. “And I hope to keep doing that.”
After the game, Sanchez grinned while describing how thrilled he was with his performance at the plate. His six home runs over all pace a Yankees squad that has 11 players on the injured list. Although the injured hitters Miguel Andujar, Didi Gregorius, Giancarlo Stanton and Aaron Hicks accounted for 119 of the Yankees’ major-league-record 267 homers last season, the lineup still showed off its firepower against the Orioles, who are rebuilding after posting the worst record in baseball in 2018.
“Sometimes, it takes the whole 40-man roster,” Frazier said, adding later, “We’re someone to still be worried about whenever we come to town.”
The power display, which also featured home runs by shortstop Gleyber Torres and catcher Austin Romine, supported the stout pitching of Domingo German, who did not allow a hit until the sixth inning. German has pitched well in two starts for a rotation lacking the ace Luis Severino and C. C. Sabathia, who might return from the I.L. next weekend.
“Now I have the opportunity, I’m doing everything I can to show all my work on the field,” German said. “Every start I want to execute like it’s my last.”
At the plate last year, the Yankees led baseball with 51 percent of their runs coming via homers. They were second entering Sunday.
“Never too much for us,” Yankees Manager Aaron Boone said. “I’m always good with us hitting as much as we need to.”
The Yankees needed Sanchez now, and on Sunday he reinforced the team decision makers’ faith in him — previous defensive and baserunning miscues and all.
“He’s a great player that’s still growing, and it’s our job to help him continue to reach his peak in every facet of the game,” Boone said. “He’s making strides in a lot of areas of the game. And we know we’ve got a special talent on our hands and a guy that impacts the game — period.”
INSIDE PITCH
Sunday’s win was the 2,000th ofBrian Cashman’s 22-season tenure as the Yankees’ general manager.


Supported by
ByRichard Goldstein
The Brooklyn Dodgerstraded for the Chicago Cubs’ All-Star Randy Jackson in December 1955, hoping he would become their regular third baseman.
Injuries limited his playing time during the next two seasons, but on Sept. 28, 1957, when he delivered a three-run homer against the Phillies in Philadelphia, Jackson became a footnote in the history of a storied franchise.
Jackson, who died on Wednesday morning at 93 at his home in Athens, Ga., was the last Brooklyn Dodger to hit a home run.
The Dodgers were playing their next-to-last game when Jackson’s drive landed in the upper left-field stands at Connie Mack Stadium off a pitch from the right-hander Don Cardwell, propelling Brooklyn to an 8-4 victory in a series that followed the Dodgers’ final home games at Ebbets Field.
Jackson was an unlikely candidate for his melancholy achievement: He had hit only one other home run that season, and he played in just 48 games while hobbled by a leg injury. And that home run seemed nothing special to him when the third-place Dodgers closed out their history the next day with a 2-1 loss to the Phillies, the last Brooklyn pitch delivered by an unproven left-hander named Sandy Koufax.
Earlier in that summer of ’57, when the Dodgers were on the brink of moving to Los Angeles and the New York Giants seemed headed to San Francisco, the Brooklyn-born comedian Phil Foster took up a lost cause with his rendition of“Let’s Keep the Dodgers in Brooklyn”on Coral Records.
The song, foreshadowing the borough of Brooklyn’s fate if its heroes fled to the West Coast, included a brief tribute to Jackson and the outfielder Gino Cimoli, though their Dodger careers were modest:
“Brooklyn would be like a pair of socks that’s holey/ Without Jackson and Cimoli.”
Jackson, in fact, had his best major league seasons playing for the Cubs from 1950 to 1955. He was a two-time All-Star with Chicago, hit 59 home runs over his final three seasons there and played alongside the future Hall of Fame shortstop Ernie Banks.
The Dodgers obtained Jackson in a multiplayer deal, expecting him to take over at third base from an aging Jackie Robinson. He arrived with a reputation for lacking fire, but as he told The Miami News at his first Dodger spring training camp, “My voice doesn’t carry more than six feet before it drops off, so what’s the use?”
He did have his moments before that parting home run.
In June 1956, Jackson combined with Duke Snider and Gil Hodges in a barrage of three consecutive ninth-inning home runs to lift the Dodgers to a victory over the Phillies at Ebbets Field. Jackson appeared in his only World Series that fall, going 0 for 3 as a pinch-hitter when the Dodgers lost to the Yankees in seven games.
Robinson retired after the 1956 season. Pee Wee Reese, the Dodgers’ longtime shortstop, shared third base with Jackson, Charlie Neal and Don Zimmer in 1957, the Dodgers’ last year in Brooklyn.
Ransom Joseph Jackson Jr. was born on Feb. 10, 1926, in Little Rock, Ark., the son of Ransom Sr. and Ann Polk Coolidge Jackson. His father, a former Princeton University baseball captain, prospered in the 1920s running a cotton brokerage business with two partners and offices in New York, London and Paris. After the business failed in the stock market crash of 1929, he sold life insurance. The Yankee catcher Bill Dickey was a family friend.
Randy won three Southwest Conference batting titles and played halfback in two Cotton Bowl games, for Texas Christian in 1945 and the University of Texas in 1946, while enrolled in World War II-era naval officer training programs on their campuses.
He was signed by the Cubs in 1947 and made his debut for them in May 1950. Along the way he acquired the name Handsome Ransom. (“The nickname has less to do with looks and more to do with a sportswriter looking for something to rhyme with Ransom,” he wrote in a 2016 memoir,“Handsome Ransom Jackson: Accidental Big Leaguer,”written with Gaylon H. White.)
He remained with the Dodgers when they moved to Los Angeles in 1958, was sent to Cleveland late that season, then finished his career as a Cub again in 1959. A right-handed batter, he hit 103 home runs and had a career batting average of .261. During the off-seasons he worked in his family’s laundry business and sold life insurance.
Jackson’s first marriage, to Ruth Fowler, ended in divorce. He is survived by his second wife, Terry (Yeargan) Jackson; two sons, Randy and Chuck, and a daughter, Ann Bolton, from his first marriage; two daughters, Ginny Bunn and Meredith Jackson-Parton, and a son, Ransom, from his second marriage; 13 grandchildren; and eight great-grandchildren. His son Randy said the cause of death was pneumonia.
Jackson, who owned an insurance agency in Athens after his playing days, still received autograph requests in his late years, though he said some of the letter writers thought they were reaching the musician Randy Jackson, a longtime judge on “American Idol.”
That final Brooklyn Dodger home run had never registered with Jackson until he got a phone call from one of his sons in the late 1990s.
As Jackson related it to The Athens Banner-Herald: “He told me that ‘Good Morning America’ had a trivia question: Who was the last Brooklyn Dodger to hit a home run? It was me. I did not know that myself till then.”
William McDonald contributed reporting.
Supported by
ByJames Wagner
TAMPA, Fla. — James Paxton is a starting pitcher for the Yankees, not a statistics innovator. But during the 2018 season with the Seattle Mariners, before his off-season trade to New York, he found a novel way to measure his efficiency and aggressiveness on the mound.
Paxton, 30, asked the Mariners’ analytics department to give him a printout of a statistic he was tracking himself: the percentage of at-bats that, after three pitches, were either in a 1-2 count or already completed. He named the statistic A3P— After 3 Pitches — and monitors it often, rather than relying on more conventional statistics such as earned run average or wins and losses.
“I can’t control some of those things,” he said. “I try to focus on the things I can control. And I can control if I’m attacking the hitter.”
Baseball is saturated with statistics. Want to know which hitters do the best against low fastballs over 95 miles per hour from left-handed relief pitchers? Want to know which outfielders cover the most ground or what percent of the time a similar play resulted in an out? Those can be found in a matter of clicks online.
As the ways to quantify what happens on the field continually evolve, so has the debate over which measurements are best. In modern baseball circles, many traditional statistics no longer hold the same power.
“I don’t think batting averages are a thing now,” said Luke Voit, 28, a Yankees first baseman.
In the Yankees’ clubhouse, there is a wide range of ways in which players evaluate themselves through statistics, some relying on the conventional measures with others leaning toward the contemporary. A casual poll of players provided a window into their thinking and which skills they value — or don’t.
“I don’t look at anything,” said C. C. Sabathia, 38, who is entering the 19th and final season of a distinguished career that includes a Cy Young Award and six All-Star selections.
“I don’t understand WHIP,” he added about an oft-used statistic that adds walks and hits before dividing that total by innings pitched. “All I know is E.R.A., wins and losses. I’m old school in that sense.”
Luis Severino, 25, the Yankees’ injured ace, may have grown up in a different era of baseball, but he feels the same way. His go-to statistics for self-evaluation are E.R.A. and innings pitched, two categories in which he has led the Yankees’ rotation the past two seasons.
His fellow starter J. A. Happ, 36, said he follows win-loss records and E.R.A. because they are ubiquitous. But over the years, he has found himself gravitating toward WHIP after a conversation with R. A. Dickey, a former Cy Young Award winner, when they were both Toronto Blue Jays.
“It started to make sense that generally speaking — although numbers can prove anything — that, if you’re doing a good job of keeping the walks and hits down, then you’re doing pretty good over all,” Happ said.
During a recent spring training meeting, Yankees coaches stressed the need to be aggressive. Paxton takes this to heart: He is among the best in baseball at throwing strikes. In addition to his A3P statistic, Paxton checks on the percentage of first pitches in each plate appearance that were strikes. His goal is to reach at least 70 percent; he was at 66 percent last season, according to Baseball-Reference.com.
“By thinking about this often, and if I can do it consistently, I’m putting myself in a good spot to have success,” he said.
As for offensive statistics, outfielder Aaron Judge, the Yankees’ best all-around hitter, regularly checks two statistics during the season to see if he is doing his job as one of the team’s main sluggers: runs and R.B.I. And he will examine how well he did with runners on base or in scoring position.
“That’s the name of the game: scoring more runs than the other team,” he said.
But the R.B.I. statistic has been de-emphasized by modern baseball because it is as much a product of a team’s lineup as the individual hitter’s skill. Put Judge, 26, in the worst lineup in baseball last season and he would have a harder time cracking the cherished 100-R.B.I. plateau.
“It still shows value to me,” Judge said. “For me, I always look at the guys that are leading in R.B.I. on their team, and usually those teams are doing better.”
Another measure Judge cited seemed counterintuitive. At 6 foot 7, Judge is one of the tallest position players in baseball history. But he prides himself on being faster than you would think; 374 players were slower than him last season, according to Major League Baseball’s Statcast data. Judge keeps tabs on how often he is scoring from second base on a single or advancing from first to third as a base runner.
“If you look all over the game, you’ll see a lot of guys just go first to second,” he said. “There’s a lot more chances to go first to third than people think. You just got to be aggressive.”
Judge’s fellow slugger, Giancarlo Stanton, prefers to examine which of his hitting tendencies opposing pitchers might exploit. When scrutinizing his performance with runners in scoring position, he said, he examines his mental approach rather than a popular statistic like on-base-plus-slugging percentage (O.P.S.).
Stanton, 29, does check his chase rate, a phrase for the percentage of times a batter swings at pitches outside the strike zone. During Stanton’s first season with the Yankees in 2018 after a trade from the Miami Marlins, his chase rate jumped more than five percentage points to nearly 33 percent from the previous season,according to FanGraphs.com. That may have contributed to his decline in overall power production.
Several players said they did not focus on any preferred statistics.
“If you look only at R.B.I., then maybe you don’t hit much in terms of average — or the reverse,” said catcher Gary Sanchez, 26, who is hoping to bounce back from the worst all-around season of his career and return to his 2017 All-Star form. “It’s all important. You try to do it all.”
Others said they avoided statistics entirely. Relief pitcher Dellin Betances, 30, said he knew exactly how he was performing without the numbers to break it down. Troy Tulowitzki, 34, the Yankees’ primary shortstop while Didi Gregorius recovers from elbow surgery, cited an unheard-of statistic: “I look at a winning player.”
Tulowitzki pointed to the Yankees’ new infielder D. J. LeMahieu, 30, a former teammate from their days with the Colorado Rockies, as one. LeMahieu, a career .298 hitter who once won a batting title, loosely keeps tabs on the quality of his at-bats and his strikeouts.
Some players, like relief pitchers Chad Green, 27, and Adam Ottavino, 33, have adapted well to the data revolution in baseball.
Even closer Yankees closer Aroldis Chapman, 31, an advanced statistics neophyte, said he has learned since his half season with the Chicago Cubs in 2016 that one applies well to him: his outings usually turn out better when he gets the first batter out. He has tracked it himself since.
Ottavino, though,is on his own level. During the season, he checks two statistics he believes reflect how he is throwing: first-strike and walk percentages. At the end of the season, he dives deeply into how he threw the ball, using advanced statistics like xwOBA (expected weight on-base average), which in layman’s terms, essentially measures the quality of the contact made against him.
He labeled other statistics, like E.R.A. or the scoring percentage of inherited base runners, as faulty.
“We’re trying to strip away all the luck factors so you can be as real with yourself as possible,” he said. “If you’re not doing that, you’re going to ride the roller coaster really bad, and you’re lying to yourself.”
Even if some of Ottavino’s teammates are not quite there yet in terms of the game’s advanced numbers, the Yankees’ robust analytics department is there to help them all break down the multitude of statistics in the game. The players just have to ask.



Supported by
ByKevin Draper
The best way to understand Mike Trout, the outfielder for baseball’s Los Angeles Angels, who on Tuesday reportedly agreed to the richest contract in North American sports, is as the perfect reflection of his sport.
Little known to many Americans, including some sports fans, Trout, 27, is the best player in a game that has frequently been mocked as a fading form of entertainment with primarily regional audiences.
Baseball is often dismissed as far less enticing than the N.F.L., which is believed to bring in more than $14 billion annually even with its health and safety issues. Baseball also is called less dynamic than the N.B.A., even though it had about $2 billion less in revenue than M.L.B. last year.
So when Trout’s 12-year, $430 million contract was revealed, it prompted an obvious question: How could a sport that is struggling to attract a new generation of fans, and that is facing a potentially bruising labor fight with its players in two years, afford yet another nine-figure contract?
News of Trout’s deal came about three weeks after outfielderBryce Harper accepteda 13-year, $330 million contractwith the Phillies and a month after infielderManny Machado gota 10-year, $300 million dealfrom the San Diego Padres.
A comparison of all the Major League Baseball players who signed contracts of at least $100 million.
The answer has more to do with the mechanics of the collective bargaining agreement between players and owners than with anything that might constitute a referendum on the game’s popularity. There are several dynamics at work in the sport, where huge wealth still flows to the best of the best, while there is less money left over for the so-called middle class, despite continuing growth in baseball’s revenues.
Owners, it seems, have figured out how to keep costs down by using younger players, who are cheaper than veterans, thus freeing up cash for the occasional megadeal. Players like Trout, Harper and Machado benefit, while others are forced to accept less.
“In the past, teams were valuing players differently,” said James Paxton, a starting pitcher for the Yankees. “For a long time, that system was fine. Now that the teams have changed the way they’re valuing players, especially older players, it’s kind of broken the system and it is forcing us to take a look at it.”
In a studythat has not yet been published, J.C. Bradbury, an economics professor at Kennesaw State University, calculated that baseball revenue rose at an average rate of 6.6 percent from 2003 to 2015, while player salaries rose at an average rate of just 4.4 percent.
Major League Baseball revenues reached $10.3 billion last year. The sources include evermore money from guaranteed sources, like multibillion-dollar media deals for the entire sport and other lucrative media contracts, many at the local level. Less important have been ticket sales, which generally fluctuate with wins and losses.
With the shift in valuation of players, the average salary went down in 2018 for the first time in 14 years (to a little more than $4 million), according to the players association. It was just the fourth time in the last 50 years that the average has gone down.
Dan Halem, the deputy commissioner of M.L.B., said there was no evidence of teams not trying to win, and he painted a very different picture of baseball’s economics.
Salaries have gone up on average 5.3 percent each year since 2012, keeping pace with baseball’s revenue growth during that time, he said, and while the pay may have been slightly down or flat in 2018, one year does not make a trend. He also said that over the last decade the players had received a consistent percentage of the game’s revenue, from 52 to 57 percent.
“In a market-based system, depending upon the year and how our clubs are valuing players,” said Halem, “certain players do better than others.”
Yet words like “collusion” and “strike” — once the third rails of the sport, especially after the ruinous strike of 1994-1995 — are now regularly uttered by players and agents — despite the huge contracts.
Focusing on giant deals misses the bigger picture, according to Jeff Borris, a longtime baseball agent who has represented stars like Barry Bonds, and is now the general counsel of the Ballengee Group, a sports representation agency.
“Contracts like Trout’s and Harper’s are aberrations,” Borris said. “The focus should be more on things like why isn’t Dallas Keuchel signed orthe contract that Gio Gonzalez just signed.Those are the areas that are of concern.”
Keuchel, a two-time All-Star starting pitcher for the Houston Astros, remained unsigned one week before opening day, while Gonzalez, a solid, durable starting pitcher, has signed a minor-league deal with the Yankees.
“I think the owners are manipulating the system to their advantage,” Borris said.
For decades, baseball players have been represented by what is widely considered to be the strongest union in all of professional sports. As a result, baseball has no limits on salaries, though its luxury tax, which penalizes a team after its payroll rises above $206 million, can function as a de facto cap.
The problem now, at least as articulated by players, is that while teams reward superstars, they no longer feel compelled to spend to win if they do not believe they already have the pieces in place to compete for a championship.
“Why is there not an interest in players that can help teams win, particularly as we get to the last two weeks of spring training?” Tony Clark, the executive director of the players association, said before the Trout deal was reached.
Despite baseball’s strong union, certain provisions that kept salaries rising for decades turned out to be norms, not hard and fast rules.
Baseball players do not become free agents until they accrue six years of service time. They are generally paid at the league minimum for their first three seasons, while in the next three they can receive higher salaries through negotiation or arbitration. This leads to odd situations like Trout’s being voted the American League most valuable player in his third full season while earning just $1 million.
This used to be acceptable to players because they made up for it on the back end of their careers. There are the infamous albatross contracts given to veterans, like the $125 million extension signed by Ryan Howard in 2010, but most of the time it was veteran players being paid a fair wage, or being slightly overpaid, well into their 30s, and sometimes 40s.
It’s not a coincidence that Trout, Harper and Machado all got their megadeals at the age of 27 or younger. But as the circumstances of older players like Gonzalez and Keuchel demonstrate, teams have been working on the assumption that a veteran’s abilities are likely to decline soon after his salary peaks and that it makes sense to use younger players, who can fill out a roster at lower costs and risks — even if the chance to make the playoffs is also reduced.
“I don’t think that we thought that teams all of a sudden were going to just stop competing to the degree that they are now,” said Adam Ottavino, a Yankees pitcher. “A lot of things changed really fast.”
Email Kevin Draper atkevin.draper@nytimes.comor follow him on Twitter:@kevinmdraper.
Tyler Kepner and James Wagner contributed reporting.



Supported by
Sports of The Times
ByMichael Powell
So the mighty Frank Robinson is dead at 83.
As a young kid, I was struck by the man, tall, strong, so coolly menacing at the plate, and the statistics and awards that underlined all that the eye took in: those 586 pre-steroidal home runs and the only man who won the Most Valuable Player Award in both leagues.
And there were all those times he was knocked down and dusted himself off and hit a home run on the next pitch. He practically sneered as he trotted around the bases.
As Sports Illustrated wrote in the 1960s, pitchers figured “the only way to deal with Robinson is to hit him before he hits you.”
He was also the first black manager in baseball. He was given a crappy team, of course, an old Buick station wagon of a Cleveland Indians squad. You thought white owners would give the first black manager the keys to a Mercedes? He played designated hitter on that team and at age 39 hit nine home runs with a .508 slugging percentage in 118 at-bats.
On opening day of that year, 1975, Robinson the player hit a home run for Robinson the manager.
And as with all things African-American and Major League Baseball, Robinson looms as a figure out of the Mesozoic Age. Less than 8 percent of major league players are African-American, according to the Institute for Diversity and Ethics in Sport, down from a high of more than 18 percent. More damning still, there is but one manager who could be classified as African-American. Dave Roberts of the Los Angeles Dodgers is of African-American and Japanese descent (There are four Latino managers).
There are 25 white managers.
This is a deeply perplexing shortfall, and as it persists year after year after year like the winter and summer solstices, one can safely assume that something more than dumb chance accounts for this problem. We might look to the fact that those doing the hiring, owners and team presidents and general managers, are overwhelmingly white.
Baseball men, and the vast majority are male, tend to twin talk of a dearth of minority managers with talk about trends toward analytics, as if that explains something. As Ivy League guys rule many front offices, it is said, they naturally seek managerial candidates fluent in O.B.P., WHIP, FIP, and so on and on, the arcana and language of analytics.
This is silliness.
Last fall, the Boston Red Sox played the Dodgers in the World Series. The manager of the Red Sox, Alex Cora, was Latino and there was the aforementioned Roberts in the other dugout. They had bested a passel of white-managed teams on the way to that affair, not one of whom possessed an advanced mathematics degree from Caltech.
I put the questions of baseball analytics to Joey Cora, brother of Alex and baseball coach for decades. He had interviewed several times for manager without making the final cut.
“Everyone in baseball understands the importance of statistics and analysis; we’re saturated with that,” he said. “That’s no secret anymore. You also need to know baseball and how to lead men and how to combine all of that.
“Why wouldn’t we understand that?”
That was a good question last October and a good question still.
Robinson managed in the pre-analytics era, and few who knew him doubted his necessities when it came to understanding the facets of that game. As the Cincinnati Reds scout George Powles told Sports Illustrated, “I don’t know what his I.Q. is, but his B.Q., his baseball quotient, has always been genius.”
His will was indomitable. In 1965, the Reds traded him to the Baltimore Orioles, his general manager calling him “an old 30.” The next year, his first in the American League, he won the Triple Crown, hitting .316 with 49 home runs and 122 R.B.I. That May, he faced Luis Tiant, a brilliant fireball pitcher with the Indians and a man who didn’t mind brushing back a hitter.
Robinson hit a Tiant pitch 541 feet, making him the first and only man ever to hit a home run entirely out of Memorial Stadium in Baltimore. The Orioles planted a flag labeled “HERE” on the spot where the ball,still in the stratosphere,left the stadium.
Baseball men tend to go on and on about their plans to attract great African-American athletes back to baseball. They might note that their lamentations coexist with a large number of retired black baseball players who never got a chance to manage baseball teams.
Bump your head against a ceiling long enough, and maybe you decide there are better things to do than develop a bruise. Perhaps best to start hiring black managers and planting a flag that says HERE.


Supported by
ByMatt Stevens
Larry Baer, the chief executive of the San Francisco Giants, has been suspended without pay until July over a video that shows him involved ina public altercation with his wife, the commissioner of Major League Baseball announced on Tuesday.
Mr. Baer has been on a leave of absence from the team since March 4, time away that the league said would now be converted to an unpaid suspension. During the approximately four-month suspension, which goes through July 1, Mr. Baer “shall have no involvement in the operations of the Giants.” The team will be put under the control of someone selected by the team’s ownership group,a statement from Major League Baseball said.
In the meantime, Mr. Baer must be evaluated by an expert to determine an appropriate treatment and counseling plan, the statement said.
The baseball commissioner, Rob Manfred, said league investigators had reviewed video footage of the March 1 episode, in which Mr. Baer was seen lunging for a cellphone in his wife’s hand and forcefully grabbing her. They struggled, and she fell to the ground.
In a statement on Tuesday, Mr. Manfred said that he had met with Mr. Baer and that he had concluded that Mr. Baer’s conduct was “unacceptable under M.L.B. policies and warrants discipline.”
“In determining the appropriate level of discipline, I find that Mr. Baer should be held to to a higher standard because as a leader he is expected to be a role model for others in his organization and community,” Mr. Manfred said. “Based on my conversation with Mr. Baer, it is clear he regrets what transpired and takes responsibility for his conduct.”
The board of the San Francisco Giants, speaking on behalf of the team’s ownership, said in a statement that it believed the discipline imposed by the commissioner was appropriate. The team said that its acting chief executive, Rob Dean, would serve as the interim “control person” until it designates someone permanently.
Mr. Baer, who in addition to leading the Giants’ executive office isone of the team’s principal owners, will continue to serve as the team’s chief executive and president after he returns from his suspension, the team added.
“I respect and accept the commissioner’s decision,” Mr. Baer said in his ownstatement. “I made a serious mistake that I sincerely regret and I am truly sorry for my actions.”
The punishment came as the sports world waits to see how the N.F.L.’s commissioner will reprimand the owner of the New England Patriots, Robert K. Kraft, who has been accused of soliciting prostitution at a massage parlor in Jupiter, Fla. Mr. Kraftpleaded not guiltyto two first-degree misdemeanor charges late last month.
The situation involving Mr. Baer and the allegations against Mr. Kraft have drawn attention to how team owners and executives are punished after being accused of misconduct, compared with players, for whom fines and suspensions may carry a greater impact.
After video of the encounter, which was firstposted by TMZ Sports, surfaced publicly this month, Mr. Baer and his wife, Pam, initially issued statements denying that a physical altercation had taken place. The video appeared to show them arguing in a public plaza. Ms. Baer sat in a chair, and her husband stood next to her. And then Mr. Baer was seen lunging toward her, grabbing her and setting off the struggle, during which she fell to the ground and screamed, “Oh my God!”
The police and Major League Baseball quickly pledged to investigate what had taken place andMr. Baer apologized. Three days after the confrontation,the Giants announced that Mr. Baer would take a leave of absencefrom his job as chief executive.
In mid-March, a coalition of women’s groupsposted an open letteronline that called on Mr. Manfred to commit to “firm and appropriate action in disciplining” Mr. Baer. The mayor of San Francisco, London N. Breed, endorsed the call for a serious penalty.
After the suspension was announced, the coalition, #DoWhatsRightMLB, said it appreciated Mr. Manfred’s reprimand.
“M.L.B. is showing why it is regarded as a leader in advancing cultural change in professional sports by not tolerating violence against women,” the coalition said in astatement.
Ms. Breed agreed, saying in a statement that the league had “sent a clear message that violence against women is unacceptable in any form.”
Last week, the San Francisco District Attorney’s Office determined that the evidence in the case did not support filing criminal charges against Mr. Baer, a spokesman said Tuesday.
Mr. Baer joined the Giants as the club’s marketing director in 1980, left the team to attend Harvard Business School and then served in positions at Westinghouse Broadcasting and CBS,according to a biography.
He returned to the team as a limited partner of the ownership group, and was named chief operating officer in May 1996, president in October 2008 and chief executive in January 2012.



Supported by
Keeping Score
ByBenjamin Hoffman
As Bryce Harper and Manny Machado, both 26, reached free agency this off-season, there was a drumbeat of declarations about how rare it was for baseball players so good and so young to hit the open market. Many expected the confluence to shatter previous records for free agent contracts.
Yet without nearly as much fanfare, Nolan Arenado, the star third baseman for the Colorado Rockies, appears close to a deal for the highest annual salary for a position player in baseball, even though he has not become a free agent.
Multiple news outlets on Tuesday reported that Arenado and the Rockies were on the verge of an eight-year contract extension that would pay him more per season than the $30 million annual average thatMachado will receive in his 10-year deal with the San Diego Padres.And depending on the numbers in a deal for Harper, who is still on the market, Arenado could top him, as well.
But even if Arenado breaks the record for a position player — with, according to the reports, an average annual value of $32.5 million — Harper’s and Machado’s representatives should view that extension as further evidence of their clients’ extraordinary status.
In a sport flush with cash from savvy off-field business moves, teams typically lock up young players before they hit free agency, as the Rockies just did, so the chance to acquire Machado or Harper for cash alone has truly been extraordinary.
A comparison of all the Major League Baseball players who signed contracts of at least $100 million.
However, if Harper wants to end up with the top contract of this off-season, he should hope to avoid any other comparisons between his performance and Arenado’s.
Arenado, who will turn 28 in April, is 18 months older than Harper and 15 months older than Machado. And he has established himself as the face of the Rockies’ franchise, while his production has been nothing less than sensational.
Aided somewhat by Denver’s thin air, Arenado hit .297 with a .358 on-base percentage and .573 slugging percentage from 2015 through 2018. He hit 158 home runs — leading the National League in three of those four seasons — and even after adjusting for his home park, he has generated 25.3 wins above replacement, placing him fourth in the majors behind Mike Trout, Mookie Betts and Jose Altuve in that span.
A perennial candidate for the National League’s Most Valuable Player Award, Arenado has been having the type of career many predicted for Harper.
Since high school, Harper had been viewed as baseball’s chosen one. He was selected with the first overall pick in the 2010 draft, and his LeBron James-like hype was seemingly justified in 2015, when he produced 10 wins above replacement for the 22nd time in N.L. history — and the first by someone other than Barry Bonds or Sammy Sosa since 1975.
But in the three years since then, as Harper prepared for a free agency payday that at one pointhad people speculating about a $500 million deal, he has a combined WAR of just 7.5.
Arenado, who was selected with the 59th pick of the 2009 draft and was known more for his glove than for his bat over his first few seasons, has produced 19.4 WAR in the same three-year period.
They have been fairly similar offensively. Arenado’s production, when adjusted for his home park, has been 31 percent better than the league average, while Harper’s as an outfielder has been 33 percent better. But Arenado has been more durable, and the gulf between their defensive value is extreme: Arenado has produced 5.4 defensive WAR and has won a Gold Glove in each of those three seasons, while Harper, at a far less vital position, has generated an ugly minus-4.2 defensive WAR.
If Arenado had made it to free agency next season, there is no telling what type of offer he might have received. He would have been nearly 29 and would have the taint of Coors Field prompting questions about whether his success could be replicated elsewhere. But he also would be on the (very) short list of baseball’s best all-around players, a claim that neither Harper nor Machado could truly make.
Harper, though, should benefit greatly from Arenado’s being off the market for eight years. Any teams that had designs on signing Colorado’s franchise player next year will be forced to look elsewhere.
And Harper, alone at the top of the market, is not only the best remaining free agent but also, accounting for his age and his ceiling, the best that will be along for the next several seasons. He will undoubtedly be paid on a similar level as Arenado, and the only open question will be if he can get back to playing like him, too.


Supported by
Keeping Score
With 3,089 hits in the majors and 1,278 in Japan, some believe Suzuki surpassed Pete Rose. It is more complicated than that.
ByBenjamin Hoffman
How many hits does Ichiro Suzuki have? It seems like a simple question, but the answer, like everything in Suzuki’s world, is not simple.
Some numbers are clear. After starting this season 0 for 5, Suzukiannounced his retirement on Thursday, leaving him with 3,089 hits across parts of 19 major league seasons. In Japan, where he began his career, he had 1,278 hits in nine seasons.
Those totals have him ranked 23rd in the majors — 21 hits behind Dave Winfield and seven ahead of Albert Pujols — and 95th in Japan. But it has become common to simply combine the totals, crediting him with 4,367 career hits, thus pushing him past Pete Rose as baseball’s hit king.
That is where things get murky. It’s widely understood that Nippon Professional Baseball, where Suzuki starred for the Orix BlueWave, can produce top-tier major league talent, but the league over all is not on the same level as M.L.B. So to simply add on those hits, free of adjustment or context, could be seen as akin to including a player’s minor league statistics.
Once you do that — allowing, of course, for the fact that there is no way to compare the quality of various minor and international leagues across eras with any degree of certainty — Suzuki falls behind Rose, just edging Ty Cobb for second place.
With Suzuki falling short, either way, it is easier to view his hit totals separately, without trying to find a way to combine them. Rose remains the hit king, especially from the perspective of people in the United States. Similarly, Barry Bonds is considered the home run champion with 762, despiteSadaharu Ohhitting 868 in Japan during a 22-season career that ended in 1980.
Still, that does not mean Suzuki was a lesser hitter than Rose. A .311 hitter in the majors and a .353 hitter in Japan, Suzuki is perhaps the greatest spray hitter in history regardless of league. He hit for very little power — despite being known for prodigious blasts in batting practice — and drew relatively few walks. Yet despite spending nine years of his pro career in a different league, he will retire with the sixth-most singles in major league history, having outdistanced masters of the art like Rod Carew and Tony Gwynn.
In addition to his line drives, Suzuki was a top-notch defender and an above-average base stealer, giving him a skill set that sticks out among his peers. Bysimilarity score— a statistic developed by the statistician Bill James to sort out which players are statistically similar, with adjustments made for position — Carew’s career is the closest one to Suzuki’s, at 849.8 points out of a possible 1,000. But the list of the 10 players most similar to Suzuki includes Max Carey, Doc Cramer and Harry Hooper. In all, six of those 10 made their debut before 1930. The only players of the last 30 years to show up on the list are Kenny Lofton and Gwynn.
Off the field, Suzuki, through a combination of his personality and his insistence that his interpreters provide literal translations from his Japanese to English, has long been known for delivering spectacular quotations. He did not disappoint when asked bySports Illustrated in 2002to describe his career and his instant fame upon joining the Mariners in 2001.
“I’m unique,” he said. “I’m a very rare kind of player.”
His distinctive achievements should be further secured in a few years, when he will almost certainly become the first player to be inducted into the halls of fame in both Japan and the United States.
He does not need to be baseball’s hit king to do that. He most likely did not need his last several seasons in the majors to have secured a spot in both halls. And even ignoring his time in Japan entirely, he retires as a 10-time All-Star, a 10-time Gold Glove winner, a two-time batting champion and a one-time winner of the Most Valuable Player Award. He owns the record for hits in a single season, and the legend of his powerful throwing arm should carry on just as long as his reputation for batting exploits.
He may not have surpassed Rose in hits, but to make it into the hall of fame in two countries seems to perfectly encapsulate a player who had the unique distinction of being a superstar in two leagues — a feat capped perfectly by his final games as a professional coming in Japan.
Adding up what he did between the leagues in an accurate manner may be difficult, but declaring it to have been rare — to use Suzuki’s word — is remarkably easy.
Benjamin Hoffman is a senior staff editor and regular contributor to theKeeping Score columnin sports. He joined The Times in 2005.@BenHoffmanNYT•Facebook
Supported by
For some players, the sense of beginnings and hope is tempered by the thought: Is this my last one?
ByDoug Glanville
Mr. Glanville is a former professional baseball player.
Players from all over the worldare now deep into the daily work that defines major league spring training camps in Arizona and Florida. Most, undoubtedly,arestill filled with that unexplainable feeling that captures baseball’s spring fever. It is in the air, in the humidity and, over time, in your bones. Your own internal barometer is telling you it’s time to play ball.
But the knowledge that baseball season will start again is not free of trepidation. Pros, especially veterans, are aware that no matter how they may push science, they will inevitably be defeated by the battle of attrition that erodes skill sets and, ultimately, their value to a team.
This does not happen immediately, for the early years are filled with optimism and confidence — we all are one pitch, one bloop single away from making the team.
But at every spring training, players are quietly wondering if this is it, the last time they will be putting on the uniform as a professional. Beyond the shortfall of talent that may prematurely push them out of the game while still young, a few in this category are genuinely exhausted from the grind of the road, the off-season surgeries, the missed birthday parties, the flowers they had to send in their place to the funeral of a friend. But many have been sliding into home for a long time, the last 90 feet telling them that it is the only destination — a final career resting place where they both score and expire.
My own slide into home started when I was running to first base, in Texas in 2003. I felt a pop, my strides became irregular, and I was helped off the field in my first major league trip to the injured list as a 32-year-old veteran outfielder. Speed was my game, so this was a bigger deal than when, for instance, the Seattle Mariners’ star hitterEdgar Martinez(now a newly minted Hall of Famer) popped a hamstring. In my case, my resulting torn hamstring tendon compromised all aspects of my game as a base-stealing, contact-hitting defender.
I would come back after surgery, close to new. But to perform as if Iwasnew required hours of pre-game rituals, bearable when I was still a starter, less so when my job was to pinch-hit off a nasty closer or spot-start against an ace.
By the season after surgery, I knew I would not be able to match my National League-leading 678 at-bats in 1998. My body could not take it, even with the training and pre-game routine.
It was the new normal. The days of Wiffle ball in front of my parents’ house, when no stretching was required, had faded to memory. Using the telephone pole and the lamppost as foul territory markers (while denoting the electrical wire above the sidewalk as “interference”) felt further away because only my mind and soul could reach that place, not my body. I had to stretch, and often, just to step into the batter’s box.
When I came into the Yankees’ spring training in 2005, I had already started smelling the roses. Getting autographs from opponents, taking pictures with teammates, collecting archives and old newspaper clippings were now as much a part of my routine as getting ultrasounds on my hamstring. I had to start thinking about the children I didn’t have, the memories that would someday be jarred to life by a memento. It was the first time I understood what it meant to simultaneously be present and watch a personal future dim, while collecting what had been.
Shawon Dunston, my Chicago Cubs teammate and mentor, once said to me: "Never give the uniform back. Let them rip it off your body." He was noting the unavoidable endpoint to playing this game as a professional. Yet to hand the uniform in creates a sense of control that you rarely experience in your career. In retrospect, I found that the uniform does not get metaphorically ripped off your body, but slowly falls off, year by year, stich by stitch, unraveling to reveal the indiscriminate work of time.
Ballplayers know the phone call asking for their services will stop ringing one day, but the birds of spring will never stop calling. The ghosts of our career in this love affair will stay with us as glimpses. The walk-off home run, the first hit, the tears in our eyes when playing after the Sept. 11 attacks.
Right now, the players are focused on the work at hand, and until that first cut, they all know they have the same opportunity as every player in camp: to make the team, make history, and for those at the end of their careers, buy time.
Yet at best, it is a mortgage, divinely owned and borrowed. It is a spring contract where the fine print is our friend, reminding us that the only way to extend time in this game is to deed it to the next generation.
Doug Glanville (@dougglanville), a former professional baseball player, is the author of “The Game From Where I Stand,” a lecturer at Yale and a contributing opinion writer.
The Times is committed to publishinga diversity of lettersto the editor. We’d like to hear what you think about this or any of our articles. Here are sometips. And here’s our email:letters@nytimes.com.
Follow The New York Times Opinion section onFacebook,Twitter (@NYTopinion)andInstagram.
Supported by
On Baseball
ByTyler Kepner
WEST PALM BEACH, Fla. — Rob Manfred reported to spring training ready to play defense.
Manfred, the commissioner of Major League Baseball, is tired of hearing complaints from players and agents about the changing economic landscape of his sport. In a news conference on Sunday, he suggested that players get over it, and that most of the unsigned free agents are not very good, anyway.
“There are 11 players that had a WAR above 1.0 that areunsigned,” Manfred said, referring to wins above replacement figures used by MLB.com. “I believe that, just like last year, that market is going to clear at some point in the next few weeks. Those players are going to get signed.
“Do I wish, if I had my way, that Scott Boras or Dan Lozano — whatever agent — would find a way to make a deal with some club sooner rather than later? Yes, I do. But we negotiated a system that allows a market to operate.”
Boras represents outfielder Bryce Harper. Lozano represents infielder Manny Machado. Both players are 26 years old, with 10 All-Star selections between them. They were still unsigned on Sunday, with dozens of others, nine of whom have a WAR above 1: Jose Bautista, Clay Buchholz, Carlos Gonzalez, Gio Gonzalez, Marwin Gonzalez, Dallas Keuchel, Craig Kimbrel, Jose Iglesias and Denard Span.
Teams have stopped spending like they used to, and only one free agent has signed for more than $68 million this winter —starter Patrick Corbin, who got a six-year, $140 million deal from the Washington Nationals. Gone are the days that a player in his 30s could get a 10-year, $240 million contract, like the one Robinson Cano got from the Seattle Mariners before the 2014 season.
“I’m surprised,” Cano, who was traded to the Mets in December, said on Sunday. “I would say every baseball player is shocked.”
They shouldn’t be, Manfred insisted. Instead, he suggested, players should recognize that they are now valued differently by a data-driven industry less prone to the emotional decisions that once drove salaries ever higher.
“I think it’s important to remember that the Major League Baseball Players Association has always wanted a market-based system, and markets change, particularly when the institution around those markets change,” Manfred said. “We’ve had a lot of change in the game. People think about players differently. They analyze players differently. They negotiate differently.”
While the Boston Red Sox had the game’s highest payroll last season and won the World Series, Manfred cited the Tampa Bay Rays, who won 90 games with a low budget. That did not translate to big crowds — the Rays finished last in the American League in attendance — but Manfred said it proved that spending does not equate to winning.
“The process of putting together a competitive team looks a little different,” he said. “Fans have to get used to that different process and have a little faith in the people that are running their clubs.”
Players have been frustrated by teams choosing to build with young, cheap labor when proven veterans are available — for more money, of course. But the calculus that players used for decades no longer applies. That, said Nationals reliever Sean Doolittle, is a bigger issue than any perceived flaws in the collective bargaining agreement.
“Our biggest mistake, I think, was operating under the assumption that the norms that were always in place were going to continue to be respected,” Doolittle said on Friday. “Like, there was always this kind of unspoken agreement, or model, set up where for your first six years, most guys are underpaid because they don’t really have that much leverage. You’re locked into your minimum salary your first three years, and then when you go through the arbitration process for the next three years, there’s no market — it’s just you and one buyer, so there’s only so much you can do to move your value. But then you make it up on the back end in free agency.”
Most players have stopped short of claiming outright collusion, the illegal tactic owners used to suppress salaries in the 1980s. But many are at least suspicious of the way groupthink has taken over the industry. Adam Wainwright, a highly respected veteran starter for the St. Louis Cardinals, sounded an alarm in an interview last weekwith InsideSTL.com.
“Unless something changes, there’s going to be a strike, 100 percent,” Wainwright said. “I don’t think anybody’s hiding that. I’m just worried people are going to walk out midseason.”
Baseball had a prolonged midseason strike in 1981 and a devastating strike in 1994 that canceled the World Series for the first time in 90 years. That strike bled into the next season, when owners turned spring training into a farce by fielding teams of replacement players.
The current collective bargaining agreement runs through 2021, and Manfred dismissed concerns about a strike this season.
“It reflects a fundamental misunderstanding of how you conduct good labor relations to have people running around three years before an agreement expires, before there has been one word of negotiation, arguing that there is going to be a strike,” he said.
“I actually have a degree in labor relations. We never learned that tactic. It really is not productive in terms of our business, I don’t think it’s good for our fans, I don’t think it’s good for our players. And I know it’s not going to change the outcome of the negotiations, ultimately.”
For now, Manfred would like to negotiate on-field changes like a 20-second pitch clock, which will be used in spring training games and will most likely be adopted for the regular season. Other changes — such as a three-batter minimum for relief pitchers and the adoption of the designated hitter in the National League — will not be in place this season.
Manfred would rather fans debate those topics — or anything else, really — as long as they don’t dwell on those unsigned free agents.
“I do believe that we have the greatest game in the world,” he said. “Maybe we’re going to make some little changes to make it even better. And I do think once we do get out there and start playing, that positive glow around the game will re-emerge.”
Kevin Armstrong contributed reporting.



Supported by
An exhibition at the Museum of the City of New York — including photographs that have never been published before — shows the pioneering player with his teammates and his family.
BySopan Deb
In 1947 the New York Post sportswriter Jimmy Cannonwrote that Jackie Robinson“is the loneliest man I have ever seen in sports.” Robinson had recently made his debut with the Brooklyn Dodgers — asa 28-year-oldwho had led the charge to racially integrate Major League Baseball.The isolation was real. He endured racist taunts and death threats, in addition to being shunned by some of his teammates.
Yet a new photography exhibition at the Museum of the City of New York —“In the Dugout With Jackie Robinson: An Intimate Portrait of a Baseball Legend”—gives a broader view of Robinson’s life on and off the field. In about30photographs,all taken in either 1949 or 1953and mostly unpublished, he is seen surrounded by teammates and family members. The images were originally shot for Look magazine by the staff photographers Kenneth Eide and Frank Bauman.
The exhibition also has rare memorabilia, like a baseball signed by the 1952 Dodgers and a glove that belonged to Robinson. A home video shows Robinson hitting baseballs to his son, Jackie Jr., and some other neighborhood children in Connecticut.
[On Jackie Robinson’s 100th Birthday, 100 Photos of an Icon]
[Claire Smith: Jackie Robinson Showed Me How to Fight On, Not Fight Back]
[George Vecsey: How Jackie Robinson Changed the Game]
Robinson wasn’t the first black player in the history of Major League Baseball. That distinction belongs toMoses Fleetwood Walker, a catcher for the Toledo Blue Stockings in the American Association in1884.He only played one season because of an injury and soon after, black players were banned. But Robinson’s legacy is unmatched: He not only inspired generations of Americans to pursue baseballbut also helped black football and basketball players gain acceptance in their leagueswhile devoting himself to the civil rights movementbefore his death at the age of 53 in 1972.
Robinson’s special relationship with Look magazine is apparent in the show. He wrote three articles in 1955, including one called “Now I Know Why They Boo Me,” which can be read at the exhibition.Robinson also announced his retirement through Look, instead of at a news conference, an unusual move at the time. The magazine donated its New York archives to the museum in the 1950s, and for years the negatives and contact prints were buried in its basement. Over the last year, Sean Corcoran and Susan Gail Johnson, the exhibition’s curators, combed through hundreds of negatives before finally picking the ones that would be on view for this small yet powerful show.
Robinson is seen at home with his wife, Rachel Robinson, and his son, Jackie Jr. Many of these stills are from 1949, two years after he had entered the major leagues. Another photograph shows Robinson typing, an indication of how much Robinson wanted to be in charge of his own story. The Robinsons married in 1946, just before spring training in Florida, and that same year, Rachel gave birth to Jackie Robinson Jr. He laterdied in a car crashin 1971 at 24.
“It was important to show him as a human being more than just this towering figure in baseball history,” Mr. Corcoran said. “To ground him as a human being with a personal story.”
The exhibition also shows Robinson late in his career, in 1953, seemingly having positive interactions with his teammates, as well as some with Robinson shirtless, which would not have beenpublished at the time.In one of the shirtless photos, Robinson is seentalking toa white teammate in the clubhouse. Museum officials believe he is Carl Furillo,an all-star right fielder.
“His guard is down. This is a completely intimate moment,” Mr. Corcoran said in an interview. “You don’t know what they’re saying, but they’re having some sort of serious but open discussion with each other.”
These photos show Robinson perhaps a bit more at ease than he was as a rookie, partially because at this point, he had shown himself to be one of the best players in the league, which resulted in him being more accepted in thelocker room.
Robinson was an exceptional player. But with that came resentment from opposing teams. Opposing pitchers often threw at his body. (He was hit 72 times in his career.) In his second full year, he led the National League in hit-by-pitches with seven. In seven of his 10 seasons, he was among the top five playershit by opposing pitchers.
Robinson was also a speedster. He led the National League twice in stolen bases — and actually stole home 19 times, which today would beunheard-of.
In the Dugout With Jackie Robinson
Through Sept. 15 at the Museum of the City of New York, 1220 Fifth Avenue, Manhattan; 212-534-1672,mcny.org.
Sopan Deb is a culture reporter, writing about the intersection of politics and culture, among other topics. He covered Donald J. Trump's presidential campaign for CBS News, and his work has appeared on NBC, Al Jazeera America and elsewhere.@sopandeb
Supported by
On Baseball
ByTyler Kepner
Spring training camps open next week, and while Major League Baseball would never say it, the industry badly needs a better season than last year.
There were highlights, to be sure — there always are — but the problems were obvious to all: fewer fans in the seats and more hopeless teams than ever. The malaise has continued deep into the off-season, with more than 100 free agents still unsigned, including the marquee stars Bryce Harper and Manny Machado.
On Wednesday, at least, it was fun to have some on-field news to debate. The commissioner’s office and the players’ association traded proposals last month that could lead to several significant rule changes. The designated hitter might be coming to the National League, although probably not until 2020. Pitchers might be required to face at least three batters. Rosters might be expanded to 26 in the regular season but reduced to a maximum of 28 in September.
Those possibilities and more — reported byThe AthleticandESPN— were confirmed on Wednesday by multiple officials with the league and the union who were not authorized to speak publicly about continuing negotiations. Whatever comes from the proposals, it is nice to see the sides talking, undercutting the perception that a skeptical union was simply freezing out Commissioner Rob Manfred.
“The players are always looking to find ways to streamline the game to make it more competitive and to put a better product for fans on the field,” saidChris Iannetta, the veteran catcher for the Colorado Rockies, in a telephone interview. “What we’re against is making wholesale changes we don’t feel are going to be meaningful.”
There is incentive for the players to engage Manfred, because the collective bargaining agreement, which runs through 2021, gives him the right to unilaterally impose some ideas he proposed last year, including a 20-second pitch clock. But Iannetta, a member of the union’s executive subcommittee, said the players’ primary objective was to create a sport in which more teams actively try to win.
Naturally, when teams shrug at the free-agent market, it manifests itself in salaries below players’ expectations. But the widespread rebuilding phenomenon — or tanking, as some call it — resulted in eight teams with at least 95 losses last season, the most in history. It was no coincidence thatattendancealso dropped by more than three million fans, falling below 70 million for the first time since 2003.
“The numbers are very telling, and I think it’s derived from the competitiveness of the individual teams,” Iannetta said. “There’s teams that can become much more competitive just from tapping into the talent pool that’s available on the free-agent market right now, and not being willing to do that should be alarming to everybody.
“It’s easy to say, ‘We’re going to be the Cubs or the Astros,’ but that’s a very difficult thing to do — and keep in mind the Cubs and Astros used veteran talent to groom those players, and when it was time to win, they significantly added veteran players.”
Both sides offer examples of the wisdom or folly of spending big on free agents. The Boston Red Sox stormed past the luxury-tax threshold — which most teams see as a de facto salary cap — and signed designated hitter J.D. Martinez to a five-year, $110 million contract last February. Martinez hit .330 with 43 homers and led the Red Sox to the World Series title.
But what about the Baltimore Orioles? They signed a free-agent starter, Alex Cobb, to a four-year, $57 million contract last spring, only to watch him go 5-15 with a 4.90 E.R.A. The team set a franchise record for losses, with 115. Cobb was signed as a rotation stabilizer, not a star, but the move signaled the Orioles’ intentions to marginally improve. It turned out to be another cautionary tale.
“Teams used to pay big money for mediocrity, for the average player,” said Steve Phillips, the former Mets general manager and a host on MLB Network Radio. “And now they’re not willing to do that, because you can find close to average with a young guy who’s not going to cost you money.”
Iannetta, in the second season of a two-year, $8.5 million deal, sits squarely in baseball’s middle class. He said the union cares equally about the welfare of all members — from stars to rookies — and said players were frustrated by a system that squeezes out qualified veterans while also keeping elite prospects (think Vladimir Guerrero Jr. of the Toronto Blue Jays) in the minors to manipulate their service time and keep their price low.
As it stands, the worst teams get the best draft picks and the most money to spend on amateur talent. The Astros and the Cubs showed that weathering years of struggle can help lead to sustained success — but, of course, not all rebuilding teams will win big.
In their proposal to the owners, the players have advocated a system that would incentivize winning: lower draft position for perennial losers, better draft position for low-revenue teams that win, and so on.
“One thing that’s going come up in the next few years is: ‘Oh, this is all about dollars and cents; this is all about players being greedy and wanting more,’ and that’s not the case,” Iannetta said. “We play a game our whole lives and we work our butts off, and we want to compete against the best — and when the best isn’t out there on the field, it doesn’t feel right.
“A lot of my colleagues looking for jobs are better than players on rosters right now, and that’s not fair,” he added. “That’s not putting the best product on the field. There’s talent right now that’s not being utilized, for whatever reason. And it’s not fair to the fans that are spending their money, either.”
Phillips, who was Mets’ general manager from 1997 to 2003, said impulsive owners once pushed salaries higher and higher by basing free-agent decisions largely on emotion. Now, he said, more and more owners defer to general managers who rely increasingly on analytics. Players and their agents, perhaps, must recognize and adapt to this new world.
But something seems off when an industry that boasts record revenues suddenly gets smart, all at the same time. The owners would seem to be far too canny to collude against players as they did in the 1980s. But whether it’s groupthink or a flawed system, something needs to change to revive the sport.
After a troubling regular season and another frigid off-season, the players — those with jobs, anyway — will soon return to work. They’ll have a lot on their minds.
“It’s a critical point,” Iannetta said. “We need to really be cognizant of putting the right ideas first and the right values first — and that’s maintaining the competitive nature and the free-market system and going from there.”



Supported by
ByRichard Goldstein
Even into her 90s she called him Daddy. She loved to tell of the 14-room apartment on Manhattan’s Upper West Side where he delighted in trimming the Christmas tree with icicles and how, when she began dating, he made sure she returned home by midnight.
In her later years, she traveled around the baseball map, most notably to the house he had figuratively built, telling of his life beyond the ballpark.
Julia Ruth Stevens, the adopted daughter of Babe Ruth, died on Saturday in an assisted living facility in Henderson, Nev., her son, Tom, said. A Boston Red Sox fan in her later years but always having a warm spot for the Yankees, she was 102.
She was born in Athens, Ga., on July 7, 1916, to Claire Hodgson, a teenage beauty, and her husband, Frank, who was many years his wife’s senior. They separated when Julia was a baby, and Ms. Hodgson went with her to New York and found work as an illustrator’s model.
Ms. Hodgson met Ruth in 1923, when he had become a prodigious home run hitter, three years after being sold to the Yankees by the Red Sox, for whom he had been a star pitcher.
“I have this vague image of this huge man, who was really nice, coming to visit Mother, and he’d pick me up and set me on his lap and ask me little questions about how I was,” Mrs. Stevens told The Arizona Republic in 2001. “If Mother and I went out with him, people just crowded around.”
Ruth already had a wife, but they were estranged. He had married Helen Woodford when he was a Red Sox rookie, and they had a daughter, Dorothy. The Ruths separated in 1925, and Helen moved to suburban Boston. She died in a house fire in January 1929 while Dorothy was at boarding school.
Ruth married Claire Hodgson on opening day of the 1929 baseball season. He adopted Julia, and Claire adopted Dorothy in 1930, and they all lived together, with Claire’s extended family, in an apartment on West 88th Street.
Mrs. Stevens remembered her childhood as a happy time. The Babe took her bowling, and as a teenager she would go with her parents to theVanderbilt Hotel, which had an orchestra and a dance floor. “He taught me how to dance, and I would really much prefer dancing with Daddy than with any of my dates,” she once recalled.
When Ruth visited Japan with a major league all-star team in 1934, Julia and Claire came along. Dorothy stayed home, and years later she maintained that her stepmother had given Julia favored treatment.
“I was excess baggage,” Dorothy Ruth Pirone said in her 1988 memoir, “My Dad, the Babe,” written with Chris Martens. “Raising me was a burdensome job, like a stack of unexpected paperwork dropped in her lap.”
And she offered a revelation. She said that in 1980, the former Juanita Jennings, a longtime friend of the Ruth family, told her two weeks before her death that she was her biological mother, having had an affair with Ruth, who then persuaded her to give the baby to Helen.
Claire Hodgson Ruthdied in 1976and Mrs. Pirone died in 1989. Mrs. Stevens ultimately became the spokeswoman for the Ruth family.
She was at Yankee Stadium in May 1998 for the unveiling of a postage stamp portraying Ruth admiring one of his home run drives. That August, she threw out the first pitch at a Red Sox game in Fenway Park at ceremonies marking the 50th anniversary of Ruth’s death.
She was at Fenway Park in October 1999 to toss the first pitch before the decisive Game 5 of the American League Championship Series. Having lived for many years in Conway, N.H., she had become a Red Sox fan.
“I went to see the Red Sox beat the Yankees tonight,” she said.
As for the so-called Curse of the Bambino, arising from Ruth’s sale to the Yankees, she said at the time: “Mostly I think it’s a myth. But it is a coincidence definitely that there’s been many, many, many years since the Red Sox managed to win a World Series.”
The Red Sox lost to the Yankees in that 1999 postseason, but they ended an 86-year drought in 2004 by beating the Yankees in the American League Championship Series and winning the World Series, defeating the St. Louis Cardinals.
Mrs. Stevens made occasional appearances at major league ballparks until she was 100, although she had become legally blind from macular degeneration.
When the Yankees played their last game at the old Stadium, the House That Ruth Built, in September 2008, she threw out the first pitch. And she threw out the first ball at a Red Sox game at Fenway Park on July 10, 2016, to mark her 100th birthday three days earlier.
In July 2014, the 100th anniversary of Ruth’s major league debut as a pitcher for the Red Sox, Mrs. Stevens told The Los Angeles Times, “I miss him even to this day.”
“But his spirit seems to hover over the baseball field,” she said.
Interviewed by Golf.com in March 2015, Mrs. Stevens remembered Ruth’s passion for golf — how it gave him pleasure, especially in the 1930s, when he had become discouraged by the failure of his quest to become a baseball manager.
She told how he would often awaken her at dawn, cook fried bologna and egg sandwiches for both of them, and then head for a day of golf at St. Albans Country Club in Queens.
“Baseball broke his heart, but golf kept him going,” she said.
Mrs. Stevens’s first husband, Richard Flanders, who died in 1949, operated a New Hampshire ski lodge. She later operated a general store in Eaton Center, N.H. Her marriage to her second husband, Grant Meloon, ended in divorce. She operated a New Hampshire poultry farm with her third husband, Brent Stevens, to whom she was married for 49 years, and later worked in retail managerial jobs and occasionally received small amounts of money from companies that used Ruth’s image.
But in 1984, the Indianapolis-based CMG Worldwide began representing the Ruth estate as its exclusive marketing agent. Mrs. Stevens told Bloomberg News in 1998 that she was receiving more than $80,000 a year in royalties through deals arranged by CMG.
In addition to her son, from her third marriage, Mrs. Stevens is survived by two grandchildren and four great-grandchildren.
On the 50th anniversary of Ruth’s death, she was asked why her father had endured as an American hero.
“I think probably because he was so close to the people, to his fans,” Mrs. Stevens told NBC. “They always, naturally, never called him Mr. Ruth. It was always, ‘Hi ya, Babe.’ It was just like saying hi to a friend.”
An earlier version of this obituary referred incorrectly to Mrs. Stevens’s son, Tom. He is her son from her third marriage, to Brent Stevens — not her second, to Grant Meloon. And an earlier version of a picture caption with this obituary misidentified the game and championship series at which Mrs. Stevens was shown throwing out the first pitch at Fenway Park in Boston. As the obituary notes, it was the fifth game of the 1999 American League Championship Series — not the 1998 American Championship League Series.
Supported by
ByGeorge Vecsey
This happened at Shea Stadium a few decades ago: My son and I were in a half-empty section, not far from two older black men.
One of the Mets made a clodhopper move on the bases, and was tagged out.
One of the two fans then turned to the other and said, “Jackie Robinson wouldn’t have done that.” I chortled, and we struck up a conversation, having the burning image of Jackie Robinson very much in common.
Jackie Robinson hovered over that game, and he has hovered over every game that has been played since April 15, 1947, when he made his major-league debut.
He upgraded the game, and he upgraded my Brooklyn Dodgers, and he upgraded life in America in his 10 years in the major leagues and in his short but active career out in the Real World, pushing for opportunities for black people in all businesses.
He raised the consciousness of Americans, whether they wanted it or not, and that is good reason to honor him on the100th anniversary of his birth.
[On Jackie Robinson’s 100th Birthday, 100 Photos of an Icon]
[Claire Smith: Jackie Robinson Showed Me How to Fight On, Not Fight Back]
He was a hero in my family. I met him once, under the stands in Ebbets Field, in a hot dog line, during a game in 1954 when he wasn’t playing. We asked him how his injury was, and he answered a couple of teenagers with politeness. (I was shocked to see his gray hair and thickening midsection. He seemed old before his time. The stress seemed to have aged him.)
I also interviewed him once on the phone, around 1966, when I was doing a story on the absence of black coaches and managers in baseball.
When I called for the prearranged interview, he turned the theme around, asking how many black journalists were in the sports department where I worked. Umm, none, I said, thereby touching off a monologue on lack of opportunity everywhere. That’s what I’m talking about, he said. I consider the lecture a highlight of my career.
Decades later, I told his widow, Rachel Robinson, about our testy interview.
“That sounds like Jack,” she said, with her Mona Lisa smile.
The world was not paying attention when Jack Roosevelt Robinson was born on Jan. 31, 1919, in Cairo, Ga. Back east we began learning about him in 1945, when Branch Rickey signed him to a contract with the Brooklyn organization.
His presence in Dodger camp in 1946 was a big deal in my family’s home in Queens County, just east of the mother ship — that is to say, Brooklyn. We were Dodgers fans and my parents were also 1930s lefties who adored Franklin Delano Roosevelt and who regarded two other African-Americans, Marian Anderson and Paul Robeson, as icons, both for their singing talent and for their dignity.
Not all Dodgers fans came from our sociopolitical point of view, of course, but Jackie Robinson was on all Dodgers fans’ minds as he trained with dubious white teammates in 1946 and then succeeded at the top farm club in Montreal that season.
The next year, the phone rang in our house on April 10. My dad was calling from his newspaper office and he had momentous news to relay: The Dodgers had signed Jackie Robinson to a major league contract and he would make his debut on Opening Day, five days later. I was almost 8; I can remember the exhilaration.
And if working-class white folks like us were enthused, it was even more personal for black folks, when there was finally a ballplayer who looked like them.
Ed Charles, the poet-third baseman of the 1969 Mets, who died a year ago, often talked about being a youth in Florida in the late 1940s, watching the touring Dodgers departing by railroad after an exhibition, watching Jackie Robinson play cards with his white teammates.
The Dodgers won the pennant in 1947, Robinson’s first season, and just as important, they gave Brooklyn fans the lifelong certainty that our team was The Good Guys.
And what began for everyone in 1947 was a decade of Jackie Robinson on the field, running the bases pigeon-toed, a big man, a former tailback with adult weight on him, starting to take out infielders with a hard slide, starting to jaw at umpires, learning four new positions to help the Dodgers, bringing his burning audacity to the majors.
For a while, he wore the shackles of docility, to which he had committed, but on the field he was allowed to compete, fair and square. With bat. With glove. With feet. With head.
Black sports fans now had a new hero, excelling blatantly, in mixed company. That was something to sing about.
Sure enough, in 1949, Buddy Johnson (Woodrow Wilson Johnson, for the record) wrote and recorded a song called “Did You See Jackie Robinson Hit That Ball?” It was soon covered by the great band of Count Basie.
Did you see Jackie Robinson hit that ball? Did he hit it? Yeah, and that ain’t all. He stole home. Yes, yes, Jackie’s real gone.
Because of Robinson some Americans were lifted up from our stodginess and were able to appreciate a gifted athlete and a driven human being, excelling where no player of color had been allowed since the 19th Century.
Robinson’s style even spread around baseball as black players proliferated: Larry Doby, Roy Campanella, Don Newcombe, Monte Irvin, and in 1951 a wonder-man named Willie Mays, and then Frank Robinson and Henry Aaron and Ernie Banks and Roberto Clemente, all of whom made the National League the powerhouse for the next generation.
Perhaps, too, Jackie Robinson served as an example for a series ofbegats.James Baldwin. Nina Simone. Malcolm X. Rosa Parks. Martin Luther King Jr. Muhammad Ali. Chuck Berry. John Lewis. Dick Gregory. Harry Belafonte. Harry Edwards. Jim Brown. Bob Gibson. Reggie Jackson. Bill Russell. Shirley Chisholm. Barack Obama. Michelle Robinson Obama.
In 2008, I asked Rachel Robinson what her husband would have thought of the Obama candidacy.
“That is a political question, George,” she said, smiling. “And we don’t talk about politics.”
Her husband had been overcome by diabetes in retirement, and was clearly failing during the 1972 World Series, when he was introduced to Joe Morgan, the thoughtful young star of the Cincinnati Reds. Morgan was thrilled, but also stunned, to see Robinson, the man who danced off third base, now white-haired and shaky and going blind. Jackie Robinson died a few weeks later, at the age of 53.
Thirty-five years later, Morgan, a Hall of Fame member and broadcaster, was at a celebration of the Jackie Robinson Foundation. (Morgan calls Rachel Robinson “The Queen Mother.”)
I stood with Morgan and Willie Randolph, who grew up in Brooklyn, as we watched old game films of a sleek, fleet tailback for U.C.L.A. in 1939 and 1940, going wide, faking tacklers onto the ground.
Did we see Jackie Robinson carry the ball?
We exchanged high-fives at his audacity.



Supported by
ByTyler Kepner
PORT CHARLOTTE, Fla. — In a tangible sign of cooperation between the commissioner’s office and a skeptical players’ association, Major League Baseball and the union announced several rule changes on Thursday that will affect the trading deadline, the All-Star Game, roster size and on-field strategy.
The rules — some of which will not be implemented until 2020 — demonstrate that, after another winter in which many veteran free agents lingered for months on a sluggish open market, the league and the players were willing to modify their current collective bargaining agreement even though it does not expire until after the 2021 season.
“It’s just good to see both sides are working together,” said infielder Matt Duffy, the union representative for the Tampa Bay Rays. “It’s good when you have cooperation on both sides of an industry. I think that creates a healthy atmosphere for the industry and the game to thrive.”
For the players, the changes are largely a prelude to a more complicated renegotiation of the financial aspects of the C.B.A., which the sides have agreed to discuss. But they will result in immediate differences to the sport this season, including a single trading deadline on July 31.
[Read more:As Baseball Debates Its Rules, Players Suggest Trying Harder to Win]
That rule eliminates the archaic and somewhat confusing process of trade waivers, which for years had created a second summer trading period. Players can still be placed and claimed on outright waivers after July 31, according to the new rule, but cannot be traded after that date.
The league also overhauled the selection process for the All-Star Game starters and added a $2.5 million pool of bonus money for thehome run derby, including $1 million for the winner. That might not be enough to motivate highly paid stars to take part, but for many young players, $1 million would dwarf their annual salary.
“I just got engaged to be married,” saidPete Alonso, a slugging Mets prospect who would earn the $555,000 minimum if he makes the team. “So that would definitely pay for the wedding costs.”
The All-Star starters (non-pitchers) will be selected in two phases: a primary round and a designated “Election Day.” In the first round, fans will vote for the starters at each position, as they have for many years. Then, on a day in late June or early July, fans will vote again, choosing from the top three vote-getters at each position in the initial round (or the top nine for outfielders).
Players will receive bonuses for finishing among the top vote-getters at their position, and the bonus pool for players on the winning team will increase. If the All-Star Game goes to extra innings, each inning beyond the ninth will begin with a runner on second base, with players allowed to re-enter the game as pinch-runners.
Other changes for this season further Commissioner Rob Manfred’s goal of speeding up the pace of play. Theaverage nine-inning gametook three hours last season, down by five minutes from 2017 but still 14 minutes longer than the average game in 2005.
Pace-of-play rules for 2019 will not include a pitch clock but will include a reduction in mound visits, from six to five, and in the time between innings. While the change remains to be reviewed with the holders of broadcast rights, those breaks would be reduced to two minutes for all regular-season games, from 2 minutes 5 seconds for local telecasts and 2:20 for national telecasts.
The more significant changes will begin in 2020. Rosters will increase by one slot, to 26 players, through the end of August. In September, though, the maximum roster size will be reduced to 28, from 40.
“September games are a little outrageous at times, especially when you get two teams that are really competing for a postseason spot,” Duffy said. “They want to give themselves the best chance to win a game, and if that means bringing in five or six relievers in one inning, they’ve got them down there, why not use them? I think you’re going to see a little more realistic games in September.”
He added, “And the reality is, to have 80 percent of your season be decided in a certain way and then all of a sudden in the most important games, everything flips completely — that’s a little weird, too.”
Teams will have a limit, still to be determined, on the number of pitchers allowed on the active roster — and all pitchers will have to pitch to a minimum of three batters, or to the end of a half-inning. Yankees reliever Zack Britton said players were conflicted on that rule, which M.L.B. will impose on its own with the union agreeing to not challenge it.
“It changes strategy, for sure,” Britton said. “I think nowadays there’s not as many specialized pitchers that are just righty or just lefty. But obviously, if there are guys out there, it limits their role and job opportunity.”
Then again, Britton said, the addition of a 26th roster spot effectively creates another job for the union.
“Adding one guy to the roster the whole year adds a bunch of players that are going to get to arbitration sooner or hit free agency sooner,” Britton said. “It allows you to give some of your players some days off, especially adding a position player or bench guy.”
Many people in baseball had assumed the 26th man would be part of the last collective bargaining agreement, which went into effect before the 2017 season. For the Kansas City Royals, a team that relies more on speed than other teams, the extra spot would make it easier to put a pinch-runner on the roster.
“For example, we’re going to carryTerrance Goreto start the season, for sure,” General Manager Dayton Moore said last week, referring to a player with one career hit but 32 stolen bases, including the postseason. “Although Terrance has made a lot of strides as somebody who could potentially be utilized as an extra outfielder, you’d feel a lot better about that if there was a 26th man.”
The changes for 2020 also include restrictions on position players pitching, limiting those appearances to extra innings or games in which the pitcher’s team trails (or leads) by at least six runs. The injured list for pitchers will also be returned to 15 days, from 10, as it has been for all players since 2017.
Kevin Armstrong contributed reporting from Port St. Lucie, Fla., and James Wagner from Tampa, Fla.


Supported by
ByRichard Goldstein
Frank Robinson, the Hall of Fame outfielder who hit 586 home runs and became a racial pioneer as the first black manager in the major leagues, nearly three decades after Jackie Robinson broke modern baseball’s color barrier playing for the Brooklyn Dodgers, died on Thursday at his home in Los Angeles. He was 83.
Major League Baseball announced the death but did not specify the cause.The Baltimore Sunrecently reported that Robinson was in the late stages of a long illness.
Playing for 21 seasons, mostly with the Cincinnati Reds and the Baltimore Orioles, Robinson was the only winner of the Most Valuable Player Award in both the National and American Leagues.
He was an intense and often intimidating presence, leaning over the plate from his right-handed stance, daring pitchers to hit him (which they did, 198 times), then retaliating with long drives, “pounding pitchers with fine impartiality,” as the baseball writer Roger Kahn once wrote. He broke up double plays with fearsome slides.
As a player, Robinson insisted that teammates match his own will to win. As a manager, he had little patience with lack of hustle.
Robinson won baseball’s batting triple crown in 1966, hitting 49 home runs, driving in 122 runs and batting .316 in his first season with the Orioles and helping the team capture a World Series championship for the first time in franchise history.
He batted at least .300 in nine different seasons, had 2,943 career hits, drove in 1,812 runs and played on five pennant-winning teams. He was elected to theBaseball Hall of Famein 1982, his first time on the ballot.
Robinson made his debut as the majors’ first black manager with the Cleveland Indians on April 8, 1975, 28 years after Jackie Robinson (no relation) first took the field with the Dodgers. Rachel Robinson, Jackie Robinson’s widow, threw out the ceremonial first ball.
Frank Robinson, who was still an active player, punctuated the historic occasion by hitting a home run in his first at-bat, as the designated hitter, leading the Indians to a 5-3 victory over the Yankees.
He managed for all or parts of 16 seasons, with the Indians (1975-77), the San Francisco Giants (1981-84), the Orioles (1988-91), the Montreal Expos (2002-04) and their successor franchise, the Washington Nationals (2005-06). He never managed a pennant winner, but the Baseball Writers Association of America named him the American League manager of the year in 1989, when his Orioles finished second in the East Division, two games behind the Toronto Blue Jays.
“He had great, great baseball instincts and tremendous physical attributes that allowed him to do everything right on a ball field,” the former Orioles managerEarl Weaverwrote in his memoir, “It’s What You Learn After You Know It All That Counts” (1982).
As Weaver put it: “He never griped and he was always willing to counsel any younger players who sought his advice. At times I know he counseled a few who didn’t seek him out when he heard them complaining. ‘That’s enough!’ he’d holler. ‘Don’t rock the boat.’ ”
The Orioles’ Hall of Fame pitcher Jim Palmer told Baseball Digest in 2006 that Robinson’s arrival in Baltimore via a trade with Cincinnati had kindled the franchise’s resurgence. “If Frank saw something, Frank was going to say something,” Palmer said. “When he came over here, he was the leader. He was the guy. He made us all better.”
Another of the Orioles’ leading pitchers of that time, Dave McNally, was quoted in John Eisenberg’s oral history of the team, “From 33rdStreet to Camden Yards” (2000): “As good as Frank was, it was how hard he played that really made an impact. The intensity the man had was really incredible.”
Frank Robinson was born on Aug. 31, 1935, in Beaumont, Tex., and grew up in Oakland, Calif., the youngest of 10 children. He played baseball at McClymonds High School in Oakland, where he was a basketball teammate of Bill Russell’s. He signed with the Reds’ organization in 1953 and made his major league debut as Cincinnati’s left fielder three years later.
In that season he hit 38 home runs in a lineup laden with power hitters likeTed Kluszewski,Wally PostandGus Bell, and was named Rookie of the Year.
Robinson went on to hit 37 homers, drive in 124 runs and bat .323 for the Reds’ 1961 pennant-winners, and he was named the National League’s Most Valuable Player that year. He remained a formidable figure at the plate for Cincinnati through the mid-’60s.
Robinson described his approach at bat in his memoir “Extra Innings” (1988), written with Berry Stainback.
“I was as aggressive at the plate as I was on the basepaths and in the outfield,” he wrote. “I stood as close to the plate as I could and stuck my head out over it so that I could get the best possible view of the ball when it left the pitcher’s hand and so that I could protect the outside corner. If pitchers jammed me, my wrists were quick enough to get around on the pitch.”
In what became one of baseball’s most one-sided deals, the Reds traded Robinson to the Orioles after the 1965 season. Cincinnati received pitcherMilt Pappasand two other players, none destined to make much impact.Bill DeWitt, the Reds’ general manager, was quoted as saying that Robinson was “an old 30,” suggesting that he was past his prime.
But Robinson was named M.V.P. for the American League and M.V.P. for the World Series in 1966, when the Orioles swept the Los Angeles Dodgers with a lineup also including Boog Powell at first base, Davey Johnson at second and the future Hall of Famer Brooks Robinson at third.
The Orioles also had a superb pitching staff led by McNally, Palmer, Wally Bunker andSteve Barber. Robinson hit two home runs in that Series, both off Don Drysdale, the first in Game 1 and the second in the Series-clinching Game 4, a 1-0 Baltimore victory.
In his six seasons with the Orioles, he helped lead the team to four pennants and two World Series championships.
On June 26, 1970, Robinson hit two consecutive grand slams for the Orioles against the second Washington Senators franchise at RFK Stadium.
Before managing the Indians, Robinson had been the first African-American manager of an integrated professional team outside organized baseball’s structure — Santurce of the Puerto Rican winter league. He held the post for several seasons, beginning in 1968-69, to gain experience toward becoming a major league manager.
“The black players thought I was getting on them more than the white players,” The New York Times quoted him as saying while he was in that post. “But it was always said in a joking way.”
Robinson was traded by the Orioles to the Los Angeles Dodgers after the 1971 season and later played with the California Angels and briefly with the Indians. After being named manager, he continued to play as a designated hitter.
When the Indians announced in October 1974 that Robinson would become their manager, a milestone event in baseball’s race relations, he received a congratulatory telegram from President Gerald R. Ford.
“I don’t think I was hired because I was black,” Robinson said. “I hope not. I think I’ve been hired because of my ability.”
He added, “The only wish I could have is that Jackie Robinson could be here today to see this happen.”
Jackie Robinson had urged the hiring of a black manager in the majors when he threw out the ceremonial first ball at Game 2 of the 1972 World Series. He died later that October at age 53.
When Frank Robinson lined up with his team in front of the Indians’ dugout at their 1975 season opener before a crowd of 56,204 at Cleveland Municipal Stadium, he received a resounding ovation.
“One hundred thousand fans could not have been louder,” he recalled in his memoir. “It was the biggest ovation I ever received, and it almost brought tears to my eyes. After all the years of waiting to become a big league manager — ignored because so many team owners felt that fans would not accept a black manager — I was on the job and people were loudly pleased.”
The Indians had been a losing team for years, and Robinson’s ball clubs finished fourth in the American League East in 1975 and 1976. After a 26-31 start in 1977, he was fired.
Reporters asked if he thought race had anything to do with his dismissal. “If race was a factor,” he told Mr. Kahn for a column in The Times, “I’m not aware of it. I never heard a serious remark about race. I never heard secondhand of anyone making a remark. I have no bitterness about Cleveland. I did the best I could.”
When Robinson returned to the managing ranks with the 1981 Giants, the path he pioneered had been followed by two others.Larry Doby, who became the first black player in the American League with the 1947 Indians, was named manager of the Chicago White Sox in 1978. Maury Wills, best known for starring with the Los Angeles Dodgers, was named the Seattle Mariners’ manager in 1980.
After finding modest success managing the Giants and the Orioles, Robinson twice had winning records with an Expos franchise that had been taken over by Major League Baseball and allowed only a relatively meager payroll. After managing the Washington Nationals for two seasons, Robinson held administrative posts in the baseball commissioner’s office under Bud Selig and later Rob Manfred.
President George W. Bush presented Robinson with the Presidential Medal of Freedom, the nation’s highest civilian award, at a White House ceremony in 2005, citing him for “extraordinary achievements as a baseball player and manager and for setting a lasting example of character in athletics.”
The Orioles, Reds and Indians have erected statues of Robinson at their stadiums.
Robinson’s wife was Barbara Ann Cole. They had a son, Frank Kevin, and a daughter, Nichelle. Information on his survivors was not immediately available.
Robinson entered the Hall of Fame together with Hank Aaron, baseball’s home run king at the time. Rachel Robinson attended the ceremony, and she was asked about her husband’s legacy in leading the way for the game’s first generation of great black players.
“Jackie would not want to upstage them,” she said. “But they represent the epitome of what Jackie wanted: excellence.”
An earlier version of this obituary misidentified, at one point, the last team that Robinson managed. It was the Washington Nationals, not the Washington Senators.
An earlier version of this obituary misspelled the given name of an author who collaborated with Robinson on a memoir. He was Berry Stainback, not Barry.
An earlier version of this obituary misstated when Robinson was traded by the Baltimore Orioles to the Los Angeles Dodgers. It was after the 1971 season, not before. The earlier version also misstated when Larry Doby, who like Robinson went on to be a manager, became the first black player in the American League. It was 1947, not 1948.
Supported by
ByJillian RayfieldandMarcus Payadue
(Want to get this briefing by email? Here’sthe sign-up.)
Good evening. Here’s the latest.
1. President Trump doubled downon his surprise decision to try to scrap the entire Affordable Care Act. “If the Supreme Court rules that Obamacare is out, we’ll have a plan that is far better than Obamacare,” he said.
Our reporters reconstructed how Mr. Trump came to his decision.
They describea heated meeting in the White Houseon Monday, in which Mick Mulvaney, Mr. Trump’s acting chief of staff, pressed the president to keep his campaign promises to upend the law and urged him, along with other officials, to try to seize control of the health care issue from Democrats.
Vice President Mike Pence and Pat Cipollone, the White House counsel, were among those who objected. Mr. Cipollone continued arguing in a smaller meeting, but Mr. Mulvaney, pictured above at the White House today, prevailed.
_____
2. A day of scrutiny for aviation.
In hearings on Capitol Hill, the F.A.A.’s acting administrator, Daniel Elwell, and the transportation secretary, Elaine Chao, were pressed about the cozy relationship between the F.A.A. and companies it regulates, like Boeing.
“Let me emphasize that safety is always No. 1 at the Department of Transportation, and a good day is when nothing bad happens,” Ms. Chao said.
Meanwhile, Boeing appeared to acknowledge for the first time that its software played a role in two fatal crashes of its 737 Max 8, and said a fix for the system was nearly ready.
_____
3. The path to Brexit took another turn.
Prime Minister Theresa Maysaid she would step downif Britain’s Parliament approved her beleaguered plan. Mrs. May, pictured above leaving Downing Street today, did not say when.
She made the offer just before lawmakers in Parliament began voting on alternative plans.
Turmoil in the British government was not limited to that process:Officials are defendingspending almost $16 million on a penthouse for a diplomat in New York.
_____
4.India shot down a low-orbit satellitewith a ballistic missile,Prime Minister Narendra Modi said.
If confirmed, the feat means India could essentially blind another country by taking out its space-based communication and surveillance satellites. The ability could potentially destabilize the relationship between India and Pakistan, two nuclear powers that already faced a brief period of hostilities last month.
It would also put India in a small club of countries with such strategic power, which includes China, the U.S. and Russia.
Some in India were suspicious about the timing of Mr. Modi’s announcement, shortly before general elections.
_____
5. “The story is bizarre from beginning to end.”
That was the Chicago mystery novelist Sara Paretsky, commenting on the Jussie Smollett case.
Our bureau chief writes that the city, riven by race, class, violence and secrecy, was the ideal setting for the saga, which ended with the mayor, the prosecutor and Mr. Smollettall insisting on different narratives for what occurred.
P.S.: Prosecutors noted Mr. Smollett’s community service work in explaining why they dropped the charges on Tuesday.That work included two daysat the Rev. Jesse L. Jackson’s civil rights organization.
_____
6. Eating pot browniesand other “edibles” like gummy bearsmay be riskier thansmoking or vaping, potentially adding new obstacles to the bumpy process of state legalization.
According to an analysis of emergency room visits in Colorado, edibles created a disproportionate number of marijuana-related medical crises.
Doctors involved with the study explained that ingesting pot takes longer to produce a high than smoking it, so some people have trouble gauging if they’ve taken too much. “This is a common phenomenon. People take another dose,” said one doctor.
_____
7. It’s baseball eve.
Ahead of the new season,our special section looks back50 years at what became known as the Mets miracle: The 1969 Mets, above, suddenly developed into a team to be reckoned with, winning the World Series after seven years of being a baseball punch line.
Looking ahead, the major leagues’ opening day is tomorrow, kicking off a seasonthat our columnist says will be stuffed to the seams with players.By one count, a record 1,379 players appeared in a major league game last season, the sixth year in a row with an increase. This reflects a pool of prospects “that is bigger — and cheaper — than ever,” our columnist writes.
_____
8. The “Nobel Prize of computing”went to three researchers whose work undergirds the revolution in artificial intelligence, from face-recognition services and smart speakers to warehouse robots and self-driving cars.
Yann LeCun, Geoffrey Hinton and Yoshua Bengio, above,won the Turing Awardfor their work on neural networks. Loosely modeled on the web of neurons in the human brain, these mathematical systems enable machine learning by analyzing vast amounts of data.
Players in the tech world seized on the story, sharing it on their own vast network of websites and social media and driving it to near the top of our list of most-reads.
_____
9. What else you’re reading.
Also on our list of most-read stories today:a mystery from Scotland. Since the 1950s, hundreds of dogs have thrown themselves off a bridge in Dumbarton, above. Some have died.
In a country well acquainted with myth and superstition, the “dog-suicide bridge” has invited paranormal explanations.
“I’m convinced it’s a ghost that is behind all of this,” said a teacher who wrote a book about it.
One more:Our look atwhy people procrastinate. (It isn’t about laziness or self-control, but rather mood management.)
_____
10. Finally, traveling safe while female.
Readers responded to our article this week aboutthe dangers women facewhile traveling alone, withan outpouring of suggestions.
Women, some of whom have traveled to dozens or scores of countries, affirmed their love of solo adventure. They said they pack their own doorstops, tip the hotel staff at the start of their stays, make friends with older vendors and listen to their guts.
And they enjoy themselves.
Have a delightful evening.
Your Evening Briefing is posted at 6 p.m. Eastern.
And don’t miss Your Morning Briefing.Sign up hereto get it by email in the Australian, Asian, European or American morning.
Want to catch up on past briefings?You can browse them here.
What did you like? What do you want to see here? Let us know atbriefing@nytimes.com.
Supported by
Vows
ByVincent M. Mallozzi
Six months into their budding relationship, Peter Travers sat beside Caroline Walradt on a sofa at her home in South Brunswick, N.J. “I have something to say to you,” Mr. Travers, a father of four who was going through a divorce, announced on that spring day in 2014.
Ms. Walradt, a widow whose friendship with Mr. Travers seemed to be turning a romantic corner, was fixed on his every word.
“Peter had turned toward me in a very serious manner,” she recalled. “So I’m sitting there and thinking to myself, ‘Oh wow, what could this be.’”
When his intense stare gave way to a soft smile, Ms. Walradt began to wonder if Mr. Travers might be poised to use the “L word,” which had not yet come up in conversation.
He soon delivered a pitch she was not expecting. “Do you ever think,” he whispered, “that you could come to love baseball?”
Ms. Walradt, now 64, and Mr. Travers, 63, laughed as they recalled that wacky moment, one of many fond memories shared in what she described as “this miraculous second chance at love that both of us have been blessed with.”
Their road to each other, a 17-year stretch paved with friendship, mutual respect and patience, began in July 2002, when Ms. Walradt’s family moved to West Windsor, N.J., from Hong Kong shortly after her husband, Ron Walradt, an international banker with Citibank, was transferred to Manhattan.
The Walradts and their two young children, Jessica, then 14, and Trent, 11, soon became parishioners at All Saints’ Church in Princeton, N.J., where Mr. Travers was entrenched as a member of its vestry.
“I remember when they first came to the church, they seemed like such a great family,” said Mr. Travers, the managing member of Chase Field, an investment firm in Princeton. (He was previously an investment banker at Goldman Sachs, and before that a lawyer at Sullivan & Cromwell, both in New York.)
“As a matter of fact I remember meeting Caroline’s husband,” Mr. Travers said. “He seemed like a real nice fellow.”
Four months after arriving at their new address, the Walradts were still unpacking boxes when they received devastating news: Ron Walradt had cancer.
“My husband apparently had cancer for a while,” Ms. Walradt said. “We just didn’t know it.”
When he died in January 2003, their world went dark.
“It was all very sudden, and very tough on the kids, who were extremely close to their dad,” Ms. Walradt said. “All three of us felt so alone, and we didn’t have any family around to lean on for support.”
Ms. Walradt, now a second-grade teacher at Princeton Academy of the Sacred Heart, an all-boys school for students from kindergarten through eighth grade, began leaning heavily on her Episcopal faith, becoming more involved at All Saints’ Church.
“When I heard that Caroline’s husband had passed away, I remember thinking, ‘Oh, what a terrible thing,’” Mr. Travers said. “I think our entire community felt the same way.”
In June 2013, Mr. Travers first came to notice Ms. Walradt as something more than a longtime church acquaintance after a fund-raiser at a Princeton bar, where they chatted, albeit briefly.
The following month, she made a huge impression on him at a thank-you dinner party he hosted for volunteers after a seven-day, five-state cycling fund-raiser. During that dinner, they spoke at length, learning a great deal about each other, including the fact that they were the children of career military men, and had traveled extensively around the globe with their now-deceased parents.
“Peter seated me right next to him at the dinner table, and we spent a few hours getting to know each other a bit,” Ms. Walradt said. “I liked him right away, I thought he was sweet and smart and very handsome, and the way he was using playful language around me got me thinking that perhaps he had an interest in me, though I wasn’t sure.”
Among the many places where Ms. Walradt and Mr. Travers lived was Tehran, and both were there during the same window of time in 1973, overlapping by a handful of days. Though they had many mutual friends, they had never met.
Mr. Travers, who had gone to 14 different schools by the time he reached ninth grade, graduated from the University of California, Berkeley, and received a joint law degree and M.B.A. from Columbia. Ms. Walradt graduated from the University of Virginia and received an M.B.A. from the Thunderbird School of Global Management in Glendale, Ariz.
Their commonality included a combined four cats. Sophie and Jasper, who belong to Ms. Walradt, and Red Cloud and Geronimo, who belong to Mr. Travers, would also eventually meet at their church during a blessing ceremony for the pets of parishioners.
Since that dinner, Mr. Travers said, “the thought of possibly getting together with Caroline had been running around in the back of my mind. But I didn’t know if she had an interest in me, or if there was anyone else in her life, and to be honest, I was just coming out of a very terrible situation in terms of my marriage failing, and was really running around in a fog.”
In October 2013, Ms. Walradt took the initiative to organize a relief project sponsored by All Saints’ Church to support an Episcopal parish in Toms River, N.J., after Hurricane Sandy had devastated that community.
“Those people needed a break from all of their grief,” said Ms. Walradt, who had become head of the church’s outreach committee. “We brought them cooked meals and had games and prizes and even a jazz band for entertainment. We basically threw them a party.”
Ms. Walradt had enlisted the help of Mr. Travers, who brought Champagne, wine and beer, and at Ms. Walradt’s request, a ham, and began carving it while dressed in a butcher’s apron wrapped around a suit and bow tie.
He was later uncorking a bottle of wine when the Rev. Dr. Hugh E. Brown III, the All Saints’ rector, picked up a microphone and began thanking the people who had helped organize the event. In praising Ms. Walradt, he mentioned that she had been “widowed unexpectedly,” prompting a parishioner from Toms River to say to Mr. Travers. “You mean to tell me that woman is not married?”
Mr. Travers said he spent the remainder of the evening in “observatory mode,” unable to slow down the thought of getting together with Ms. Walradt. “As I’m standing there watching Caroline bounce around, helping one person after another, it occurred to me what a really fine human being she was,” Mr. Travers said. “She was just a good-hearted, energetic person who genuinely cared about people, and I admired that.”
The fog was beginning to lift, and three weeks later, on Halloween, Ms. Walradt and Mr. Travers went on their first official date, to see a play at Princeton’s McCarter Theater.
“Here was this wonderful person that I had known for years,” said Mr. Travers, who had been separated from his wife for a year and a half before he began dating Ms. Walradt. “I was sort of remembering that there was a world out there, and I was trying to get my house in order and finish my divorce to basically be in the frame of mind to be able to pay attention to someone like Caroline.” (His divorce did not become official until earlier this year.)
They began dating steadily and would soon enjoy many shared passions, including a love of travel, and have since visited Paris (twice), England and Switzerland. While Ms. Walradt has not become the kind of baseball fan that Mr. Travers had hoped for, she doesn’t mind taking in an occasional game. “Being together, that’s what makes watching baseball, or doing anything else, so much more enjoyable,” she said.
They were married March 23 at All Saints’ before Reverend Brown, a choir and 230 guests, including Jonathan Ivey-Oladeji and Colby Hartpence, a pair of 8-year-olds who are students of Ms. Walradt’s at the Princeton Academy of the Sacred Heart.
“She’s our favorite teacher, she’s awesome,” said Jonathan, as Colby nodded in agreement before adding, “she’s so nice because she lets us eat pizza.”
The young boys particularly enjoyed the moment just before the bridal party’s entrance when the organist began playing “Take Me Out to the Ballgame,” a tip of the cap to Mr. Travers, a San Francisco Giants fan.
Moments later, the boys’ eyes grew wider at the sight of the bride, in a white wedding dress by Romona Keveza, as she was escorted down the aisle, arm in arm, by her son, Trent Walradt.
They made their way toward the groom to a trumpeter’s traditional tune, the“Prince of Denmark’s March,”which breathed a regal resonance into the tiny church, “where the miracle that is Caroline and Peter began,” said Reverend Brown, whose heartfelt ceremony from the “Book of Common Prayer” was spectacular in its simplicity.
“Today we celebrate Caroline and Peter,” he said. “Their story is God’s story. It’s a story of new life and new hope, of a resurrection.”
The couple sealed their exchange of vows and rings with a long kiss, drawing thunderous applause and putting huge smiles on the faces of the tuxedo-clad groomsmen, among them the groom’s two sons, Nicholas and Peter Travers, as well as his two daughters, Georgia and Mary Travers, who served as bridesmaids, and the bride’s daughter, Jessica Walradt, her maid of honor.
“They help make each other better people,” Jessica Walradt said shortly after the bride and groom walked hand in hand out of the church and into a classic white 1961 Bentley. “My mom is just so happy, just so giddy with excitement. She deserves all of this happiness.”
As the guests poured out of the church, many boarded shuttle buses provided by the couple that whisked them off to the reception, which was held at the groom’s spacious home in nearby Hopewell, N.J., where Champagne flowed and the groom greeted his guests, and treated his new bride, to his own rendition of Frank Sinatra’s, “The Way You Look Tonight.”
“When Peter first met Caroline he was sort of feeling down and going through some tough times,” said Adam Hartmann, the groom’s half brother, who lives in Gainesville, Fla. “I love Peter, so to see the wonderful change in him since he and Caroline have been dating is like seeing the sun come out.”
The bride, who moved to South Brunswick from West Windsor in 2010, will move into the groom’s home, along with Sophie and Jasper, upon their return from a honeymoon in Paris and Venice, Italy.
“Living together will be a great experience,” the groom said. “I think it’s going to be an opportunity for us to do all sorts of adventurous things that we like to do, whether it’s travel or go to baseball games or get involved in good works.”
That long stretch of road between them no more, the bride was eager to begin a new journey.
“It will be nice to see Peter every night before he goes to sleep, and again in the morning when he awakes,” she said. “That may sound trite, but to me it’s both a comfort and a blessing, and a constant reminder that I’m now in the place where I’m supposed to be.”
ON THIS DAYWhereAll Saints’ Church, Princeton, N.J.WhenMarch 23, 2019Music Notes (not bank notes)Scott Ricketts, who is comptroller of the groom’s investment business, is an accomplished trumpet player. He performed the “Prince of Denmark’s March” for the bride’s procession.Play It AgainThe couple’s first dance was to “A Kiss to Build a Dream On” by Louis Armstrong. They first danced to it in the bride’s kitchen.Tribute to MomIn Ms. Walradt’s bridal bouquet were gardenias, which were her mother’s favorite flowers.
Continue following our fashion and lifestyle coverage on Facebook (StylesandModern Love), Twitter (Styles,FashionandWeddings) andInstagram.


the first season
The Mets won just 40 games and lost 120, the most defeats in a single season in the modern history of baseball.
Manager Casey Stengel theatrically pointing the way at the start of spring training in 1962. It’s doubtful Stengel anticipated just how bad his team would turn out to be.CreditCreditAssociated Press
Supported by
ByThe New York Times
The original Mets were created from the ashes of the Brooklyn Dodgers and the New York Giants, both of whom had deserted New York City after the 1957 season. Now, five years later, National League baseball was back, so to speak. For it was quickly apparent that the Mets’ roster, put together mostly from players left unprotected by the other National League teams, was a mess.
Left to do the best he could with it was baseball’s most colorful manager, Casey Stengel, who had won seven World Series with the Yankees but had been dismissed after the 1960 season, at the age of 70, because the Yankees felt he was too old. Now, he was even older, but on the Mets that hardly mattered because they had plenty of players past their prime.
Stengel, with his amusing, and endless, observations became the perfect narrator for a season of amazingly bad baseball. It began with nine straight losses and by its close, the Mets had won just 40 games and lost 120, the most defeats in a single season in the modern history of baseball.
Adding to the absurdity was that the Mets had two pitchers named Bob Miller — Righty Bob Miller and Lefty Bob Miller. And a first baseman known as Marvelous Marv Throneberry, with the Marvelous meant as a joke, not a compliment.
On it went right up to the last day of the season, when the Mets managed to hit into a triple play. By then, as Robert Lipsyte of The New York Times put it, they had become an international symbol of incompetence.
Following are excerpts from Times articles during the 1962 season:
ST. LOUIS, April 11
History was made tonight by the New York Mets. They broke into the expanded National League at long last, but wound up on the short end of an 11-4 score, beaten conclusively by the St. Louis Cardinals at Busch Stadium.
In their first official effort, the Mets unfortunately did much to beat themselves. Despite the 16 hits the Cardinals collected, four ineffective New York pitchers, backed by a loose defense, hurt the Mets immeasurably.
The season opener here before 16,147 half-frozen fans saw the Mets commit three errors and permit three stolen bases.
Adding to Manager Casey Stengel’s miseries, Roger Craig, the starter and losing pitcher, committed a balk that led to one of two St. Louis runs in the first inning. In addition, the Mets bounced into two double plays.LOUIS EFFRAT
POLO GROUNDS, April 13
Civic pride erupted in one lusty ovation after another at the Polo Grounds today as 12,447 baseball fans hailed the return of the prodigal National League.
In the eye of the hurricane of hurrahs were the New York Mets — a team conceived in frustration and dedicated to the proposition that this teeming metropolis is a two-league town as well as a summer festival.
Murky skies, autumn temperatures and a relentless drizzle kept the welcoming committee from reaching major league proportions.
However, what the crowd lacked in numbers it offset with enthusiasm, generously pouring out affection that had found no satisfactory outlet since the New York Giants and Brooklyn Dodgers absconded to the West Coast at the close of the 1957 season.
Of those present on this historic Friday the 13th, only the Pittsburgh Pirates extended anything except felicitations and best wishes to Casey Stengel’s Mets. And despite profound cogitation and adroit personnel shuffling by the former Yankee manager, the Pirates won, 4-3.ROBERT TEAGUE
CHICAGO, June 8
After 17 consecutive defeats, the New York Mets today emerged from the darkness by beating the Chicago Cubs, 4-3, in the first game of a doubleheader at Wrigley Field.
To Mets fans, the fact that the Cubs retaliated with a 3-2 victory in the second game, which was called after eight innings because of darkness, doesn’t matter. Neither does the fact that the Mets’ triumph came on an unearned run in the ninth inning. After 17 losses, a victory is a victory. Jay Hook, who needed last-inning relief by Craig Anderson, was the winning pitcher in the opener. He is the same right-hander who snapped the nine-game losing string with which the Mets opened the season.
Not since May 20, when they twice upended the Milwaukee Braves, had the Mets known victory. It was the longest losing streak ever for a New York team in the major leagues.LOUIS EFFRAT
POLO GROUNDS, SEPT. 22
Even in the autumn of their pathetic despair, the New York Mets cannot escape history. Each step and misstep seem destined to remain forever in the dusty recesses of major league archives, or at least in corner crevices in the minds of those who care.
Today, at the Polo Grounds, there were at least four such footnotes to baseball’s memorabilia. They obscured the Mets’ 116th defeat, a dreary 9-2 drubbing by the Chicago Cubs.
The saddest of the four is what Met officials disregard as a “negative statistic.” Al Jackson, one of the two best pitchers on the club, was clobbered for five runs on seven hits during the two and a third innings he pitched.
The slim left-hander was charged with his 20th loss of the season in 28 decisions. This is the first time since 1936 that a National League club has had two 20-game losers. Roger Craig, the other one, has a 9-23 won-lost record.
The Philadelphia Phillies turned the trick 26 years ago when Bucky Walters lost 21 and Joe Bowman 20.ROBERT LIPSYTE
MILWAUKEE, SEPT. 26
Shed another tear for the New York Mets, who bowed, 6-3, to the Braves tonight and wound up with exclusive rights to another record, asterisk, footnote and all.
Casey Stengel’s men suffered their 118th defeat. This negative statistic made the Mets the losingest baseball team in modern history. The Philadelphia Athletics of 1916 lost 117 games.
The game drew only 3,239 fans, the smallest night-game turnout since the Braves moved to Milwaukee. Play was delayed 42 minutes after the top of the first inning because of rain.
With Henry Aaron’s three-run homer off Roger Craig supplying the crusher in the third, and the 23-year-old southpaw Denny Lemaster striking out 10 Mets, this was just another night in a long series of sorry nights for the first-year club. Craig, who departed for a pinch-hitter in the fourth, hung around long enough to absorb his 24th setback.LOUIS EFFRAT
CHICAGO, SEPT. 30
It mattered not that the New York Mets won or lost, or even how they played the game today before 3,960 fans at Wrigley Field. For the record, though, the season’s final, for which Casey Stengel asked and obtained volunteers, went to the Cubs, 5-1.
It was the Mets’ 120th defeat in this, their initial campaign, and it left them in the National League cellar, 60 games from the top. The season was concluded as it had started — with a setback — after the Mets had been victimized by an eighth-inning triple play.
Had the season been fun?
“I would have to say no to that one,” Stengel said.LOUIS EFFRAT
Editors’ note: The 1962 Mets hold the record for most losses in a season in modern Major League Baseball history.
An earlier version of a picture caption with this article, using information from the Associated Press, misstated the team the Mets were playing at the Polo Grounds. It was the San Francisco Giants, not the Los Angeles Dodgers.
Supported by
Times Insider
ByTyler Kepner
Times Insiderexplains who we are and what we do, and delivers behind-the-scenes insights into how our journalism comes together.
This is my 20th year as a baseball writer for The New York Times, and to commemorate the occasion, I built a house.
Not literally, of course. I’m the least handy person you’ll ever meet. But as a writer I sometimes think in analogies, and in this case I’m a carpenter. I build hundreds of tables and bookshelves and cabinets each year, taking pride in crafting something stable and sturdy. But I’ve always wanted to apply those skills to something grander. I’ve always wanted to build a house.
As The Times’s national baseball writer, I’ll generate hundreds of articles each year in the 800- to 1,200-word range. A few might reach 2,000. But what about something truly long-lasting: 112,000 words, sold in stores, shelved in libraries, with my name on the spine? What if I built ... a book?
Now I’ve written one, called“K: A History of Baseball in Ten Pitches,”released by Doubleday on April 2. It’s the culmination of a three-year scavenger hunt across the baseball landscape, locating more than 300 interview subjects to ask about the pitches that make up the game’s DNA.
The book devotes a chapter apiece to the fastball, the curveball, the sinker, the slider, the cutter, the changeup, the splitter, the screwball, the knuckleball and the spitball. To write it, I had to find a different voice than the one in the newspaper, one of assurance and authority. To be comfortable doing that, I relied on the tools I use to write daily columns and features: talking to as many people as possible, and always learning to try something new.
My mission was to find every pitcher who threw any pitch especially well, plus catchers, hitters, coaches, umpires, scouts and so on — and, because the book would cover the scope of baseball history, to make sure to get voices of the past, too.
I spent several days engrossed in ancient news clippings at the Hall of Fame library in Cooperstown, N.Y. I leaned on players I covered in my dozen years as a beat writer (at The Times and on the West Coast), reconnecting with pitchers I covered: Mariano Rivera, Andy Pettitte, Roger Clemens, Mike Myers, Al Leiter, Jamie Moyer, Chuck Finley — and especiallyMike Mussina, the new Hall of Famer, who invited me to lunch in his hometown, Montoursville, Pa. We talked about pitching for hours.
In all, I interviewed 22 Hall of Fame pitchers, plus many standouts who made a huge impact in the game but do not have a plaque in Cooperstown: guys like Carl Erskine, Roger Craig, Elroy Face, Wilbur Wood, J. R. Richard, Kent Tekulve, Ron Guidry, Dave Duncan, Mario Soto, Brad Lidge and many more.
I also tracked down pitchers whose feats I witnessed in my formative days as a fan near Philadelphia: the Hall of Famer Steve Carlton, my first baseball hero; Steve Rogers, the longtime Expo who beat Carlton in the first game I ever saw, in 1981; and Scott McGregor, who clinched the 1983 World Series for the Orioles as I watched, forlornly, from the front row at old Veterans Stadium.
Carlton was famous for never talking to the news media, but he was delightful in our 40-minute chat. He greeted my call with a playful brushback pitch: “So you’re writing a book — don’t you know people don’t read anymore?” But I hung in there and learned all about the pitch that might have been the best slider in the history of the game.
Rogers, whom I found at an All-Star Game in Cincinnati, was a riot; he shared the advice of an early pitching coach, Calvin Coolidge Julius Caesar Tuskahoma McLish — Cal, for short — who told young pitchers, “All right, son, just get out in front and get whippy!” Quite a contrast to today’s coaches, who calculate every revolution of the ball with precise technological backing.
McGregor, whose name I cursed as a vanquished 8-year-old Phillies fan, was also a treat to interview, reflecting not just on his moment of glory but also on his final day in the majors, in 1988, when he knew he was finished. The Twins were lashing his lifeless pitches, and the Orioles’ shortstop, Cal Ripken Jr., asked McGregor on the mound if he was still throwing his changeup.
“They’re all the same speed anymore,” McGregor told Ripken. “Just back up a little bit. You might be a little safer.”
You’ll find that story on Page 207. I like to pick up the book and flip to a random page like that, to remember the moments of discovery behind every paragraph. For me, it’s like roaming the hallways of the house I finally built, every insight a support beam holding it up.
I hope you’ll drop by and enjoy your stay.
Follow the@ReaderCenteron Twitter for more coverage highlighting your perspectives and experiences and for insight into how we work.
Supported by
ByKevin DraperandKevin Armstrong
When the Mets hired Brodie Van Wagenen as their new general manager last October, they wholly embraced, even promoted, his status as an unconventional outsider — a converted player agent. The team made a similarly unorthodox addition on Tuesday, announcing that Jessica Mendoza, a baseball analyst for ESPN, would join the team’s front office as a baseball operations adviser to Van Wagenen.
The Mets said Mendoza, a softball gold medalist in the 2004 Olympic Games who joined ESPN in 2007, would focus on player evaluation, roster construction, and health and performance. But in noting that Mendoza also would retain her high-profile role on “Sunday Night Baseball” telecasts, the announcement gave a new dimension to questions about objectivity for ESPN. The network has long covered sports while also paying leagues billions of dollars each year to air them, and it has increasingly seen its own employees blur the lines between covering and participating in sports.
Van Wagenen said at a news conference Tuesday morning that hiring Mendoza furthered the team’s efforts to shake up the way it does business.
“I was an outside-the-box hire,” Van Wagenen said. “I’ve been a believer that you need to get new voices and fresh perspectives in any room, especially when you are making decisions.”
Mendoza, 38, has a sterling history in softball and baseball. She was one of the best college softball players ever, and later won a gold medal at the 2004 Athens Games and a silver in 2008. She has been with ESPN for about 12 years and became a color analyst on “Sunday Night Baseball” — the network’s flagship baseball program — in 2016.
While Mendoza will evaluate players and provide input on roster construction, Van Wagenen said she would be especially influential in the areas of health and performance and technology. He also said she would work for the Mets during baseball’s annual general manager and winter meetings in the off-season, suggesting her role would be more consequential than those of others — including the ex-Yankee Alex Rodriguez — who are both broadcasters and advisers for teams.
Mendoza’s deal with the Mets includes a confidentiality agreement, Van Wagenen said, adding that she would not share on her broadcast “anything she gleans from our operation.” She also will not be allowed to share with the Mets anything she learns about other teams through her ESPN duties. Mendoza will be in the Mets’ training camp in Port St. Lucie, Fla., on Friday.
ESPN has long had a revolving door between the playing fields and the broadcast booth. Just last week,Jason Wittenleft “Monday Night Football” to return to his N.F.L. playing career, one year after Jon Gruden did the same to return to coaching.
Still, Mendoza’s hire is different. She is perhaps ESPN’s highest-profile baseball voice, one of the network’s most important employees on its most important baseball broadcast. She is currently scheduled to be in the booth for a June game between the Mets and Atlanta Braves.
ESPN shrugged off suggestions of conflict of interest, and argued that Mendoza was far from the first baseball broadcaster to navigate such concerns. “There are numerous examples across networks of these type of arrangements where commentators work closely with teams, and we will be fully transparent about Jessica’s relationship with the Mets,” said Josh Krulewitz, an ESPN spokesman. “We have complete faith in her ability as a leading M.L.B. voice for ESPN.”
Other networks have similar situations: The retired baseball players Frank Thomas and David Ortiz, who both work for Fox, also have roles with their old teams. But Van Wagenen’s insistence that Mendoza would have input on important baseball decisions seems to set her apart from other broadcasters’ or ex-players’ roles as “special advisers,” a role that tends to be more ceremonial than substantive. Ross and Rodriguez are not listed as part of the front office on their respective teams’ websites, and Thomas is an adviser for business operations. When Ortiz’s role was announced, he focused on his duties of recruiting free agents and making community appearances.
Like ESPN, the Mets are accustomed to the revolving door in the baseball industry. Van Wagenen was hired from Creative Artists Agency, where he represented Mets stars like Jacob deGrom and Yoenis Cespedes. In taking the job, Van Wagenen divested himself from his stake in C.A.A., and he has said that hewill recuse himselffrom any contract negotiations with past clients, including deGrom. If that wasn’t confusing enough, Mendoza is also represented by C.A.A. And then there’sTim Tebow, working his way up through the Mets’ minor-league ranks while remaining with ESPN as a college football analyst.
Kevin Draper reported from New York, and Kevin Armstrong from Port St. Lucie, Fla.


Supported by
the lean years
The Mets still struggled, but they never again reached the depths of 1962. After Stengel retired, Seaver and Koosman arrived.
ByThe New York Times
The Mets were back in the Polo Grounds in 1963 and so were their many fans. Who knows why everyone showed up, or why so many of them brought banners, but some of the fervor was just sheer irreverence, the antiestablishment joy of rooting for a team that was so awful.
And for sure, the Mets were terrible again, although this time they managed to win 51 games instead of 40. The nuttiest moment came when Jimmy Piersall ran around the bases backward after hitting the 100th home run of his career. The most exhilarating occurred when tens of thousands of Mets fans invaded Yankee Stadium for a charity exhibition game against baseball’s defending champions, had their banners confiscated and then went berserk anyway when the Mets actually won.
A year later, the Mets moved to Shea Stadium, their new home in Queens, and took their ineptitude with them. They went 59-103. They lost their home opener while creating a massive traffic jam. At the end of May, they lost a doubleheader at Shea that went on forever because of a 23-inning second game that lasted 7 hours 23 minutes, a record at the time. Three weeks later at Shea, the Mets were the victims of a perfect game thrown by Philadelphia’s Jim Bunning.
In 1965, the Mets were even worse, winning just 50 games while also losing Casey Stengel, who retired after breaking his hip. Without Stengel, the Mets were less entertaining and still stunk. They did move up from last place to ninth in 1966 but then fell right back into 10th a year later.
Still, that season the Mets had the rookie of the year in pitcher Tom Seaver. In 1968, the left-hander Jerry Koosman was just as impressive in his first season. The teammates of Seaver and Koosman now included other emerging players, like Jerry Grote and Bud Harrelson and Cleon Jones. And it showed in the Mets’ 1968 record — a 73-89 mark that still wasn’t very good but suggested that maybe something was changing. And something was.
The journey from hopelessness to champions of the world without having to pass through mediocrity might have been the miracle, and the devil’s bargain.
ByRobert Lipsyte
Mocking the Mets was considered cool in the early days of that ragtag expansion franchise because it concealed our painfully conflicted true feelings. At the same time that we were deeply ashamed at having been stuck with such a lousy team — how could baseball have scammed us like this? — we also embraced a lunatic joy at once more feeling major league. After all those years being the only three-team city in the show, we hadn’t found the Yankees enough for us.
So we celebrated the Mets in an appropriately early-1960s way — ironic, self-aware, rambunctious. Rock-ish. The crowds with their made-for-TV bedsheet banners seemed charmingly self-deprecating (“We don’t want to set the world on fire, we just want to finish ninth”) but they also foreshadowed darker times to come (“Pray”). The price of allowing, then encouraging, grandstand populism would eventually be their strident demands.
But those two Polo Grounds years were fun. Energized media members were thrilled with their new job and the West Coast trips to visit the Dodgers and Giants that came with them. Writers replated the former Yankee manager Casey Stengel as a madcap guru even as he spoke the truth after yet another loss (“The attendance was robbed, we’re still a fraud”), often with sarcasm (“Come out and see my amazin’ Mets”). A teenager who would never fulfill his hype, Ed Kranepool, was held up as the face of the future.
Most notorious of all, an inept first baseman, Marv Throneberry, was extolled as the symbol of the bumbling present. Years later, he told me how miserable he had been as a Met. He had entered the big leagues as a Yankee, Mickey Mantle’s heir, no less, after a sensational minor league career. Being celebrated as Marvelous Marv, the Mets’ fool, broke his spirit.
Perhaps the most telling signal that celebrating the “lovable losers” as comforting symbols of “everyman” — just like us! — would be short-lived was the creation of “neggies,” precursors of the Moneyball analytics of today. We needed those negative statistics to prove that the Mets were not merely profoundly second-rate but actually the worst of all time, so gloriously bad that we could claim them as champions, inverted champions to be sure, of games lost, chances bobbled, bases missed, hopes dashed. For the Mets, even mediocrity was a dream deferred.
But the founding Mets writers and fans couldn’t paint over the mid-’60s slump in real American life. The glow of post-World War II triumphalism had given way to the Bay of Pigs, the murderous resistance to civil rights activism, mounting Cold War anxiety, the assassination of J.F.K. There was too much dread. Mets fans began to clamor for some wins on their scoreboard.
There was a jolt of hope in 1964 when the Mets moved into their home for the next 44 years, Shea Stadium, paid for by the taxpaying fans, named for a wheeler-dealer lawyer. The ballpark was riddled with imperfections. The team was even worse, lurching through five more losing seasons. The Mets couldn’t even claw their way up to mediocrity.
The so-called New Breed fans (named and championed by the swaggering, righteous Daily News columnist Dick Young) grew restive. Beyond the ballpark, the riots and assassinations were taking their toll on the public psyche, and the Mets, our safety valve, our comic relief, were becoming just another black hole of despair.
And then came Tom Seaver — fresh, ebullient, hard-working, immensely talented. Nothing mediocre here. He was the Mets’ first homegrown superstar and many of us still think the only one. In 1967, he was National League rookie of the year, an All-Star, and a 16-game winner for a last-place club. The next year he again won 16 games, this time for a ninth-place club.
But Tom Terrific set the world on fire, not only the top gun of a strong young pitching staff — Jerry Koosman, Nolan Ryan, Gary Gentry, Tug McGraw — but the anti-Marv. He was the New Breed’s dream of the New Met, a California college boy with a playful cackle who would lead us to the promised pennant in 1969.
Was it a miracle? Don’t sports miracles happen suddenly, one hockey game, a shot heard ’round the world, a perfect punch? This miracle unspooled through seven years of suffering as preparation for 100 victories punctuated by Seaver’s 25. Beating the highly favored Orioles was almost anticlimactic: It was truly about the journey from hopelessness to champions of the world without having to pass through mediocrity. Maybe that was the miracle … and the devil’s bargain.
In fact, a case could be made — here it comes — that the 1969 World Series is still the high point of Mets history, that nothing in the next 50 years came close. The Mets lost the 1973 Series to Oakland and won in 1986 under morally nullifying circumstances; not only did they win because of a Red Sox error, but a member of that team in his final major league season, at a still serviceable 41, was Seaver.
He should have still been a Met.
In 1977, a contract dispute with the cartoonishly imperious Mets chairman, M. Donald Grant, was viciously spun by Dick Young into a Desperate Players Wives plot; Nancy Seaver, he claimed, wanted Tom to make more than Nolan Ryan. A man of dignity, Seaver opted out and began an exile’s journey to the Reds, the White Sox, briefly back to the Mets, then the Red Sox and finally to his California winery.
The Mets went on to lose the World Series in 2000 and 2015, each by four games to one. Failing against the Yankees in 2000 doomed the Mets to their current fate. Only winning the Subway Series would redeem a history of steady disappointment. Their owners have been lackluster; they have managed a record of 4,362 victories against 4,732 defeats, a .480 average, not to mention involvement with the Ponzi schemer Bernie Madoff. The closest the Mets ever came to a Seaverish star was the talented, handsome, good-hearted David Wright, unfortunately bedeviled by injuries.
Even now, 50 years after what, yes, must have been a miracle, that glory is tinged with sadness. Seaver, a longtime victim of Lyme disease, recently announced his withdrawal from public life because of encroaching dementia. The creator of so many of our most amazin’ memories, is losing his.
Pray.
Following are excerpts from Times articles from 1964 to 1968.
SHEA STADIUM, April 17, 1964
Shea Stadium, the newest major league baseball park, opened for business yesterday with appropriate festivities and colossal traffic jams. A crowd of 50,312, including 48,736 who paid, radiated enthusiasm under sunny skies as the New York Mets fought their way to a typical 4-3 defeat at the hands of the Pittsburgh Pirates.
The lack of parking space at the stadium caused massive traffic snarls that started an hour and a half before game time. The congestion was not nearly so bad after the game despite the addition of normally heavy commuter traffic. Traffic Commissioner Henry A. Barnes was in a helicopter over the area trying to unscramble postgame jams.
In every respect but traffic control and the outcome of the game, the occasion was declared a rousing success by most of those involved.
“At first,” said Casey Stengel, who has been singing the praises of the new stadium all over the country for months, “I couldn’t find out where the writers were and where the broadcasters were, but then I found them and I was in trouble.”LEONARD KOPPETT
SHEA STADIUM, MAY 31, 1964
Baseball’s transcontinental archrivals — the New York Mets and San Francisco Giants — battled through 10 hours and 23 minutes of a titanic doubleheader at Shea Stadium yesterday that included the longest game on a time basis ever played in the major leagues.
Endurance records, attendance records and performance records fell through nine innings of the first game and 23 innings of the second before the largest crowd of the baseball season anywhere — 57,037.
The huge throng saw the Giants win, 5-3 and 8-6. And the 8,000 to 10,000 still on hand when the action ended at 11:25 p.m. saw 41 players struggle for 7 hours and 23 minutes, a record, in the second game.
The two teams also played the longest doubleheader in history: 9 hours 52 minutes on the field. They also played the most innings ever played by big-league teams in one day: 32.
During and after the games, people lined up outside the stadium to use a telephone alongside the right-field stands.
Because of a union jurisdictional dispute, there are no telephones at the stadium.
Some potential callers who saw the one phone booth tied up rushed hundreds of yards to the elevated train station. After paying a token, they raced to the phone booths there.
Those who wished to leave during the game to make telephone calls were permitted to return.
There was some grumbling, however, as the day went on.
Mel Ganz of Kew Gardens, Queens, said those manning the stadium entrances “won’t let me in to see my kid — he’s been inside since 10 a.m.”JOSEPH DURSO and GERALD ESKENAZI
SHEA STADIUM, June 21, 1964
Jim Bunning of the Philadelphia Phillies pitched the first perfect game in the National League in 84 years yesterday when he retired all 27 New York Met batters.
The Phils won the contest, the first game of a doubleheader at Shea Stadium by 6-0 before 32,904 fans, who were screaming for Bunning during the last two innings.
The lanky right-hander became the eighth man in the 88-year history of major league baseball to pitch a perfect game. He is the first man to pitch one in the majors since Don Larsen of the New York Yankees did not permit a Brooklyn Dodger to reach base in the fifth game of the 1956 World Series.
In the second game, which the Phillies won, 8-2, the Mets were held to three hits, by a rookie, Rick Wise, and John Klippstein.GORDON S. WHITE Jr.
Oct. 5, 1966
As the World Series opens today on the other side of the continent, New Yorkers at least have the consolation of knowing that both their teams made baseball history in the season just past.
The Yankees ended up in last place for the first time since 1912, and the Mets didn’t — for the first time ever.
It is of mere academic interest that the Yanks actually won more games and finished closer to first place in the American League than the Mets did in the National. What counts is that in the National League, the Chicago Cubs were worse.
The Columbia Broadcasting System acquired the Yankees in 1964 as they were winning their fifth straight pennant. The merger of corporate strengths brought fears of unfair competition that the mighty Yankees soon dispelled by sinking to sixth place last year and 10th place this.
Now C.B.S. must rebuild a show with failing ratings. They can’t rerun the 1964 club.
The Mets, too, will find the way up full of peril. They won intense loyalty from the fans for their first four years in the cellar. Now that they are just another thoroughly professional second-division club, the fans may demand even better performances: eighth place, then seventh — there is no limit to rising expectations.
But for the moment, ninth place is the top of the world.NEW YORK TIMES EDITORIAL
SHEA STADIUM April 20, 1967
Tom Seaver, a college student who cost the New York Mets $50,000, began to pay off on the investment yesterday by pitching his owners to a 6-1 victory over the Chicago Cubs. He received eloquent support from Tommy Davis, who hit his first home run as a Met.
But in most ways, Seaver’s first major league victory turned into a triumph for the Mets’ Class of ’67 — especially since another rookie, Don Shaw, went to the rescue in the eighth inning and retired the last five Chicago batters.
Moreover, in his second game in the major leagues, Seaver outpitched Curt Simmons, who was pitching in his 540th game and who started pitching 21 seasons ago, when Seaver was a 2-year-old tot in Fresno.JOSEPH DURSO
LOS ANGELES April 11, 1968
The New York Mets, fresh from their opening-day travesty in San Francisco, made a remarkable comeback when Jerry Koosman defeated the Los Angeles Dodgers, 4-0, on a complete-game four-hitter. The 24-year-old rookie left-hander from Minnesota had never seen Dodger Stadium before. He had never won a game in the major leagues, either, and had pitched only 22 innings for the Mets, all of them last season.
Koosman gave up two walks and no hits until Tom Haller singled to right in the fifth. Then Wes Parker doubled to left in the sixth, but still the Dodgers were scoreless.
The Mets, meanwhile, reached Singer for two runs in the sixth, when Singer suffered from the effects of a bad cold, a pair of troublesome contact lenses and a leadoff triple by Ken Boswell. A pair of walks to Ron Swoboda and Ed Kranepool loaded the bases, then Art Shamsky pulled a two-run single to right.JOSEPH DURSO
Supported by
ByTyler KepnerandJames Wagner
A lot has changed for Christian Yelich in a year, especially since Nov. 15, when he was named the National League most valuable player. He has been on the road for nearly two weeks this winter, an off-season circuit of photo shoots, awards shows and interviews. On Saturday, he was in Manhattan to formally accept the M.V.P. plaque at the annual New York baseball writers’ dinner.
Around this time last year, Yelich was a young and talented but not-so-well-known outfielder for the dysfunctional and eternally changing Miami Marlins. As part of a team fire sale, he was traded to the Milwaukee Brewers on Jan. 25, 2018. He produced a dazzling season, particularly in the second half when he hit as if he had unlocked the cheat codes to a video game. He finished with a N.L. best .326 average and 1.000 on-base-plus-slugging percentage, plus a career high 36 home runs and 110 runs batted in.
He led the surprising Brewers, the team in the smallest market in the country, to the N.L. Central title. They came to within one game of the World Series, falling to the big-spending Los Angeles Dodgers in Game 7 of the N.L. Championship Series. Yelich, a native of the Los Angeles area, received 29 of 30 first-place votes for the M.V.P. Award.
Yelich, 27, stopped by The New York Times on Friday to answer some questions about his big year, the business of baseball and the wildfire-relief charity,California Strong, that he helped create with several other major leaguers. This interview has been edited and condensed for clarity.
Baseball players generally don’t have renown of football or basketball players. Why are you doing this post-M.V.P. media tour?
It’s important, not only for yourself, but for the game. If you’ve been blessed to be in a position and put on the field to speak out on these topics, as far as California Strong or the direction the game is headed. Obviously you want to bring as much attention to the game as possible and grow baseball as much as you can. It’s important. It comes with the responsibility that being a league M.V.P. comes with. I’m just learning on the fly, trying to the best I can.
Is there something culturally different about baseball that discourages players speaking out like they do in the N.F.L. or N.B.A.? Why don’t you see that much activism, or players inserting themselves into the political or culture conversation?
I don’t think it’s a conscious effort not to be engaged in that stuff. You still see a lot of baseball players doing good. At the end of the day, when you’re trying to do good, that’s all that matters. Whether it’s in a different aspect than in the N.B.A. or N.F.L., you should use your platform for good.
How is theCalifornia Strongcampaign going? You said you’ve raised $1.5 million.
It all started was basically a group text with Ryan Braun, Mike Moustakas and [the son of the Brewers’ owner] Mike Attanasio, just basically trying to find information on if everybody’s houses were O.K. Since everyone had to be evacuated, information was kind of minimal. Once we found out that everyone was O.K., it kind of turned into: how can we help? We thought we needed to give back, because theBorderline shootinghappened basically a few hours before that night when all the fires started. So we thought about doing something to give back to the hometown and help get people back on their feet.
The N.L.C.S. was mostly on a cable network, Fox Sports 1, while the A.F.C. and N.F.C. title games in the N.F.L. were more widely watched on Fox and CBS. Do you think baseball needs more of a national audience?
I don’t think baseball is ever going to be the fast-paced game that football or basketball is. It’s never going to be constant action. That’s never how the game is played. With players being allowed to express themselves a little bit more freely on the field, there’s also been a bigger push for them to be on social media to sharing their lives and personalities. It’s going to attract the younger fan because they’re going to feel like they’re engaged and maybe a little bit more invested in these players because they know them a little better. And when there’s a game like that, they tune in and see how their favorite player or team does.
What’s life like after winning an M.V.P.?
It is different and everything changed one afternoon, basically. There is the show and the announcement and then everything is completely different the next day. You just take it in stride and it’s not anything that’s been overwhelming or I can’t handle this. It’s not like that by any means, but it’s definitely been a lot of fun.
Has there been much chatter between you, your teammates or other players about the slow free-agent market or how two superstars, Bryce Harper and Manny Machado, remain unsigned?
We talk about it. I don’t want to share exactly what those conversations are. They’re two of the best players that we have in the game right now. The process hasn’t played out. Players talk. I’d like to leave it at that.
This past season was the first in whichthere were more strikeouts than hits. It’s an issue with the commissioner’s office; they’d like to see more hits and more action. Do you see it as a problem?
I don’t know how you solve it, but you’ve definitely seen an increase in velocity year by year. There’s been an emphasis on the whole launch angle thing and pitchers combating that with throwing fastballs up in the zone. There’s been a greater push on analytics and teams to look into it and how to get guys out. Hitters have that as well, but hitting has always been hard. Hitting a baseball is still incredibly hard. It’s just one of those things where hitters have to make an adjustment and we have to find a way. Since I’ve been in the league for parts of six years, you can tell already the difference as far as just the amount of power arms you face on a nightly and daily basis.
Given the oversaturation of statistics and measurements in baseball, what do you look at to evaluate your own performance?
I feel like probably the biggest one is O.P.S. It’s the biggest stat that people take value from in the game, from the people who evaluate it and the people who play it. Just because it’s slugging and on base — two of the things that make up a productive baseball player. We’ve gotten away from batting average a little bit. I still think batting average is important; other people will tell you it’s not anymore in the game, but you don’t want to make outs, basically. You still have to get on base and be productive. Somehow getting on base and getting a hit are really not that big of a deal. It’s still really hard to get a hit in the big leagues, whether it’s a single or homer. There’s still something that can be said for that. You’ve seen that, where the game has gotten away from it, where it’s become acceptable to hit .220 or .230 and hit 30 homers.
Every hit almost feels like a miracle because pitchers are throwing so hard. Do you ever sit back and think, This is a really freakish skill I have?
Sometimes it feels a lot harder than other times. There’s times when you’re in the on-deck circle or on the bench and you’re like: ‘I have no shot. I don’t know how I’m going to do this but I’ve got to figure it out.’ And other times you’re more locked in and it doesn’t feel as hard. It’s the same feeling every spring training when the pitchers are throwing their bullpen or live batting practices and you’re like” ‘Oh man, this might be the year I go 0 for 500. I don’t know how I’m going to do this.’ And then you get back to the process. I feel like, from the side or in the dugout, this guy is throwing is so hard. And then when you get in there, it’s not really what you think it is because you’re so used to it. It just slows down every day when you’re in there.
In the second half last year, did the ball look like a beach ball to you?
There are times even during that second half where there were week stretches where it kind of leaves you and doesn’t feel right. But it comes back quicker. When you go on stretches like that, there’s still times where it doesn’t feel great but it still comes back to you quicker. Some years, you’re constantly searching for “it” — and “it” is different for everybody.
Can you purposefully foul off a pitch?
I can’t. I feel like the only guy that probably could purposefully foul off a ball is ... Who do you think?
Ichiro?
No. But he might be one of the guys. But I was going to say Joey Votto. I haven’t talked to Joey about this, but I feel like sometimes Joey is up there just trying to walk and he’s just trying to foul the ball off until he walks.
Do you guess at the plate?
I don’t like to guess. Just react. Some guys are guess hitters. I just could never do it. If you guess and guess wrong, you have no shot of hitting anything else.
When you look back on your childhood, what do you think was a difference maker in terms of allowing you to become an elite athlete in terms of your development?
The most important thing for kids would basically be have fun and enjoy it. Travel ball has become a business and not as much fun for kids these days. They think their kids are getting scouted when they’re 8, 9 or 10 years old. You should just enjoy the game at this point in your life. Why is there any pressure to play well when you’re 8, 9 or 10? It doesn’t matter if you hit five homers or strike out five times in a game. The Milwaukee Brewers are not watching your travel ball game right now and saying, ‘Johnny is a first-round pick and we’re taking him this year.’


Supported by
The Team
A look at the championship team captured in the 1969 Topps Baseball set.
ByJay Schreiber
Tom Seaverwon the rookie of the year award in 1967, finishing 16-13 for a Mets team that was still nowhere near .500. In 1969 he went 25-7 with a 2.21 E.R.A. and 18 complete games, astounding by current standards. He won the National League Cy Young Award that season, as he did again as a Met in 1973 and 1975. More than any other player, he set the tone for the Mets’ transformation into champions.
Cleon Joneswas born on Aug. 4, 1942, five days beforeTommie Agee, below, and the two of them grew up playing sports together in Mobile, Ala., before becoming outfield partners on the Mets — Jones in left, Agee in center. In 1969, Jones hit .340, drove in 75 runs, and was the best player in the Mets’ lineup. It was Jones who started the winning rally in the final game of the World Series, with an eighth-inning double.
Agee’sfirst season in New York, 1968, was a disaster. But 1969 was a different story — 26 home runs while batting leadoff, a .271 average, great catches in the World Series. Agee and Jones did have a close call in the N.L.C.S. when Agee, attempting to steal home, nearly got hit by a line drive off Jones’s bat. The two remained Mets teammates through 1972. Agee died in 2001 at age 58.
George Vecsey, writing in The New York Times, once referred toJerry Groteas the “resident grump” of the 1969 Mets clubhouse. Indeed, he was a hard-nosed, intensely competitive catcher who was quick as a cat behind the plate and was in charge of steering a pitching staff that was the strongest part of the team. He did his job extremely well. As such, his offensive numbers that year — .252 average, 40 R.B.I. — were almost a footnote.
It was the consistently solid defense provided byBud Harrelson, at shortstop, and by Grote behind the plate that became a subtle source of strength for the 1969 Mets. That season, Harrelson batted a modest .248 with no home runs, 11 doubles and just 24 R.B.I. But that hardly mattered. Far more significant was the role he played in the field. He weighed only 160 pounds, but he was the anchor.
Gil Hodgesprojected strength in his size and his quiet determination, and his players, many of them in their mid-20s, took heed. If the 1969 Mets had a pillar, it was Hodges. He was still the Mets manager when he died of a heart attack in 1972 at age47.
Al Weisshared second base with Ken Boswell as part of a righty-lefty combo and was one of the weakest hitters in the 1969 lineup. Still, he hit a big home run in July to help beat the Cubs and an even bigger one in the final game of the World Series.
Ed Charles’snickname was The Glider for the way he moved on defense at third base. And that defense was vital in the ninth inning of Game 2 of the World Series when, with the Orioles threatening, he snared a hard ground ball and threw to first for the final out. Charles died in 2018 at the age of 84.
As a rookie in 1965,Ron Swobodahit 19 home runs, but by 1969 he was a platoon player. Even so, he continued to work hard on his outfield defense and in the 9th inning of Game 4 of the World Series he made one of the great catches ever.
Duffy Dyerwas the third catcher in 1969, which meant his playing time was limited. Still, in just 74 at-bats he hit effectively — a .257 average, 3 home runs, 12 R.B.I. And he caught one game of the Mets’ 1-0, 1-0 doubleheader sweep against the Pirates on Sept. 12.
Wayne Garrettand Ed Charles formed the lefty-righty platoon at third base. As a rookie in 1969, Garrett hit only one home run in the regular season. But he hit a two-run blast in Game 3 of the N.L.C.S. against the Braves.
An original Met,Ed Kranepoolgot six at-bats in 1962 when he was just 17. He was still a Met when he retired after the 1979 season. In the middle came 1969, when he platooned at first base with Donn Clendenon and homered in Game 3 of the World Series.
Ken Boswellwas a formidable hitter from the left side who batted .279 in 1969 while manning second base with Al Weis. It was Boswell who singled in the winning run in the bottom of the 12th inning on Sept. 10 to push the Mets past the Cubs into first place.
J. C. Martinwas the backup catcher in 1969, batting .209 in 66 games. With his bat, he helped win Game 1 of the N.L.C.S. with a two-out, bases-loaded single. With his wrist, which got in the way of a Baltimore throw to first base on Martin’s bunt, he helped win Game 4 of the World Series.
A lefty hitter,Art Shamskyshared right field with Ron Swoboda, a righty. And Shamsky thrived in that platoon in 1969, batting .300 in 100 games with 14 home runs and 47 R.B.I. Even better, he hit .538 (7 of 13) against the Braves in the N.L.C.S.
The Mets acquiredDonn Clendenonin June 1969 from Montreal and he proved invaluable as a part-time first baseman and a leader in the clubhouse. His best moment came in the World Series, when he hit three home runs. He died in 2005 at the age of 70.
At 33,Don Cardwellwas the oldest member of the Mets’ pitching staff in 1969, and by then had been a major leaguer for a dozen years, including three seasons in Queens. He went 8-10 in 21 starts in 1969; he died in 2008 at the age of 72.
In a rotation that featured Tom Seaver and Jerry Koosman,Jim McAndrewwas sometimes overlooked and indeed, he did not pitch in the 1969 postseason. Still, he started 21 games in the regular season and went 6-7 with a solid 3.47 E.R.A.
Al Jacksonpitched in only 9 games for the Mets in 1969 and fared poorly. By June, he was a member of the Cincinnati Reds. Still, he merits mention because his Mets roots go back to 1962, when he went 8-20 for one of the worst teams in history.
A backup outfielder and defensive specialist,Rod Gaspartwice threw out runners at the plate in key moments in 1969. In June, he nailed the Cardinals’ Lou Brock to protect a 1-0, eighth-inning lead. In August, he threw out the Giants’ Bob Burda to protect a 2-2 tie in the ninth.
A utility player for the Mets in 1969,Bobby Pfeilplayed second base and third and hit .232 in 211 at-bats. In the postseason, he failed to make the roster. But in the World Series, President Richard Nixon ended up using Pfeil’s glove to protect himself against foul balls.
In 1969,Nolan Ryanwas a hard-throwing 22-year-old who pitched reasonably well in 25 games. Even better, he excelled in October, with a long relief stint in Game 3 of the N.L.C.S. and a save in the World Series. He was traded after the 1971 season; the rest is Hall of Fame history.
In 1965, as a rookie left-hander for the Mets,Tug McGrawactually outdueled Sandy Koufax, causing a huge stir. Three years later, however, he was back in the minors. In 1969, he returned to the majors, and proceeded to excel in the bullpen. He was 59 when he died in 2004.
In an era when teams used fewer pitchers,Cal Koonce, McGraw and Taylor formed the everyday core of the 1969 bullpen. Koonce went 6-3 with 7 saves, but, like McAndrew, did not pitch in the postseason. He died in 1993 at the age of 52.
Of the four Mets coaches in 1969 — above from left,Yogi Berra,Rube Walker,Eddie YostandJoe Pignatano— only Pignatano, who will turn 90 in August, is still alive. In 1969, Pignatano was the coach in the bullpen, where he found room for a vegetable garden. Berra was the first-base coach and succeeded Hodges as Mets manager when Hodges died; Berra died in 2015 at age 90. Rube Walker was the Mets’ pitching coach and died in 1992 at age 66. Eddie Yost was the third-base coach and died in 2012 at age 86.
Jack DiLaurowas a jack-of-all-trades pitcher for the Mets in 1969, the only season he played with the team. He appeared in 23 games, made 4 starts, and went 1-4. He was not on the postseason roster and there is no official baseball card showing him as a Met. Other players — Donn Clendenon (acquired in June) and Bobby Pfeil, Wayne Garrett and Rod Gaspar (rookies in 1969) — are shown here with their 1970 cards.
The 1969 Topps Baseball set with 664 cards was the largest in its history as Major League Baseball added four expansion teams. Because the Nolan Ryan card is often excluded in team sets for sale, a photograph of it was provided to The Times by the National Baseball Hall of Fame.
An earlier version of this article misstated the inning in which Ron Swoboda made a great catch in Game 4 of the 1969 World Series. It was the 9th inning, not the 10th.
Supported by
2019 American League Preview
Last year’s division champions — Boston, Cleveland and Houston — seem poised to repeat, but the Yankees, A’s, Angels, Twins and Rays loom as challengers.
ByTyler Kepner
TheHouston Astrosblitzed through their first four playoff games last October, including the opener of the American League Championship Series at Fenway Park in Boston. Then they lost four in a row to the Red Sox, who went on to replace them as World Series champions.
George Springer, the most valuable player of the 2017 World Series, did not watch a moment of Boston’s triumph over the Los Angeles Dodgers. He was not despondent, though. He was simply taking time for himself after a largely satisfying season.
“A lot of people think when you lose you’re sitting at home all destroyed for a long time, but a lot has to go right to get where we got the previous year,” Springer said this spring at the Astros’ training complex in West Palm Beach, Fla. “We just got beat. One of the things about this game is you’ve got to be able to accept failure. We didn’t have a bad year. We lost in the A.L.C.S. You move on.”
[M.L.B. Season Preview: Stuffed to Its Seams]
The Astros never expected to string together championships. General Manager Jeff Luhnow, who often makes blackjack analogies, understands that sometimes, the cards will not flip his way. But the Astros keep getting a seat at the table and tipping the odds in their favor.
They turned to the free-agent market to find an ideal fit for their lineup: Michael Brantley, the former Cleveland left fielder who signed a two-year, $32 million deal. Brantley is a lefty in a right-leaning lineup, and a premier contact hitter who accentuates what the Astros do best.
Houston ranked sixth in the majors in runs last season, and only the Indians’ hitters had fewer strikeouts. Brantley had 55 extra-base hits and the second-lowest strikeout percentage in the majors, trailing only the Los Angeles Angels’ Andrelton Simmons.
“Good things happen when you put the ball in play,” said Brantley, who struck out only 60 times in 631 plate appearances. “Rallies can start with an error or a miscommunication on a fly ball; you don’t know how. You look around this locker room, not too many guys strike out in this lineup. We put the ball in play hard and take our chances.”
Opponents could make up a bit more ground against Houston this season. The Astros’ pitchers led the majors in strikeouts, but the team subsequently lost Charlie Morton to free agency and Lance McCullers Jr. to Tommy John surgery; both averaged at least 10 strikeouts per nine innings. To fill those spots — and the one left by the unsigned free agent Dallas Keuchel — the Astros will use Collin McHugh, Wade Miley and Brad Peacock or Framber Valdez, with power arms waiting in the high minors.
“We’re a pretty complete team, and that sometimes brings questions,” Manager A.J. Hinch said. “I understand why they’re there, but they don’t necessarily have to be there. We have five really good starting pitching candidates and we have some youngsters that are coming fast. The rotation’s not keeping me up at night.”
Hinch can rest easy: There may be no clear favorite among the power teams in this league, but the Astros look like the safest bet to push through to the World Series.
They have far more depth than their rivals in the A.L. West. TheOakland Athletics, who won 97 games last season, are like the buddy in your fantasy league who loads up on some categories but ignores others. In this case, the A’s have lots of sluggers, relievers andstar defenders, but no semblance of a rotation.
The A’s are good enough in those areas to at least contend, assuming a strong return by the Gold Glove-winning first baseman Matt Olson, who will miss six weeks after breaking a bone in his right hand onthe team's trip to Japan. A rotator-cuff strain to Jesus Luzardo, their top pitching prospect, hurts their depth, but if the A’s have a chance, they will find a way to make shrewd additions. One thing is certain: Designated hitter Khris Davis — the majors’ home run leader since 2016 — will bat .247. It has been his precise average ineach of the last four seasons.
TheLos Angeles Angelshave committed about $430 million to center fielderMike Troutthrough 2030. That gives them plenty of time to find a way to finally win a playoff game with the game’s best player on their roster. They think it could happen this fall.
“We’re going to be a strong offensive club: We’re going to increase our on-base percentage, and our home runs are going to be there again this year,” General Manager Billy Eppler said. “As a lot of clubs can say, health is going to be very, very important to us. We’ve been the example of what can happen to a club when you don’t have good health. If we can get north of 26 starts out of our starters, we’re going to be in a really, really good position.”
For the Angels, that could be asking too much. Their starters have a dubious health history, and adding Matt Harvey as a free agent most likely won’t alter that trend. Andrew Heaney has had elbow inflammation in spring training, and Tyler Skaggs dealt with forearm fatigue. Shohei Ohtani will hit this season, but his recovery from Tommy John surgery will keep him off the mound.
The team that truly taunted the pitching gods, though, is theTexas Rangers. All four of their new starters — Lance Lynn, Shelby Miller, Drew Smyly and Edinson Volquez — have had Tommy John surgery in the last three and a half years.
[N.L. Preview: A Deep Talent Pool Should Keep the Dodgers Afloat]
“It helps, because we can lean on each other: ‘Hey, do you feel this, what do you do between starts?’” said Smyly, who spent the last two seasons with Seattle and the Chicago Cubs, yet never threw a pitch for either team. “But at the same time, I think all of us are over talking about it. We just want to put it behind us and go play again.”
The Rangers, likewise, are eager to bury their recent past; their 95 losses last season matched their most since 1985. Their hopes for improvement rest on young hitters like Joey Gallo, Ronald Guzman, Nomar Mazara and Rougned Odor, who strike out too much but could break into stardom as the team prepares to move to a new Arlington ballpark — with a retractable roof — next season.
TheSeattle Marinersmade a noble effort to end baseball’s longest playoff drought (since 2001), but they should now replace the Rangers in the division cellar. They allowed 34 more runs than they scored last season but still finished 16 games over .500. Recognizing the anomaly, General Manager Jerry Dipoto spent the winter dumping Robinson Cano, Nelson Cruz, Edwin Diaz, James Paxton, Jean Segura, Mike Zunino and others.
Some veterans, like Jay Bruce and Edwin Encarnacion, came back as part of salary swaps. But Dipoto, baseball’s most active general manager, could trade them this summer in an effort to build a more stable foundation.
Encarnacion came to Seattle in a trade with theCleveland Indians, who shed 10 of the 21 players who appeared in their three-game division series loss to the Astros. Those 10 players will earn more than $95 million for their new teams this season, and the Indians added few veteran replacements besides Carlos Santana and Carlos Gonzalez.
The Indians won’t win the division without major contributions from shortstop Francisco Lindor, who was slowed this spring by a calf injury, and third baseman Jose Ramirez, who hit .154 from last Aug. 15 through the end of the playoffs. But their rotation is so dominant that they should still have enough offense to get by.
Only 15 major leaguers worked 175 innings while recording 200 strikeouts last season, and four were Indians: Corey Kluber, Trevor Bauer, Carlos Carrasco and Mike Clevinger. With those starters and the All-Star closer Brad Hand, the Indians should win the Central for the fourth year in a row.
TheMinnesota Twins, under new manager Rocco Baldelli, are the only team that could catch them. The Twins added the veterans Nelson Cruz, Marwin Gonzalez, C.J. Cron and Jonathan Schoop to their lineup, and a progressive new pitching coach — Wes Johnson, who came from the University of Arkansas — should help them get more from their staff.
To win, though, the Twins need more from their talented but erratic young core: Jose Berrios, Byron Buxton, Max Kepler, Jorge Polanco, Eddie Rosario and Miguel Sano. All should be in their primes, and the Twins would like to stop guessing how good they can be.
“You can dream a lot on the potential upside of that group, and you see spurts of it,” said Derek Falvey, the Twins’ president for baseball operations. “The key, in my mind, is how do you get all those guys firing together at the same time? Because if you do, that’s a really talented crew, and we haven’t quite seen the potential of that entire group all working at the same time.”
Even if they cannot catch Cleveland, the Twins could claim a wild card by feasting on the weak in the division. The bottom three teams each lost at least 98 games last season, and none have done much to improve.
While theChicago White Soxflirted with Bryce Harper and Manny Machado in free agency, they still have never given a free-agent contract richer than $68 million. They are deep in prospects, but some of the most promising ones from last spring — infielder Yoan Moncada and starter Lucas Giolito — were major disappointments in the summer. Eloy Jimenez, an electrifying rookie outfielder who signed a six-year, $43 million contract in late March, will try to change that.
TheKansas City Royalsshould at least be interesting in the way they deploy the speedsters Whit Merrifield, Billy Hamilton and Adalberto Mondesi, three of the 11 major leaguers with more than 30 stolen bases last year.This will be a painstaking rebuilding process, but the last one resulted in two pennants and the 2015 World Series title.
TheDetroit Tigersowe Miguel Cabrera $162 million for the next five seasons, a staggering figure for a player who turns 36 in April and missed most of last season with a ruptured biceps tendon. He’s a future Hall of Famer, and a renaissance season — 35 home runs — would give Cabrera 500 for his career. But there’s not much else to draw interest.
The Tigers’ former architect, Dave Dombrowski, is now the president for baseball operations for theBoston Red Soxand in 2018, he earned the championship he could never quite get in Detroit. It’s fair to expect the Red Sox to repeat in the East, but no team has successfully defended a World Series title since the 2000 Yankees.
“There’s a lot of reasons behind that, but first and foremost it’s tough to win, period,” Dombrowski said. “You get a lot of breaks when you win. Even having a good club, you need a break here or there. Sometimes, you just don’t get as many.”
The Red Sox lost no significant players from the majors’ best offense, and re-signed the postseason star Nathan Eovaldi to keep their rotation intact. Starters Chris Sale, David Price, Rick Porcello, Eovaldi and Eduardo Rodriguez cannotdouble as relieversin the regular season as they did last October, but the offense and rotation should make up for an imperfect bullpen.
“On a nightly basis, the guy on the mound is going to go give us a chance to win the game,” Manager Alex Cora said. “They go six or seven, and we know offensively who we are. It’s a good feeling.”
Unless theYankeesreach the World Series this year, the 2010s will be their first decade since the 1910s without at least one A.L. pennant. Their last was in 2009, when they won their 27th title.
“It has flown by, man, but it’s been way too long,” said outfielder Brett Gardner, the longest-tenured Yankee. “From the front office to the ownership, they go out of their way to put the best possible team on the field every year and it’s been a disappointing 10 years.”
The Yankees very well could reach the World Series, but they might have to start by hosting the wild card game for the third year in a row. The volume of injuries this spring — Dellin Betances, Didi Gregorius, Aaron Hicks, C.C. Sabathia, Luis Severino — could be easier to handle because of a forgiving early schedule: The Yankees play 19 of their first 28 games against Baltimore, the White Sox, Detroit, Kansas City and San Francisco.
The Yankees’ lineup will be fearsome, and their bullpen, with Betances, Zach Britton, Adam Ottavino, Chad Green and Aroldis Chapman, will lock down 95 victories or more. Expect a back-and-forth pennant race with Boston all summer.
Can theTampa Bay Rayselbow into the chase? They won 90 games last season, partly by defying conventional pitching roles with their opener strategy, an innovation that sprang from a logical premise.
“The whole goal is, how can we maximize the talent of our players and how can we put them in a position to succeed — and put us in a position to win as much as possible?” said Chaim Bloom, the Rays’ senior vice president for baseball operations. “Our group in the clubhouse has really high expectations, and so do we.”
The Rays plan to use two openers every five days. They could follow the opener with a so-called “bulk guy” (one pitcher who works the bulk of the middle innings) or a parade of relievers. But they need their traditional starters — Charlie Morton, Tyler Glasnow and the Cy Young Award winner Blake Snell — to produce.
“Reliable starters are the key to letting us do the opener,” Manager Kevin Cash said. “Not to put added pressure on them, but if we get good starting pitching, we can be a little bit more aggressive on the other days and mix and match a little bit more.”
Fans of theToronto Blue Jayswill start the season pining for third baseman Vladimir Guerrero Jr. and shortstop Bo Bichette, whosefatherscombined to play nearly 4,000 games in the majors. Guerrero and Bichette — Dante’s son — have played none, but both are top-10 prospects on Baseball America’s list.
Guerrero, 20, was overweight at the start of spring training and then strained an oblique muscle. Bichette, 21, was hitting .417 in exhibition games when he was sent to minor league camp. When the new manager, Charlie Montoyo, can write both names on a lineup card in Toronto, this rebuild will accelerate.
TheBaltimore Oriolesalso have a new manager, Brandon Hyde, and a new general manager,Mike Elias. Hyde came from the Chicago Cubs and Elias from the Astros, so both have seen the payoff from patient roster makeovers. They’ll need a lot of patience in Baltimore, where the Orioles just endured a franchise-record 115 losses. Elias understands the magnitude of the task.
“It’s a challenge I’m looking forward to, but we do have titans in our division year in and year out,” Elias said. “We’ve got two really good farm systems and front offices in Toronto and Tampa Bay, as well, so all four of our division competitors are mighty. We’re going to have to be very shrewd and draft and sign and develop very well.”
Tyler Kepner has been national baseball writer since 2010. He joined The Times in 2000 and covered the Mets for two seasons, then covered the Yankees from 2002 to 2009.@TylerKepner
Supported by
ByJames Wagner
TAMPA, Fla. — When the Yankees’ young slugger Aaron Judge looks up and down the team’s roster, he sees many players like him. There’s the soon-to-be-24-year-old third baseman, Miguel Andujar, who was the runner-up for the American League Rookie of the Year Award last season — just ahead of a teammate, second baseman Gleyber Torres, 22.
The opening day battery will most likely consist of 25-year-old Luis Severino, the staff ace, on the mound and Gary Sanchez, 26, crouched behind the plate. The heart of the lineup will include Judge, 26, already one of baseball’s most recognizable stars after only two full seasons.
“We’re going to be set for quite a few years to be doing a lot of good things in New York,” Judge said at the Yankees’ spring training base here.
After years of being carried by older players or building rapidly through free agency, the Yankees now have their best core of young players since the days of Derek Jeter, Jorge Posada, Mariano Rivera, Andy Pettitte and Bernie Williams coming up through the team’s system.
And while Judge is understandably optimistic about his team’s odds of competing for a World Series title, it is already fair to wonder how long this core group of players will remain together — and at what cost.
The Yankees’ decision makers, of course, have already been weighing these questions. The biggest hint the Yankees are already thinking ahead came this month:the four-year, $40 million extension, which could extend to five years, given to Severino. And they have approached other key players, like outfielderAaron Hicksand relief pitcher Dellin Betances, about possible extensions — which will weigh much heavier on the Yankees’ payroll than their current deals.
“There’s going to be paydays coming down, and we have to prepare for those,” said Brian Cashman, the Yankees’ longtime general manager.
The Yankees did not seriously pursue the star free agent Manny Machado for many reasons: his asking price (he signed for 10 years and $300 million with the San Diego Padres), a desire to spend money in several areas of the roster instead of just a few, and the fact that they already possess a talented third baseman (Andujar) and a huge contract (most ofGiancarlo Stanton’s 13-year, $325 million deal).
But one factor was the financial future of their own young standouts. To borrow Cashman’s phrasing, every dollar affects somebody else’s dollar.
“Everything is connected,” he said. “Our payrolls continue to increase, and we’re preparing and have been preparing for that as these players that we think are very special continue their journeys.”
It might seem unusual for the Yankees, whoare valued by Forbes at $4 billionand had a tradition of chasing the best free agents regardless of price under the former owner George Steinbrenner, to be concerned about the future salaries of their players. But since Steinbrenner’s heyday, baseball has implemented rules that limit spending in the amateur draft or the international market anda luxury taxthat teams generally treat as a hard cap.
That is not to say the Yankees couldn’t afford to pursue high-priced free agents and retain their young stars. But Jim Duquette, a former Mets general manager, said the highest luxury tax penalties could be a legitimate deterrent, even for teams as wealthy as the Yankees. (The Red Sox paid $12 million in penalties for their $240 million payroll in 2018 and will be penalized in the 2019 draft, but it helped them win last year’s World Series.)
“To be able to handle the luxury tax penalties in these large markets, you have to grow your own players,” Duquette said. “And if you’re competitive, you’re picking at the low end of the draft. And it’s hard to hit on the Aaron Judges of the world down at the 30s in the first round, where they drafted him.
“So when you have a core like the Yankees’, this strategy makes sense. They absolutely could afford to pay the tax, but the penalties is what makes it somewhat prohibitive.”
Last year was the first time since the luxury tax was put in place in 2003 that the Yankees avoided penalties, having dropped under the $197 million threshold. After being first or second in end-of-year payroll rankings for decades, the Yankees had a $192 million payroll that ranked sixth in baseball, according toCot’s Baseball Contracts.
The Yankees’ estimated payroll for luxury tax purposes this season is $222 million, over the first tax threshold of $206 million, according toRosterResource.com— but some relief is on the horizon with hefty contracts, like Jacoby Ellsbury’s, coming off the books in two years and C.C. Sabathia retiring after this season.
But big payouts also loom. Judge and Sanchez, among others, will see big jumps in pay in 2020, when they become eligible for salary arbitration — hence the Yankees’ stated desire to consider multiyear deals for their arbitration-eligible players or pending free-agent players.
“Free agency is tough,” Duquette said. “It’s hit or miss. If you like your player and know they fit in the organization and play well in New York, then why not try to keep them together?”
In a labor market that seems increasingly tilted toward the clubs, players no longer see free agency as the hallowed grounds they once dreamed about. Since drug testing began, teams are increasingly wary of players’ production after age 30, and one effect has been an increasing number of players signing deals considered team-friendly before reaching free agency.
The Yankees have broached extension talks with Betances and Hicks, both of whom are set to become free agents after this season. Both declined to elaborate on the level of the discussions but said they would be interested in remaining with the Yankees.
“It’s an amazing place with a great future and, of course, it’s something I’d like to be a part of,” Hicks said.
Both are intriguing cases. Hicks has blossomed in New York after being acquired in a 2015 trade, putting together the best seasons of his career the past two years. He had a career-high 27 home runs and 79 runs batted in despite only playing 137 games last season. But he has dealt with several injuries and will be a free agent at 30.
Drafted and developed by the Yankees, Betances has been one of the best and most durable relievers in baseball. Since 2014, he has a 2.22 E.R.A., better than all but four relief pitchers. What may work against Betances is his age (he will be 32 during the 2020 season) and his workload (his surgically repaired arm has thrown a lot).
“Nowadays, middle relievers are getting a lot of love,” Betances said. This off-season alone, setup men such as Jeurys Familia and Joe Kelly, as well as Betances’ teammates Adam Ottavino and Zack Britton, all scored contracts of at least $25 million.
Another pending free agent the Yankees like: shortstop Didi Gregorius, who has also improved since his trade to New York in 2014. To go along with stout defense, Gregorius has hit .277 and averaged 24 home runs over the past three years. But he will be 30 next season, and his recovery from Tommy John surgery will most likely cut his 2018 season in half.
Judge and Sanchez will make at least the league minimum of $555,000 this season. The Yankees may wait until next winter to begin long-term contract talks with the two, as they did with Severino.
“I’m focused on the season and I haven’t heard anything,” Judge said last week when asked if the Yankees had approached about his contract future.
Coming off a rough 2018 season, Sanchez would seem unlikely to entertain long-term offers now. But will Judge feel some impulse to cash in on his earning power relatively soon, given that he will not be a free agent until before his age-31 season in 2023? Or will he wait to see how the market changes when the current collective bargaining agreement, which has increasingly drawn the ire of players, expires in December 2021?
In Severino’s case, if the Yankees pick up his $15 million option for 2023, he will be a free agent entering his age-30 season. For the time being, Severino seems perfectly happy with having secured a new deal.
“It gives me a lot of confidence,” he said. “Every time I got to the gym, I’ll be smiling. It’s a lot security for my family.”



Supported by
2019 National League Preview
Los Angeles has a strong chance to become the first team since the 1923 Yankees to lose two World Series in a row and return for a third try.
ByTyler Kepner
The final out of the last World Series exemplified theLos Angeles Dodgers’ resourcefulness and torment. The year before, they had lost the World Series to the Houston Astros when their star shortstop, Corey Seager, grounded out to end Game 7. Last fall, long after Seager had been lost for the season to injury, his replacement,Manny Machado, struck out to clinch the title for the Boston Red Sox.
The Dodgers simply excel at talent acquisition, loading their roster with more solid players — and the occasional superstar — than any other team in the majors. Yet they’ve suffered the indignity of losing the last two World Series on their home field.
Those defeats may obscure just how good the Dodgers really are. They have a strong chance to become the first team since the 1923 Yankees to lose two World Series in a row and return for a third try.
“Last year was probably the most talented team I’ve ever been around, but it didn’t necessarily perform like that on a nightly basis,” said Andrew Friedman, the Dodgers’ president for baseball operations. “We led the N.L. in runs scored, we led the N.L. in fewest runs allowed, but it was just kind of the choppiness of it. For us, a lot of it is how to be as consistent as we can be, bring our talent to the forefront as many nights as we possibly can.”
[M.L.B. Season Preview: Stuffed to Its Seams]
Talent was everywhere on the roster last season, and this one should be no different. By Baseball Prospectus’s calculations, the Dodgers had 18 players with at least two wins above replacement for them last season. No other team had more than 13 such players, and the average team had seven.
That depth allows Manager Dave Roberts to aggressively exploit matchup advantages on offense, and to use his starting pitchers with extreme caution. The Dodgers are the only team that has not used a pitcher for 180 innings in any of the last three seasons.
They will be tempted this season to unleash Walker Buehler, who sparkled last fall in a one-game playoff with Colorado for the National League West title; in Game 7 of the National League Championship Series clincher in Milwaukee; and in the Dodgers’ only victory in the World Series, when he shut out the Red Sox for seven innings.
Buehler, 24, is not the only young homegrown starter who could make a major impact this season. The left-hander Julio Urias, 22, showed in October that he was past the shoulder trouble that cost him nearly two seasons.
“There’s really no pitch limit for Walker, but we’re going to see how his body’s reacting, how he feels and have that open line of communication,” Roberts said. “With Julio, it’s been abbreviated for him the last couple of years, so to say he has a clear runway I don’t think is fair to him. But I do know that he’s going to impact us this year.”
Buehler and the veteran Clayton Kershaw have taken it slowly in spring training, but with the Dodgers, it is hard to tell the difference between hurt and injured. They play the long game in Los Angeles, where arriving at full strength in October is all that matters.
The Dodgers lost a few contributors from last year’s team, but added center fielder A.J. Pollock, who was a force for Arizona when healthy; reliever Joe Kelly, whom they plan to use in an expanded setup role that could stretch him to 90 innings; and the grizzled catcher Russell Martin, who had a .338 on-base percentage for Toronto last year. Martin’s .194 batting average did not bother the Dodgers, Friedman said, because he consistently made hard contact.
Martin, 36, has played in five league championship series without ever advancing to the World Series. This could be the year he gets there — and, with any luck, he just might leap into the arms of closer Kenley Jansen after the final out.
Then again, theColorado Rockiesare conceding nothing in pursuit of their first division title. They signed Daniel Murphy to play first base and gave third baseman Nolan Arenado an eight-year,$260 million contract extensionlast month. The entire team surprised Arenado by attending the news conference announcing the deal.
“I love playing with this group,” said Arenado, who fought back tears for a moment. “I really believe we can win. I wouldn’t make this decision if I didn’t believe that.”
The Rockies’ pitching carried them last season, setting club records for most strikeouts, lowest WHIP (walks-plus-hits per inning pitched) and fewest hits allowed in a nonstrike season. Kyle Freeland and German Marquez were rotation stalwarts, and Scott Oberg and Wade Davis (who allowed one run in the regular season after Aug. 9)stabilized a bullpen that will count on a full season from Seunghwan Ohto offset the loss of Adam Ottavino to the Yankees.
While Colorado kept its cornerstone, theArizona Diamondbacksshed theirs, trading first baseman Paul Goldschmidt to St. Louis. They have not done much to replace the production of Goldschmidt and Pollock, but withZack Greinke, Robbie Ray, Zack Godley and Luke Weaver in the rotation, they expect to compete.
“We’re trying to make a shift here,” Manager Torey Lovullo said. “We’re going to rely on the pitching and defense and we’re going to make up for some offensive losses in other ways.”
Reverse-engineer the Diamondbacks and you’d get theSan Diego Padres, who added a middle-of-the-order slugger with infielder Manny Machado but have a painfully inexperienced rotation led by Joey Lucchesi.
The Padres will soon let loosea flood of prospects, so it is hard to predict how close they really are to contending. But starter Chris Paddack and shortstop Fernando Tatis Jr. offered tantalizing spring training glimpses of the kind of young, cheap talent that enabled the Padres to afford a 10-year, $300 million contract for Machado.
[A.L. Preview: How Hard Will It Be for the Red Sox to Repeat? Ask the Astros]
“You need to have quality young players that are making major-league minimums, or prearbitration salaries, to enable you to go out and sign some bigger-dollar players, especially in our market, where it’s not unlimited funds,” General Manager A.J. Preller said. “We feel that we’ve built up the talent base to enable us to get into conversations for Machado and some of the big-name free agents.”
Speaking of Machado, Preller added: “You see it in the energy here at the complex. It raises the level of competition for everybody.”
Will it raise the Padres’ place in the standings? They should at least move past theSan Francisco Giants, who did not improve an offense that ranked 29th of 30 teams in runslast season, ahead of only Miami. This will be the final season for Giants Manager Bruce Bochy, who is 74 victories shy of 2,000 in his career. He will need a lot of luck to get there.
Every N.L. Central team expects to contend, which makes this the most intriguing division in the majors. TheMilwaukee Brewerswon it last season — in a one-game playoff over the Chicago Cubs — before their joy ride ended in that Game 7 loss to the Dodgers in the N.L.C.S. They know they might have missed their best chance to bring the World Series to Miller Park.
“It’s so difficult to put yourself in that position ever again,” outfielder Ryan Braun said. “We could have a much better team, a much better regular season, but things have to go right to get to a place where you have a Game 7 to get to the World Series — at home, with the pitcher we want on the mound, after we had just won Game 6 and felt great about our chances. I’m grateful for the opportunity, but it’s not an easy thing to get over.”
The Brewers hope to get over it byfinding an ace or twofrom a group of rookies who pitched mostly in relief in October: Corbin Burnes, Freddy Peralta and Brandon Woodruff. They will again lean heavily on a strong bullpen and slugging lineup that includes the Most Valuable Player Award winner,Christian Yelich, and a new catcher, Yasmani Grandal, who hit 24 home runs with an .815 on-base plus slugging percentage for the Dodgers last season.
The Dodgers benched Grandal for most of the postseason after he struggled on defense in Game 1 of the N.L.C.S. in Milwaukee. That diminished Grandal’s value but gave the Brewers an opportunity: a one-year, $18.25 million contract that could be a steal.
“Look, guys go into defensive slumps,” General Manager David Stearns said. “We focused on the entirety of what we think he can contribute to our team, and we think it’s meaningful: He’s a very good receiver, he’s a good framer, he handles a pitching staff well, and he can control the running game.”
TheSt. Louis Cardinalswent 41-28 last season for Manager Mike Shildt, who replaced the fired Mike Matheny in mid-July. It wasn’t quite enough to lift them to the playoffs, but they should return this year after a three-year absence — an interminable gap for their regal brand.
“It’s a long time, I know,” said John Mozeliak, the president for baseball operations. “We’re very aware of it.”
In Goldschmidt, Marcell Ozuna and Matt Carpenter, the Cardinals have three elite run producers to go with slick defenders like center fielder Harrison Bader, second baseman Kolten Wong and catcher Yadier Molina, who is 36 and just won his ninth Gold Glove. Jack Flaherty could be a breakout rotation star, and Jordan Hicks — who threw 41 pitches last season that hit103 miles per hour or higher— will form an imposing relief duo with the newcomer Andrew Miller.
TheChicago Cubsfinally solved Miller in Game 7 of the 2016 World Series in Cleveland, when they completed a comeback and won their first championship since 1908. They have not returned to the World Series, and last season’s wild-card flameout put the clubhouse on notice: Theo Epstein, the president for baseball operations,has vowed “sweeping changes”if he does not see improvement.
Manager Joe Maddon is working in the final year of his contract, surrounded by new coaches but a roster that still includes more than half of the players who appeared for the Cubs in the World Series. The core deserves one more chance, and another title would be no surprise. But given the strength of the division, neither would third place.
TheCincinnati Redsare the only team in the majors with at least 90 losses in each of the last four seasons. That streakshould end now, because the Reds can finally pair their solid offense with a respectable rotation: Luis Castillo, Anthony DeSclafani, Sonny Gray, Tanner Roark and Alex Wood. If they were in the A.L. Central, the Reds might be the favorites. The N.L. version is much different.
“I’ll tell you right now, this is the best division in baseball,” said Reds reliever Jared Hughes, who has also played for Pittsburgh and Milwaukee. “We’re always incredibly competitive from top to bottom. The goal is to win the division, to win the World Series, and the vibe coming in is that we’re capable of doing that. But there’s no complacency in the N.L. Central.”
ThePittsburgh Piratescan also dream big because of five exceptional pitchers: starters Jameson Taillon, Chris Archer and Trevor Williams and relievers Felipe Vazquezand Keone Kela. But their middling offense got few upgrades, and right fielder Gregory Polanco will spend at least the first month recovering from shoulder surgery.
Across Pennsylvania, thePhiladelphia Phillieswere the clear winners of the off-season — a meaningless title, of course, but reason enough to consider them the East favorites, despite going 8-20 last September to spoil a promising season.
“We had a lot of holes to fill, that was the conclusion,” saidJohn Middleton, the Phillies’ managing partner. “When you look at the rubble of the last six weeks of the ’18 season, we weren’t a player away from being a good team. We were a bunch of players away.”
General Manager Matt Klentak started by acquiring shortstop Jean Segura from Seattle as part of a deal for Carlos Santana, a masterstroke that allowed Rhys Hoskins to move back to first base from left field, where Andrew McCutchen now plays after signing as a free agent. Klentak also signed reliever David Robertson and traded for the game’s best catcher, J.T. Realmuto.
It was a good winter — and then the Phillies signed Bryce Harper, the former Nationals star, for 13 years and $330 million.
“To have him in this clubhouse is deflating for the teams in our division, so it’s a great feeling to be on this side,” starter Jake Arrieta said. “Not that the teams in our division are scared, by any means, I don’t think that’s the case. But we definitely appreciate the organization signing a guy like Harper and bringing in the pieces we have.”
TheWashington Nationalsshould still reach the playoffs, with Patrick Corbin joining Max Scherzer and Stephen Strasburg in an overpowering rotation. Their three best hitters — Anthony Rendon, Juan Soto and Trea Turner — have somehow never made an All-Star team, but that should change this summer.
The reigning division champions, the prospect-richAtlanta Braves, added third baseman Josh Donaldson and catcher Brian McCann but otherwise stood pat. That may prove to be wise in time, but for now it leaves themlooking vulnerable as pitchers Mike Foltynewicz, A.J. Minter and Mike Soroka start the season on the injured list.
Injuries also struck early for theMets, whotried to build a deeper rosterthis winter but will open without infielders Jed Lowrie (knee) and Todd Frazier (oblique). Frazier is 33, Lowrie is 34, and second baseman Robinson Cano is 36. But the under-30 hitters look good, and with Jacob deGrom atop the rotation and Edwin Diaz as the closer, the Mets have a chance.
“I truly believe that we can and will win,” said Brodie Van Wagenen, the new general manager. He has to say that, of course, and his moves have been encouraging — but probably not enough, given the persistent injury risks on the roster, to change the Mets’ spot in the standings.
TheMiami Marlinswill be picked for last place in every reasonable forecast. The chief executive, Derek Jeter, got his wish and had the team’s mechanicalhome run sculpturemoved to the outside of Marlins Park. The display was whimsical and fun, but it would not have been used much, anyway — no player on this threadbare roster hit more than 13 homers last season.
Tyler Kepner has been national baseball writer since 2010. He joined The Times in 2000 and covered the Mets for two seasons, then covered the Yankees from 2002 to 2009.@TylerKepner
Supported by
ByLiam Stack
The mayor of San Francisco endorsed a call by civic groups on Monday for Major League Baseball to impose a serious penalty on the chief executive of the San Francisco Giants fora public altercation with his wifethat was caught on video this month.
A coalition of women’s groupsposted an open letteronline Monday that called on Commissioner Rob Manfred to commit to “firm and appropriate action in disciplining” the executive, Larry Baer.
The letter said Mr. Baer “cannot be allowed to resume his high-profile role without significant consequences and accountability.”
The mayor, London N. Breed, said in a statement that she agreed that “Major League Baseball needs to send a message that any and all acts of violence against women is unacceptable.”
“Every little girl, every woman should be able to attend a Giants game with a clear sense of the organization’s values,” Ms. Breed said. “I share in the call to action by the women who have written the commissioner calling for greater accountability.”
The video clip, which was firstposted by TMZ Sports, appeared to show Mr. Baer and his wife, Pam, arguing in a public plaza. Ms. Baer was sitting in a chair, and her husband was standing next to her.
Mr. Baer was shown lunging for something in his wife’s hand and then forcefully grabbing her, setting off a struggle that included her falling to the ground and screaming, “Oh my God!”
After the video of the episode, which occurred on March 1, became public, Mr. and Ms. Baer released statements that day denying that a physical altercation had taken place.
“Regrettably today we had a heated argument in public over a family matter,” the couple said in a statement. “We are deeply embarrassed by the situation and have resolved the issue.”
Ms. Baer later released a statement that said she fell accidentally when her chair “began to tip.”
“Due to an injury I sustained in my foot three days ago, I lost my balance,” she said. “I did not sustain any injury based on what happened today. Larry and I always have been and still are happily married.”
The San Francisco Police Department said Monday that it had investigated the episode and submitted its findings to the office of District Attorney George Gascón. Max Szabo, a spokesman for Mr. Gascón’s office, confirmed that the matter was under review.
A spokesman for Major League Baseball did not immediately respond to a request for comment on Monday. But after the video became public, the league said it was aware of the episode and would "immediately begin to gather the facts.”
A spokesman for the Giants said Monday that Mr. Baer was unavailable for comment. In a statement, the team said it appreciated “the sentiments and perspectives expressed” by the mayor and the civic groups that wrote the open letter.
“We have worked closely with the mayor and with many of the women who authored the letter and we deeply respect them and their work in the community,” the statement said. “We take this matter very seriously and we appreciate their concerns. Because it is currently under review, we have no further comment at this time.”
The open letter was signed by a half-dozen local groups and several civic leaders, including the president of the San Francisco Commission on the Status of Women, a past president of the organization and a member of the board of directors of Bay Area Rapid Transit.
The letter did not specify how its signatories would like to see Mr. Baer punished, but it did provide a list of suggestions, including a strong public statement from the league and the requirement that Mr. Baer undergo treatment, pay a "substantial financial penalty” or face a “significant suspension” from activities involving the Giants or the league.
“While Mr. Baer has expressed regret for his behavior, we believe this incident represents more than an embarrassing private quarrel that spilled into public view,” the letter said. “It is a test of how seriously Major League Baseball views its responsibility to hold its leaders, as it does with its players, to the highest standards of personal conduct.”

Supported by
Sports of The Times
ByMichael Powell
Just for kicks I listened as Brodie Van Wagenen, the Mets’ general manager, went on about signing the oft-injured 35-year-old second baseman Jed Lowrie and reporters sounded entranced by his jive.
Have you, they asked, thought of bidding on outfielder Bryce Harper or infielder Manny Machado, the two young star free agents who improbably have attracted not much attention this winter?
Van Wagenen, a smooth-talking agent who has become a smooth-talking general manager, smiled genially. “Let’s be candid here,” he said. “The outfield is probably not our top priority at this point.” Jeff McNeil, a career minor leaguer until last July, was going out to the outfield, Van Wagenen said, and “he gives us another really good weapon.”
That the Mets, a little market club hard by Flushing Bay, will play it cheap is a well-established fact. But Van Wagenen speaks the management palaver of choice this parsimonious winter. No one wants to spend money.
The Cubs, the Yankees, the Dodgers, the Giants, the Cardinals, the Braves, the Rangers and the Angels — all have apparently passed on making a bid for Harper and Machado. Each franchise is owned by a wealthy man (or family) in a wealth-laden sport and all could presumably find a place in the lineup for one of these young stars. And yet for the second season in a row, at a time of the off-season when the best free agents typically would have already signed handsome new contracts, most owners have tucked away their wallets and claimed to need no more talent.
Candidly, Van Wagenen’s reasoning for the Mets’ disinterest is good for a giggle. McNeil is a late-blooming minor league second baseman who in a few nice months in the majors hit three home runs and knocked in 19 runs. He’s a career infielder without a career to speak of.
Harper, by way of no comparison, last season hit 34 home runs, walked 130 times, scored 103 runs and knocked in 100. He is a former rookie of the year and league M.V.P., and he’s all of 26. To suggest you will pass on Harper in hopes that McNeil finds his outfield legs is — with no offense intended to the McNeil family — whacked.
Machado and Harper are not the only quality free agents left flapping in the wind. Dallas Keuchel, a good starting pitcher, and Mike Moustakas, a fine third baseman who hit 28 homers last year, have elicited little interest. Craig Kimbrel, that world champion Red Sox closer with 42 saves? Give him a call, he’d probably like to chat. Yasmani Grandal, the best catcher on the market, was expected to command a multiyear contract. He could scrounge up no better than a one-year, $16 million deal with the Milwaukee Brewers.
The Major League Baseball Players Association projects at least 12 of baseball’s 30 teams will start 2019 with a “substantially lower payroll” than 2018. Only four or five are expected to show a significant increase. “Players are well past ‘concerned,’” Bruce Meyer, the union’s director of collective bargaining, told me. “At a time when industry revenues and club valuations are growing for the second straight off-season, an alarming number of clubs are declining to compete for the many talented players.”
Major League Baseball officials claim to see no problem. The deputy commissioner, Dan Halem, helped negotiate the last collective bargaining agreement with the players union, and he says labor’s portion of nearly $11 billion in baseball revenues has held steady. His estimate includes players in baseball’s vast minor league system, though, none of whom are in the union and some fair number of whom — thanks to baseball’s lobbying with Congress — make less than the minimum wage.
Baseball drove down a road that looked suspiciously like this one between 1985 and 1987 and that ended in a multicar collision with three separate findings that its owners had engaged in illegal collusion to hold down player salaries. The owners paid penalties of $280 million plus interest to the players, and in the 1990s the sport weathered brutal strikes that owed to the residual bitterness.
The former baseball commissioner Fay Vincent, appointed by the owners and no Marxist, was moved at that time to remark to the owners: “The single biggest reality you guys have to face up to is collusion. You stole $280 million from the players, and the players are unified to a man around that issue, because you got caught and many of you are still involved.”
I possess no proof the current generation of extremely rich owners have acted as stupidly as their predecessors. For now the flaccid free-agent market is simply … odd.
The management of this column readily acknowledges the best of the marooned free agents will not be left to scratch nickels together. Harper seeks a contract north of $300 million for 10 years, and Machado entered free agency entranced by similar sugarplum visions. It is all but assured that one day their descendants will decant a fine Bordeaux and offer a heartfelt Thanksgiving toast to dear old grandpa Bryce and Manny.
And so what? Megawatt talents in many professions profit handsomely, a point lost on a writer from Bleacher Report who loosened an ancient grouse: These free agents arepaid “silly” money to “play a children’s game.”
Yes, and playing pretend as a child can lead to movie stardom and an adolescent’s toe-shoed spin can lead to the City Ballet — provided you have great talent and a work ethic to match.
I digress.
Baseball officials justify the new parsimony with a bow to analytics. We will not sign this or that star because we or some other team once paid out a bad contract. This player became too old, this one too slow, that one too bald, and the thought of a bad contract gives us a stomachache.
“General managers are extremely analytical, and they tend as a group to make the most efficient decisions possible,” M.L.B.’s Halem told me.
Six years ago, the Angels gave Albert Pujols a 10-year, $254 million contract and that indeed edged to frontiers of nuttiness. He was 32 when he signed it and already past his prime. His once-fabulous eye for balls and strikes slowly deserted him, and a man who once led the league in hitting has not surmounted .250 the past two seasons. With years to go, Pujols’s contract is a mothball special.
Harper and Machado are not Pujols. Each man is entering his golden prime and with a reasonable expectation they will produce at a high level for many seasons to come.
The owners have perhaps snookered a baseball union grown a touch complacent. They regularly manipulate the service time of young players, which works this way: Teams control players for six seasons before they become eligible for free agency. So clubs put thumb to scale and wait to bring up even their very best players until late May or early June. This pushes back the rookie’s service time and saves the club many millions of dollars.
The difference when a player reaches free agency is grand. In 2015, Harper led the league with 42 homers and a .460 on base percentage and was voted the National League’s Most Valuable Player. He earned $2.5 million. Next year, he is likely to pull down close to $30 million.
The union has tended to tolerate service manipulations, figuring its members would recoup any lost money in free agency. Unlike football and basketball, baseball has no salary cap. It also has no floor, though, and now owners are squeezing players on either end like so many papayas in a juicer.
Baseball owners and the abacus boys would do well not to grow self-satisfied. Attendance took a decided drop last year, and the lack of a competitive market has set players in pro sports’ most powerful union to grumbling. Christian Yelich, this year’s National League M.V.P., stopped by The New York Times last week and said players are talking about the strange sloth in the free-agent market.
“They’re two of the best players that we have in the game,” he said. “The process hasn’t played out.”
Last winter, amid another slow free-agent market, Dodgers closer Kenley Jansen tossed a high fastball at the chin of owners. “Maybe we have to go on strike, to be honest with you,” he said then.
Perhaps a knockdown pitch is the best way to wake up a team of complacent billionaires.
An earlier version of this article misstated the number of teams in Major League Baseball. There are 30, not 32.
Email: powellm@nytimes.com



Supported by
Mets 7, Marlins 3
ByKevin Armstrong
MIAMI — After he blasted a 95-mile-per-hour fastball more than 400 feet to center field in the ninth inning of the Mets’ 7-3 win on Monday night, Pete Alonso was the last player into the clubhouse.
Teammates held Bud Lights in their hands and shouted for Alonso, the rookie first baseman, to hurry. They were ready to celebrate the first home run of his major league career.
He jumped into a laundry cart at Marlins Park, and they wheeled him into the shower. He was doused with beer, barbecue sauce, ketchup, mustard, eggs and relish. He kept his mouth shut the whole time as his eyes started to burn.
“That was really cool,” he said. “I didn’t know that was a thing.”
The Mets and the rest of Major League Baseball have quickly learned that Alonso, 24, is the real thing. After stroking hard-hit doubles against the Nationals over the weekend, Alonso delivered his first long ball when the Mets, with a fresh one-run lead in the ninth inning, needed some insurance. One at-bat earlier, Amed Rosario’s run-scoring single had broken a 3-3 tie.
Though the Mets trailed early and committed two errors, Alonso’s strength on his three-run homer allowed them to finish off the Miami Marlins to improve to 3-1.
“That was a crush job,” said the Mets’ clubhouse manager, Kevin Kierst, as he bumped fists with Alonso in the hallway afterward.
With the Mets fresh off a series victory over the Washington Nationals, Manager Mickey Callaway urged his players to remain focused. While the Marlins had managed a four-game split with the Colorado Rockies over the weekend, most of Miami’s new lineup lacked name recognition.
“They’re a little bit of the unknown,” Callaway said.
Caleb Smith, a Miami left-hander, introduced himself by striking out the side in the top of the first. His second baseman, Starlin Castro, followed with a two-run home run to left field in the bottom of the inning.
The Mets made mistakes early. One day after Tomas Nido, the reserve catcher, was charged with a throwing error, the starting catcher Wilson Ramos allowed a passed ball on a third strike to the first batter. Three batters later, Castro delivered his home run.
Left fielder Jeff McNeil also committed his first error of the season, overrunning the ball while chasing a foul pop. He followed that with a strikeout in the top of the sixth. Callaway removed him from the game when he took out starter Steven Matz in the sixth. Matz surrendered three runs, but only one was earned.
“We have to take care of business,” Callaway said. “We have to execute the way we know we can.”
Alonso did just that in the ninth. Closer Edwin Diaz then collected three strikeouts in the bottom of the inning to preserve the win.
Alonso was the person teammates waited for in the clubhouse, though.
“There’s excitement there in this room,” Callaway said. “And there should be for a long time.”


Keeping Score
Just four years after Major League Baseball’s integration, Newcombe won 20 games for the Dodgers. That was the start of an extraordinary club.
Don Newcombe was the first black player to win 20 games. He did so three times in his career.CreditCreditAssociated Press
Supported by
ByBenjamin Hoffman
When Dave Stewart reported to big league camp for the Los Angeles Dodgers in the mid-1970s, he did so as one of baseball’s rarities: a black starting pitcher.
Fortunately for Stewart, Don Newcombe was in camp to walk the teenager through those early days, setting Stewart up for future stardom.
“His influence on me is beyond words,” Stewart said. “I can’t even tell you how huge it was for me to meet him at the time I did in my career.”
Being around Newcombe,who died on Tuesday at 92, gave Stewart unfiltered access to what Mudcat Grant, another top black pitcher, would one day describe as a Black Ace. Grant,who wrote a book on the subject, had simple criteria for that distinction: an American- or Canadian-born black player who won 20 games in a season. That’s it.
Newcombe did it first, winning 20 for the Brooklyn Dodgers in 1951, just four seasons after his eventual teammateJackie Robinson broke baseball’s color barrier. In the 67 seasons since, 195 pitchers besides Newcombe have recorded a 20-win season, and only 14 of them were black — a select list that includes Stewart, who won at least 20 games in four consecutive seasons, from 1987 to 1990.
Making wins the sole criterion for being a Black Ace may seem antiquated, but Stewart said the 20-win mark represented something beyond the technical definition of the statistic. To him, 20 wins showed that the player was a workhorse, shouldering a burden for his teammates by taking them deep into games.
Vida Blue, a three-time 20-game winner, said that the standard worked because it set a high bar of success among an already-select group of people.
“To become a starting pitcher in itself was unique,” he said. “It’s no different than being a black quarterback.”
Out of Grant’s book emerged a support group of sorts. There were initially 12 Black Aces — Newcombe, Sam Jones, Bob Gibson, Grant, Ferguson Jenkins, Earl Wilson, Al Downing, Blue, J.R. Richard, Mike Norris, Dwight Gooden and Stewart — and Grant organized events for some of them to attend, reached out to young players and pushed for recognition for the Black Aces’ accomplishments.
“This group deserves to be more than just a footnote in baseball history,” said Bob Kendrick, the president of theNegro Leagues Baseball Museum. “If it takes the passing of Don Newcombe to help us reflect and remember, then that’s another gift that he has given us.”
Why haven’t there been more Black Aces in recent years? There are two popular explanations: Winning 20 games is remarkably difficult in modern baseball, and there simply aren’t that many black players on major league rosters.
Last year, there was an uptick in the latter, with the number of black players from the United States and Canada on opening-day active rosters rising to 8.4 percent, according to Major League Baseball, but that was well below the sport’s high-water mark of 19 percent, in 1986. Among that 8.4 percent, black starting pitchers were a minority within another minority, a group that includes Sabathia, Price, Chris Archer and Tyson Ross.
Blue, who reached the majors in 1969, thought the explanation could be as simple as athletes who choose baseball over football or basketball wanting to play a position that had more action. But according to Kendrick, the scarcity of black pitchers goes all the way back to the early days of integration, and that, at least initially, it wasn’t the players making the decision.
“During that era of the Negro Leagues, the pitching position, the catching position and the shortstop position were all seen as cerebral positions,” he said. “You had this underlying belief that black athletes weren’t smart enough to do it.”
Newcombe emphatically proved any doubters wrong. He established himself as a front-line starter in his first three seasons, with a 56-28 record and 3.39 earned run average. After missing two seasons because of military service, and then struggling in his first year back, he soared to new heights in 1955, helping to lead the Dodgers to their first World Series title.
In 1956, a season that ended with a loss to the Yankees in the World Series, Newcombe not only won 27 games and the National League’s Most Valuable Player Award, but he also was named the first winner of the newly established Cy Young Award, which that season was given to the best pitcher in the majors.
Newcombe, by his own frequent admissions, struggled with alcohol in his career, which most likely contributed to a steep decline after the 1956 season. His major league career ended abruptly in 1960, and his playing days came to an unusual end in 1962 with a brief sojourn to Japan, where he played mostly as an outfielder. But Newcombe quit drinking and was back working with the Dodgers by 1970, positioning him for his eventual role mentoring Stewart and dozens of other players, including the Dodgers’ current closer, Kenley Jansen.
It was Newcombe’s innate ability to relate his experiences to young players that Kendrick said would leave a “gaping void” after the star player’s death.
“Every time we lose one of these guys that window of opportunity closes just a little more,” he said. “At some point in time there won’t be any Negro league players left to attest to what that league was all about.”
But from one Black Ace to another, Newcombe taught Stewart the value of being there when new black starters come along. And Stewart said he was proud that both Sabathia and Willis have acknowledged the influence he had on their careers.
“For those guys, I was present when they needed me,” Stewart said.
Newcombe wouldn’t have had it any other way.
Benjamin Hoffman is a senior staff editor and regular contributor to theKeeping Score columnin sports. He joined The Times in 2005.@BenHoffmanNYT•Facebook
Advertisement
Keeping Score
Just four years after Major League Baseball’s integration, Newcombe won 20 games for the Dodgers. That was the start of an extraordinary club.
Don Newcombe was the first black player to win 20 games. He did so three times in his career.CreditCreditAssociated Press
Supported by
ByBenjamin Hoffman
When Dave Stewart reported to big league camp for the Los Angeles Dodgers in the mid-1970s, he did so as one of baseball’s rarities: a black starting pitcher.
Fortunately for Stewart, Don Newcombe was in camp to walk the teenager through those early days, setting Stewart up for future stardom.
“His influence on me is beyond words,” Stewart said. “I can’t even tell you how huge it was for me to meet him at the time I did in my career.”
Being around Newcombe,who died on Tuesday at 92, gave Stewart unfiltered access to what Mudcat Grant, another top black pitcher, would one day describe as a Black Ace. Grant,who wrote a book on the subject, had simple criteria for that distinction: an American- or Canadian-born black player who won 20 games in a season. That’s it.
Newcombe did it first, winning 20 for the Brooklyn Dodgers in 1951, just four seasons after his eventual teammateJackie Robinson broke baseball’s color barrier. In the 67 seasons since, 195 pitchers besides Newcombe have recorded a 20-win season, and only 14 of them were black — a select list that includes Stewart, who won at least 20 games in four consecutive seasons, from 1987 to 1990.
Making wins the sole criterion for being a Black Ace may seem antiquated, but Stewart said the 20-win mark represented something beyond the technical definition of the statistic. To him, 20 wins showed that the player was a workhorse, shouldering a burden for his teammates by taking them deep into games.
Vida Blue, a three-time 20-game winner, said that the standard worked because it set a high bar of success among an already-select group of people.
“To become a starting pitcher in itself was unique,” he said. “It’s no different than being a black quarterback.”
Out of Grant’s book emerged a support group of sorts. There were initially 12 Black Aces — Newcombe, Sam Jones, Bob Gibson, Grant, Ferguson Jenkins, Earl Wilson, Al Downing, Blue, J.R. Richard, Mike Norris, Dwight Gooden and Stewart — and Grant organized events for some of them to attend, reached out to young players and pushed for recognition for the Black Aces’ accomplishments.
“This group deserves to be more than just a footnote in baseball history,” said Bob Kendrick, the president of theNegro Leagues Baseball Museum. “If it takes the passing of Don Newcombe to help us reflect and remember, then that’s another gift that he has given us.”
Why haven’t there been more Black Aces in recent years? There are two popular explanations: Winning 20 games is remarkably difficult in modern baseball, and there simply aren’t that many black players on major league rosters.
Last year, there was an uptick in the latter, with the number of black players from the United States and Canada on opening-day active rosters rising to 8.4 percent, according to Major League Baseball, but that was well below the sport’s high-water mark of 19 percent, in 1986. Among that 8.4 percent, black starting pitchers were a minority within another minority, a group that includes Sabathia, Price, Chris Archer and Tyson Ross.
Blue, who reached the majors in 1969, thought the explanation could be as simple as athletes who choose baseball over football or basketball wanting to play a position that had more action. But according to Kendrick, the scarcity of black pitchers goes all the way back to the early days of integration, and that, at least initially, it wasn’t the players making the decision.
“During that era of the Negro Leagues, the pitching position, the catching position and the shortstop position were all seen as cerebral positions,” he said. “You had this underlying belief that black athletes weren’t smart enough to do it.”
Newcombe emphatically proved any doubters wrong. He established himself as a front-line starter in his first three seasons, with a 56-28 record and 3.39 earned run average. After missing two seasons because of military service, and then struggling in his first year back, he soared to new heights in 1955, helping to lead the Dodgers to their first World Series title.
In 1956, a season that ended with a loss to the Yankees in the World Series, Newcombe not only won 27 games and the National League’s Most Valuable Player Award, but he also was named the first winner of the newly established Cy Young Award, which that season was given to the best pitcher in the majors.
Newcombe, by his own frequent admissions, struggled with alcohol in his career, which most likely contributed to a steep decline after the 1956 season. His major league career ended abruptly in 1960, and his playing days came to an unusual end in 1962 with a brief sojourn to Japan, where he played mostly as an outfielder. But Newcombe quit drinking and was back working with the Dodgers by 1970, positioning him for his eventual role mentoring Stewart and dozens of other players, including the Dodgers’ current closer, Kenley Jansen.
It was Newcombe’s innate ability to relate his experiences to young players that Kendrick said would leave a “gaping void” after the star player’s death.
“Every time we lose one of these guys that window of opportunity closes just a little more,” he said. “At some point in time there won’t be any Negro league players left to attest to what that league was all about.”
But from one Black Ace to another, Newcombe taught Stewart the value of being there when new black starters come along. And Stewart said he was proud that both Sabathia and Willis have acknowledged the influence he had on their careers.
“For those guys, I was present when they needed me,” Stewart said.
Newcombe wouldn’t have had it any other way.
Benjamin Hoffman is a senior staff editor and regular contributor to theKeeping Score columnin sports. He joined The Times in 2005.@BenHoffmanNYT•Facebook
Advertisement
Keeping Score
Just four years after Major League Baseball’s integration, Newcombe won 20 games for the Dodgers. That was the start of an extraordinary club.
Don Newcombe was the first black player to win 20 games. He did so three times in his career.CreditCreditAssociated Press
Supported by
ByBenjamin Hoffman
When Dave Stewart reported to big league camp for the Los Angeles Dodgers in the mid-1970s, he did so as one of baseball’s rarities: a black starting pitcher.
Fortunately for Stewart, Don Newcombe was in camp to walk the teenager through those early days, setting Stewart up for future stardom.
“His influence on me is beyond words,” Stewart said. “I can’t even tell you how huge it was for me to meet him at the time I did in my career.”
Being around Newcombe,who died on Tuesday at 92, gave Stewart unfiltered access to what Mudcat Grant, another top black pitcher, would one day describe as a Black Ace. Grant,who wrote a book on the subject, had simple criteria for that distinction: an American- or Canadian-born black player who won 20 games in a season. That’s it.
Newcombe did it first, winning 20 for the Brooklyn Dodgers in 1951, just four seasons after his eventual teammateJackie Robinson broke baseball’s color barrier. In the 67 seasons since, 195 pitchers besides Newcombe have recorded a 20-win season, and only 14 of them were black — a select list that includes Stewart, who won at least 20 games in four consecutive seasons, from 1987 to 1990.
Making wins the sole criterion for being a Black Ace may seem antiquated, but Stewart said the 20-win mark represented something beyond the technical definition of the statistic. To him, 20 wins showed that the player was a workhorse, shouldering a burden for his teammates by taking them deep into games.
Vida Blue, a three-time 20-game winner, said that the standard worked because it set a high bar of success among an already-select group of people.
“To become a starting pitcher in itself was unique,” he said. “It’s no different than being a black quarterback.”
Out of Grant’s book emerged a support group of sorts. There were initially 12 Black Aces — Newcombe, Sam Jones, Bob Gibson, Grant, Ferguson Jenkins, Earl Wilson, Al Downing, Blue, J.R. Richard, Mike Norris, Dwight Gooden and Stewart — and Grant organized events for some of them to attend, reached out to young players and pushed for recognition for the Black Aces’ accomplishments.
“This group deserves to be more than just a footnote in baseball history,” said Bob Kendrick, the president of theNegro Leagues Baseball Museum. “If it takes the passing of Don Newcombe to help us reflect and remember, then that’s another gift that he has given us.”
Why haven’t there been more Black Aces in recent years? There are two popular explanations: Winning 20 games is remarkably difficult in modern baseball, and there simply aren’t that many black players on major league rosters.
Last year, there was an uptick in the latter, with the number of black players from the United States and Canada on opening-day active rosters rising to 8.4 percent, according to Major League Baseball, but that was well below the sport’s high-water mark of 19 percent, in 1986. Among that 8.4 percent, black starting pitchers were a minority within another minority, a group that includes Sabathia, Price, Chris Archer and Tyson Ross.
Blue, who reached the majors in 1969, thought the explanation could be as simple as athletes who choose baseball over football or basketball wanting to play a position that had more action. But according to Kendrick, the scarcity of black pitchers goes all the way back to the early days of integration, and that, at least initially, it wasn’t the players making the decision.
“During that era of the Negro Leagues, the pitching position, the catching position and the shortstop position were all seen as cerebral positions,” he said. “You had this underlying belief that black athletes weren’t smart enough to do it.”
Newcombe emphatically proved any doubters wrong. He established himself as a front-line starter in his first three seasons, with a 56-28 record and 3.39 earned run average. After missing two seasons because of military service, and then struggling in his first year back, he soared to new heights in 1955, helping to lead the Dodgers to their first World Series title.
In 1956, a season that ended with a loss to the Yankees in the World Series, Newcombe not only won 27 games and the National League’s Most Valuable Player Award, but he also was named the first winner of the newly established Cy Young Award, which that season was given to the best pitcher in the majors.
Newcombe, by his own frequent admissions, struggled with alcohol in his career, which most likely contributed to a steep decline after the 1956 season. His major league career ended abruptly in 1960, and his playing days came to an unusual end in 1962 with a brief sojourn to Japan, where he played mostly as an outfielder. But Newcombe quit drinking and was back working with the Dodgers by 1970, positioning him for his eventual role mentoring Stewart and dozens of other players, including the Dodgers’ current closer, Kenley Jansen.
It was Newcombe’s innate ability to relate his experiences to young players that Kendrick said would leave a “gaping void” after the star player’s death.
“Every time we lose one of these guys that window of opportunity closes just a little more,” he said. “At some point in time there won’t be any Negro league players left to attest to what that league was all about.”
But from one Black Ace to another, Newcombe taught Stewart the value of being there when new black starters come along. And Stewart said he was proud that both Sabathia and Willis have acknowledged the influence he had on their careers.
“For those guys, I was present when they needed me,” Stewart said.
Newcombe wouldn’t have had it any other way.
Benjamin Hoffman is a senior staff editor and regular contributor to theKeeping Score columnin sports. He joined The Times in 2005.@BenHoffmanNYT•Facebook
Supported by
ByClaire Smith
As an African-American woman who has written about baseball for decades, the question I am most asked about my career choice is: “Why?”
The answer is really as succinct as the question: Jackie Robinson.
He was the man who, born 100 years ago, successfully took on the challenge of transforming baseball and, by extension, the entire country by becoming the first African-American to play in the modern era. By stepping onto a major league diamond as a Brooklyn Dodger 72 years ago, he allowed a sport that thought of itself as the national pastime to finally be just that.
What Robinson did, what he stood for, what he conveyed not only to black America, but to all of America, has resonated with me for as long as I can remember, and nothing else played as big a role in fueling my desire to be a writer, a recorder of history, a storyteller.
[On Jackie Robinson’s 100th Birthday, 100 Photos of an Icon]
[George Vecsey: How Jackie Robinson Changed the Game]
I did not personally feel the tectonic shift that took place on April 15, 1947, when Robinson made his Dodgers debut. Alas, I did not see Robinson’s first game, nor even his last, a decade later. I came of age years after he played his final game for Brooklyn.
But I wish I could say, with a straight face, that I actually heard Robinson’s name while still in the womb. He was, in fact, still on the Dodgers then. And yes, my mother was that big a fan of Robinson and the Dodgers and surely was urging him on out loud while she was pregnant with me. Indeed, tales of the lengths to which she and other family members went in order to listen to Dodgers games on the radio were among my favorite bedtime stories as a child.
Back then, I sensed the reverence that was still reserved for Robinson in my household, even though he had by then retired. After all, what African-Americans who were adults in the middle of the last century, as my mother and father were, could resist being drawn to him? In an era of ongoing repression, African-Americans wanted heroes of their own. So, as a child, you would hear of the exploits of Joe Louis, Jesse Owens, Paul Robeson. And Jackie Robinson.
It did help that, by the time I reached third grade, I had something more than an oral history to reference when it came to worshiping him. And that’s because the nuns at St. James Elementary School in Elkins Park, Pa., decided one day to break the rote and routine of our structured school life and spirit all of us to a first-floor sanctuary in the school. They did so in order to show us a film, a grainy, 76-minute biopic entitled “The Jackie Robinson Story.”
The movie was pure Hollywood, and never destined to be an epic. Still, for this one child, the black-and-white rendering brought color and depth to the Robinson story. And playing opposite the great Ruby Dee (who portrayed Rachel Robinson in the movie) was none other than Jackie Robinson, portraying himself.
All these years later, I can still remember how intensely I watched Robinson on the screen, giving life to his own story. There, in the sanctuary, I could see the man as well as the athlete, could hear his voice, could sense that sprinkled in among all the Tinsel Town touches were more than a few hints of truth.
When Jackie Robinson spoke in the movie, it was as if he were speaking to me. And that mattered. It was the early 1960s and as the lone African-American child sitting in the pews that afternoon, and in my classroom every single day, I didn’t often see anyone on the big screen or on television who looked like Mom and Dad, or my relatives. In this one modest movie, Dee and Robinson came as close to mirroring us as anything I’d ever seen before.
It would, of course, take years for me to fully realize what Hollywood dared not show at the time. It would take years of growth to realize that my worst day could never possibly compare to the things Jackie Robinson went through.
And yet, by Jackie Robinson entering my life the way he did, by way of my mother’s tales and that memorable day watching him in a movie bearing his name, I began to understand what the battle for civil rights — one that my own parents and grandparents were fighting valiantly — was all about.
In the decades that followed, as I pursued the career I had chosen, I was able to get to know Rachel Robinson, an outright national treasure who was and is as integral to the legend of No. 42 as Jackie himself. As well, I got to meet their daughter, Sharon, who, with her philanthropic efforts, has made her own valuable impact in keeping the Jackie Robinson story alive.
It is, at heart, the story of the man who, at his best and bravest, showed us all how to be strong enough not to fight back but rather to fight on and on and on, even now on the 100th anniversary of his birth. And I’m proud, in my own small way, to have helped tell it.
Claire Smith, a former sports columnist for The New York Times, is a news editor for ESPN. She was the first woman to win J.G. Taylor Spink Award for meritorious contributions to baseball writing.


Supported by
Keeping Score
BAT AVG
BAT AVG
BABIP
RBI
OBP
fWAR
SECONDARY
AVERAGE
OPS
fWAR
RAR
RBI
OBS
WAR
WAR
Rbaser
bWAR
RAR
BABIP
Rbaser
OPS
bWAR
BATAVG
SLG%
BAT AVG
BAT AVG
BABIP
RBI
OBP
fWAR
SECONDARY
AVERAGE
OPS
fWAR
RAR
RBI
OBS
WAR
WAR
Rbaser
bWAR
RAR
BABIP
Rbaser
OPS
bWAR
BATAVG
SLG%
BAT AVG
BAT AVG
BABIP
RBI
OBP
fWAR
SECONDARY
AVERAGE
OPS
fWAR
RAR
WAR
WAR
Rbaser
bWAR
RAR
BABIP
Rbaser
OPS
BATAVG
SLG%
BAT AVG
BAT AVG
BABIP
RBI
OBP
fWAR
SECONDARY
AVERAGE
OPS
fWAR
RAR
WAR
WAR
Rbaser
bWAR
RAR
BABIP
Rbaser
OPS
BATAVG
SLG%
Photograph by Jae C. Hong/Associated Press
ByVictor Mather
In this era of new and complex baseball statistics, a venerable one still pops up frequently in conversations among even the geekiest of stat-heads: batting average.
It’s one of the easiest to understand: .300 is good.; .200 is theMendoza line— you don’t want to drop below that. If you want to praise a player, you’re likely to get more mileage with most fans by saying, “He’s hitting .280” than by citing hisWARorBABIP.
But as even some statistical Neanderthals know, batting average is a seriously flawed measure of offensive performance. It is great for evaluating a player’s ability to hit singles, but batters get no credit for their power, speed or batting eye.
What if there were a statistic as easy to understand as batting average that accounted for the things that batting average does not?
Well, there is: It’s called secondary average, and it was invented by the influential statistician Bill James in the 1970s. Unlike many of James’s innovations, it has not caught on heavily with fans — you can’t find it in most stats websites or on the back of baseball cards.
But secondary average is a useful tool to quickly evaluate a player’s offense, identifying players who are underrated or overrated by batting average.
Secondary average looks and works a lot like batting average does. But rather than focusing on hit totals, it adds up the batter’s other offensive skills — extra bases, walks and stolen bases — and then divides by at-bats. (Some formulas for secondary average also include hit-by-pitch, and others reduce the total for being caught stealing. We’re using the simplest formula here.)
Let’s use Dee Gordon of the Seattle Mariners as an example. He had a .268 batting average last season, 20 points higher than the league average (.248). But his secondary average was a mere .151 because he had very few extra-base hits and even fewer walks.
Here’s how it works:
Dee Gordon
Seattle Mariners
HITS
AT-BATS
149 ÷ 556 = .268
Batting Average
AT-BATS
84 ÷ 556 = .151
Secondary Average
2B
17
17
3B
8 (x 2)
16
HR
4 (x 3)
12
BB
9
9
SB
30
+ 30
84
JOHN FROSCHAUER
ASSOCIATED PRESS
Dee Gordon
Seattle Mariners
HITS
AT-BATS
149 ÷ 556 = .268
Batting Average
AT-BATS
84 ÷ 556 = .151
Secondary Average
2B
17
17
3B
8 (x 2)
16
HR
4 (x 3)
12
BB
9
9
SB
30
+ 30
84
JOHN FROSCHAUER
ASSOCIATED PRESS
You don’t really have to learn a new scale to understand secondary average. It looks and works a lot like batting average: .300 is good, and .200 is not. Major leaguers collectively had a .248 batting average last season, and their overall secondary average was .271.
One difference is that the spectrum is much wider. While almost every player falls into the .200s or .300s in batting average, there are plenty of regular major leaguers with secondary averages in the .100s, and others over .400 or even .500.
Here are the players who had the largest increase from their traditional batting average to their secondary average last season:
Of the players who qualified for the batting title last season, the leader in secondary average wasMike Trout of the Los Angeles Angels, with an eye-opening .626. Trout had a solid .312 batting average, but that hardly summed up his offense. He had a healthy number of extra-base hits, including 39 home runs; led the league in walks with 122; and stole 24 bases. Jose Ramirez of Cleveland (.524), and Mookie Betts of Boston (.508) were just behind him at the top of the secondary average list.
Some historical context makes Trout’s season look even more impressive: Babe Ruth’s career secondary average was .608; Barry Bonds’s was .621.
At the other end, it reveals how some players, like Gordon, bring little beyond an ability to hit singles:
The Chicago White Sox’ Jon Jay, who spent last season with Kansas City and Arizona, had only three home runs, drew only 33 walks and stole four bases. These rather anemic extra contributions led to a sad .150 secondary average — compared with a .268 batting average — one point behind Gordon. Miguel Rojas of Miami was at .156.
Unsurprisingly, Bryce Harper’s .249 batting average from last season sells his contributions short. He hit 34 home runs and led the majors with 130 walks, for a secondary average of .507. Mention that the next time someone dismisses him as “just a .250 hitter.”
A less heralded example is Joey Gallo of Texas. His .206 batting average might make it seem as if he is ready for a demotion to Class AAA Nashville. But his 40 home runs, and his doubles (24) and walks (74) gave him a robust secondary average of .446, keeping his slot in the Rangers’ outfield secure.
While the Phillies landed one high-secondary-average player in Harper this off-season, the rest of their winter haul didn’t necessarily follow that trend. Philadelphia also traded with the Mariners for Jean Segura, whose .304 batting average seemed to plant him among the game’s best shortstops. But secondary average reveals it to be something of an empty .304: Although Segura hit 29 doubles and 10 home runs, his walk total was a shaky 32. That adds up to a secondary average of .200.
Mario Mendoza (career batting average .215, career secondary average .095) might approve.



Supported by
The Division and the Pennant
The Mets are in. The Cubs, and Durocher, are done. And, believe it or not, the postseason awaits.
ByThe New York Times
Following is an excerpt from a Times article on Sept. 25, 1969.
ByLeonard Koppett
With a flourish worthy of the occasion, the New York Mets officially won their first championship last night by beating the St. Louis Cardinals, 6-0, in the presence of 54,928 paying spectators fully prepared for the ecstasy of the victory.
By scoring their 96th triumph of the baseball season, the Mets clinched first place in the Eastern Division of the National League, a 94-year-old circuit playing in two six-team divisions for the first time. In their previous seven seasons, the Mets had never finished higher than ninth in a 10-team league.
Five runs in the first inning, three on a home run by Donn Clendenon and two on a home run by Ed Charles, set the victory mood early.
Gary Gentry, a rookie, proceeded to pitch a four-hit shutout and Clendenon added another home run in the fifth. That gave the crowd nearly two hours to work itself up for the celebration that erupted at 9:07 p.m., when Joe Torre bounced into a double play that ended the game.
As the players raced for the clubhouse for their own celebration, thousands of spectators leaped railings and quickly filled the field, roaring and chanting “We’re No. 1.” For the next 20 minutes at least, the cheering and milling continued, until the lights were dimmed and a slow dispersal began.
All concerned were fully and joyfully aware of what the victory meant. The Chicago Cubs, who had led the division and the Mets by 10 games in mid-August, had won their afternoon game, precluding the possibility that the Mets would clinch before taking the field.
But to perform the clincher at home, before the fans who have been such an integral part of the club’s peculiar history, the Mets had to win this game, the last scheduled for Shea Stadium. Three games remain to be played in Philadelphia this weekend and two in Chicago next week.
The style with which the Mets won was not restricted to the sudden, staggering attack with which they greeted Steve Carlton, the Cardinal left-hander who had set a major league record by striking out 19 Mets only 10 days ago in St. Louis.
The Mets had won that game, despite the strikeouts. But last Friday they lost a doubleheader to Pittsburgh and on Saturday were held hitless by Bob Moose of the Pirates. If the Cubs, trailing by four games at that point, had a chance for a final counterattack, that was it.
Instead, the Mets beat Pittsburgh twice on Sunday and last night completed a three-game sweep of the Cardinals, the National League champions for the last two years.
This five-game winning streak gave them a record of 34 victories in 44 games since Aug. 16, and 18 in their last 22 games. This constituted a stretch drive equal in quality to any produced by baseball’s most famous champions of the past.
This time, Carlton struck out only one man, Cleon Jones — and it was the only man he retired. Gentry, who had also started against Carlton in the game in St. Louis, quickly retired the Cardinals in order in the first, and the crowd started chanting and clapping as the first Met, Bud Harrelson, went to bat.
Harrelson looped a single to right field and the cheers increased. Tommie Agee walked and the noise increased again. It merged into a standing ovation for Jones, who was starting a game for the first time since Sept. 11, after sitting out most of the month because of hand and rib injuries. Jones, who still leads the league in hitting, was determined to be part of this occasion and the fans recognized his desire and his season-long contribution.
But Jones struck out, delaying poetic justice only momentarily. The very next pitch was drilled by Clendenon over the center-field wall 410 feet from home plate.
This home run was Clendenon’s 14th of the season, his 10th as a Met, and it put Gentry in control of the game.
The Mets weren’t through, however. Ron Swoboda, whose two two-run homers had beaten Carlton in the game in St. Louis, walked. And Charles, who is 36 and near the end of his career, drove his third home run of the year over the 396-foot sign just to the right of dead center — a blow, he said later, he would always remember.
Dave Giusti replaced Carlton at that point, and although Jerry Grote greeted him with a double, there was little offensive activity the rest of this brisk game.
Gentry, after three perfect innings, yielded a single to Lou Brock in the fourth, and one to Mike Shannon in the fifth. Meanwhile, the Mets started making sensational fielding plays — by Harrelson at short, by Al Weis at second, by Agee near the fence in left-center.
Eventually, everyone was just waiting for the formal ending.
When the ninth inning began, the crowd began cheering every pitch. But Brock beat out a single after Harrelson made a fine stop behind second, and Vic Davalillo bounced a single out of Harrelson’s reach to center. Still, the crowd roared encouragement to Gentry.
Vada Pinson struck out, bringing up Joe Torre — the Brooklynite who established his slugging reputation with the Braves, and who “might have brought the Mets the pennant” if they had been willing to trade for him last winter. Instead, he was traded to the Cardinals.
At any rate, with Torre at bat, the crowd was chanting for a double play. And that’s just what it got. Torre bounced to Harrelson, near second, who threw to Weis, who threw to Clendenon, and pandemonium was officially in session.
With their bats, and a broom, the Mets capture the pennant.
Following is an excerpt from a article on Oct. 17, 1969.
ByGeorge Vecsey
Rico Carty hit a long foul ball to left field, then he heard a noise. The manager of the Mets was coming out to remove the starting pitcher. The new pitcher was named ….
“I didn’t even know his name,” the cleanup hitter of the Atlanta Braves said later. “I never saw him before. It didn’t make too much of a difference to me. A lot of pitchers I don’t know.”
The new pitcher — Nolan Ryan — went into the game in the third inning with two men on. And while Ryan was warming up, Carty visited the dugout. “I asked the guys what he threw,” Carty said later. “Some said fastball, some said slider.”
There was a reason Carty had never seen the young right-hander with No. 30 on his back. Ryan never pitched against the Braves this season because of military duties and injuries. And last year Carty was in a hospital recovering from tuberculosis. So he stepped up to home plate for his first look at Ryan.
The next thing Carty knew, Ryan had busted a fastball past him. The talk about Ryan’s slider was merely a rumor.
Ryan finished the game and won the pennant for the Mets. Afterward the Braves sat in the clubhouse and talked about fastballs, not sliders.
“Heck, we knew what he threw,” said Henry Aaron, who had a homer and double off Gentry but two pop-ups off Ryan. “I’ve seen him in the past where he was erratic. He’s nothing but a kid but he did a helluva job out there.”
“He’s as fast as anybody in the majors,” said Manager Luman Harris. “That’s the first time we’ve seen him all year. I wish we hadn’t seen him today.”
The Braves seemed calm — or stunned — after their third straight loss.
“They’re destiny,” said Pat Jarvis, the losing pitcher.
“They won the pennant,” Harris said, “but I just don’t believe they can hit our pitching like they did. I admire Gil Hodges. To me, there’s no question he’s the manager of the year. But I still believe if we played ’em three more games, we’d beat ’em three straight.”
The regular season
The Mets overcame a slow start and a stagnant summer to run away with the division.
The scoreboard at Shea Stadium showed no hits for Chicago as Tom Seaver pitched to Ernie Banks of the Cubs on July 9. Seaver came within two outs of a perfect game.CreditCreditAssociated Press
Supported by
ByThe New York Times
The season began with a loss to the brand-new Montreal Expos, the Mets’ eighth straight opening-day defeat. And the situation grew only worse. At the end of April, the Mets were 9-11. On May 27, they were 18-23, in fourth place in the National League East. Off in the distance were the first-place Chicago Cubs.
But the next day, the Mets beat San Diego, 1-0, in a game in which Jerry Koosman struck out 15 batters. That began an 11-game winning streak that left the Mets — yeah, the Mets — with a record of 29-23.
The revolution was on. In early July, the Mets had their first showdown with the Cubs, and Tom Seaver came within two outs of a perfect game. A week later, the Mets took two out of three at Wrigley Field. The Mets were now in second place, just four games out of first.
At which point, the Mets flattened out. On July 30, Manager Gil Hodges even went out to left field to pull Cleon Jones from the game. Jones, he felt, was not hustling.
Hodges was sending a message, but the Mets kept struggling. By mid-August, they were 10 games out.
And then, with Woodstock being staged in the background, the Mets took off. They swept the Padres at Shea in two weekend doubleheaders and began a run in which they would win 38 of their last 49 games of the season, sometimes in stupefying fashion.
There was, for instance, the delirious Aug. 30 game in San Francisco in which the Mets threw out runners at home in the eighth and ninth innings along with another runner at third and then won in the 10th on a home run.
A week later, Manager Leo Durocher and his swooning Cubs arrived at Shea, and the Mets beat them twice, with fans sarcastically serenading Durocher and with a black cat running in front of the Chicago dugout. The next day, the Mets moved into first. Two days later, they won a 1-0, 1-0 doubleheader in Pittsburgh. The starting pitchers drove in both runs.
Three days later, the Mets struck out a record 19 times against Steve Carlton in St. Louis. But so what? They won, anyway, with Ron Swoboda hitting two two-run homers.
The Mets were now pulling away with 15 games to go. The impossible had become the inevitable.
Following are excerpts from New York Times articles in 1969.
SHEA STADIUM, JUNE 3
Scaling new heights again, the New York Mets climbed past the break-even point and into second place in the National League East by beating the Los Angeles Dodgers, 5-2, at Shea Stadium tonight.
Two home runs by Ed Kranepool, a well-placed misplay by the Dodgers, Tom Seaver’s eighth pitching victory and Tug McGraw’s second save marked the historic occasion, which also stretched the current winning streak to six games.
No Met team had ever been above .500 beyond the fourth game of a season. In 1966, and again this year, the Mets won two of their first three games; but in 1966, they lost the next five and this year they lost the next four. Never again did they have more victories than defeats until now, when their record stands at 24-23.LEONARD KOPPETT
JULY 8
It has taken them 7½ years, 439 victories and 771 defeats, but today the Mets finally begin an important series.
At 2:05 p.m. at Shea Stadium, they start a three-game series with the Chicago Cubs, the only team ahead of them in the National League’s Eastern Division.
The bumbling players who opened at the Polo Grounds in 1962 and their masochistic fans would be dizzied by the Mets’ five-game proximity to first place. And the New Yorkers have lost only three more games than the Cubs, the most important measurement between two winning clubs.
Whether sold out or close to it, Shea should be rocking every minute of the series. The Cubs have lost three straight, the Mets have won five straight and Gil Hodges of the Mets and Leo Durocher of the Cubs have set up their best pitchers for the series.GEORGE VECSEY
SHEA STADIUM, July 9
Tom Seaver of the Mets thrilled the biggest baseball crowd in Shea Stadium history tonight by coming within two outs of pitching a perfect game.
Jim Qualls, a rookie outfielder of the Chicago Cubs, drilled a solid single in the ninth that disappointed Seaver and the 59,083 fans who were quivering with every pitch.
Seaver finished with a one-hitter and a 4-0 victory that narrowed the Cubs’ division lead over the Mets to three games.
The Mets have won seven straight and the Cubs have lost five straight. And after the near-perfect game, who knows where these opposite kinds of momentum might lead?
The Mets were loose and confident going into the game because their best pitcher was going to work. The 24-year-old, right-handed Seaver, a fine athlete, had won 13 games and lost 3.
But two hours later, the Mets and their fans wanted much more than victory No. 14. They wanted perfection and the first no-hitter by a Met, and they cheered madly for every Cub out.
The first batter in the ninth was Randy Hundley, the experienced catcher. He tried to bunt a high pitch, but the ball rolled to Seaver’s right and Seaver threw Hundley out at first. The fans, ever sensitive, booed Hundley for having tried to bunt Seaver out of a perfect game.
The 22-year-old Qualls, a switch-hitter batting left-handed in his 18th major league game, was the next batter. Seaver wanted to keep the ball outside to him, but the pitch strayed a little too close to the plate and Qualls stroked it solidly to left-center, nowhere near Cleon Jones or Tommie Agee.GEORGE VECSEY
July 16
The moon didn’t figure in the conversation — mostly in Spanish — at the Full Moon Bar and Grill at 161st and Broadway. The bar was recently renamed La Luna Llena.
It’s owner, Richard Hauseman, was asked why the customers weren’t following the moon shot on television. “What’s there?” he retorted. “Walter Cronkite talking — that’s all.”
The television sets were on at most other bars, but not for Walter Cronkite or the astronauts. In Chicago, the Mets were ahead of the Cubs, suggesting a miracle that even Jules Verne did not foresee. A bartender was asked whether his customers were more interested in the Mets or the astronauts.
“The Mets, of course,” he said. “Aren’t you?”JOSEPH LELYVELD
Aug. 4
The Mets have seen the moment of their greatness flicker, pressing Chicago for the Eastern Division lead before falling back. The fans overreacted, talking World Series, and the national press and broadcasting, who used to come to Shea Stadium to interview the other teams of the National League, trumpeted the emergence of a great new power. Then the Mets lost seven of 11, their first bona fide slump. They also suffered some of the emotional problems of sudden glory.
Last Wednesday afternoon, Hodges pointedly removed Cleon Jones, his best player, from the outfield in the midst of a game, apparently for playing a ball too casually. And then Ron Swoboda, the Mets’ best off-season banquet player, publicly chided the tra-la-la attitude of the club, the lack of intensity.ROBERT LIPSYTE
SAN DIEGO, Aug. 27
Jerry Koosman pitched the New York Mets to within two games of first place tonight as he overpowered the San Diego Padres, 4-1, with a two-hitter for the Mets’ sixth straight victory.
He allowed the two hits in the first inning but no more the rest of the game and he faced only 31 batters — four more than the minimum.
The Mets continued past another milestone on their remarkable road several hours after the first-place Chicago Cubs had lost again to the Cincinnati Reds. And by the time the Mets had finished their work tonight, they were all even with Chicago in games lost, and the Cubs’ lead in the Eastern Division rested solely on the fact that they had played — and won — four more times.
The victory was Koosman’s third in a row, and the Mets’ 12th in their last 13 decisions, while the Cubs were dropping eight of 10. It also was No. 74 for the Mets this season, one more than the record total they achieved all of last season, and it was their 11th in a row over San Diego.
The situation at the top of the Eastern Division was growing so sticky that Ernie Banks even telephoned long-distance to San Diego tonight.JOSEPH DURSO
SAN FRANCISCO, Aug. 30
The New York Mets survived three hours of thrills — and sometimes terror — and defeated the San Francisco Giants, 3-2, on a 10th-inning home run by Donn Clendenon.
The victory ended the Giants’ winning streak at nine games and kept the Mets 3 1/2 games behind the first-place Chicago Cubs, who beat the Atlanta Braves, 5-4.
Clendenon put the finishing touches to the Mets’ afternoon by hitting a 2-1 pitch from Gaylord Perry over the right-field fence with two outs. But he did it only after the Mets lived through two wild innings in the eighth and ninth, during which the Giants put five runners on base — and the Mets threw two of them out at home plate and one at third base.JOSEPH DURSO
SHEA STADIUM, Sept. 9
The New York Mets — the urchins of baseball for the last seven years — shook down the thunder from the sky tonight when they overpowered the Chicago Cubs, 7-1, before 58,436 persons in Shea Stadium.
It was the fourth straight victory for the Mets and the sixth straight defeat for the Cubs, and the urchins moved to within a half game of first place in the National League East with three weeks to go.
The Mets, who have never finished higher than ninth, made the tumultuous scene last night on the five-hit pitching of their prodigy, Tom Seaver. The 25-year-old Californian allowed four singles, one double and one walk, and achieved his 21st victory in the gaudiest season of pitching in Mets history.
He was never behind and rarely was in trouble. And the crowd — which included 51,448 paying customers — spent much of the game on its feet, waving handkerchiefs and serenading Manager Leo Durocher of Chicago with stanzas of “Goodbye, eo.”
Leo might have felt like going, too.JOSEPH DURSO
SHEA STADIUM, Sept. 10
Stop the season!
The New York Mets reached and held first place tonight by sweeping a doubleheader from the Montreal Expos, 3-2 in 12 innings, and 7-1, and it is rank disregard for poetic justice to make them risk this precious attainment through the 21 games that still remain on the schedule.
Nevertheless, the ultimate height has been scaled, after seven humiliating years only partially soothed by laughter, and never again can it be said that the Mets have never been on top. “We’re No. 1, we’re No. 1” chanted the 23,512 in Shea Stadium tonight, and that moment can never be taken away from them or from Met supporters everywhere.
The moment, actually, was 10:13 p.m., Eastern Daylight Time.
This eminence, not even dreamt of for this year when the season began, has been achieved by a four-week hot streak, coinciding with Chicago’s first slump.JOSEPH DURSO
PITTSBURGH, Sept. 12
The galloping New York Mets continued their assault on the establishment of baseball tonight by defeating the Pittsburgh Pirates twice by identical scores of 1-0 and running their winning streak to nine games.
They also added half a game to their lead over the Chicago Cubs in the National League’s Eastern Division. The Cubs ended an eight-game losing streak tonight when they beat the St. Louis Cardinals, and they now trail the Mets by 2½ games with less than three weeks to go.
Three pitchers limited the Pirates to eight hits and no runs in the doubleheader. In the opener, Jerry Koosman pitched a three-hitter and, in the second game, Don Cardwell allowed four hits for eight innings and Tug McGraw gave up one in the ninth.
In both games, the starting pitchers also batted themselves to victory — Koosman with a single off Bob Moose in the fifth inning, and Cardwell with a single off Dock Ellis in the second inning.
As a result, the Mets added these features to their high-flying caps with only 18 games left: They won their 24th and 25th games of 31 played since Aug. 13, when they trailed the Chicago Cubs by 10 games; they won their 21st and 22nd shutouts of the season, and their third in a row, and they extended their recent string of shutout innings to 34.JOSEPH DURSO
ST. LOUIS, Sept. 15
Steve Carlton of the St. Louis Cardinals set a major league record tonight by striking out 19 New York Mets. But the Mets still won the game, 4-3, on a pair of two-run home runs by Ron Swoboda and extended their lead to 4½ games with 15 to play.
Carlton, a 24-year-old left-hander, struck out the side in four of the nine innings as he surpassed the record of 18 strikeouts set by Sandy Koufax, Bob Feller and Don Wilson. He even fanned Swoboda twice, on his first and third times at bat.
But on his second and fourth trips to the plate, the Maryland muscleman drove home runs into the left-field seats, both times with a man on base, both times with the Mets trailing by one run.
As a result, the Mets swung even higher on their high-flying trapeze with two and a half weeks to play.JOSEPH DURSO
Supported by
ByTyler KepnerandKevin Draper
The best player in baseball is closing in on the richest contract in the history of North American sports. Mike Trout, the center fielder for the Los Angeles Angels, is finalizing a contract extension that will be worth about $430 million and keep him with the team through 2030, according to two people who were briefed on the deal but were not authorized to comment publicly.
However the deal is calculated — either an additional $360 million over 10 years or the Angels’ total commitment of about $430 million for the next 12 years — Trout has eclipsed the previous record for guaranteed money:the 13-year, $330 million deal Bryce Harpersigned this month with the Philadelphia Phillies.
The extension, which was first reported by ESPN, would establish Trout as the highest-paid baseball player on an annual basis, toppingthe $34.4 million Zack Greinke is earningfrom the Arizona Diamondbacks on a six-year, $206.5 million contract signed in December 2015.
[From 2017:Mike Trout, Baseball’s Best Without the Brand]
While it is an enormous amount of money, even this record-breaking contract doesn’t necessarily bring Trout into the highest tier of overall income for professional athletes.
While comparing contracts across sports and continents is an inherently difficult undertaking because of varied contractual structures, tax burdens, bonuses and ancillary benefits, it is clear that even with the monster deal Trout would fall well short of becoming the world’s highest paid athlete annually.
The soccer superstar Lionel Messi, for example, isexpected to earnmore than 106 million euros (about $120 million) per year from Barcelona through 2021, an amount that could rise to 120 million euros if certain incentives are met. The boxer Canelo Álvarezwill earnat least $73 million annually from a five-year deal with the streaming service DAZN.
Trout, 27, also won’t have the highest annual salary in North American team sports. In the N.B.A., Stephen Curry of the Golden State Warriors is making $37.5 million this season, and the Houston Rockets’ James Harden will earn $42.3 million annually once his four-year, $169.3 million contract extension kicks in.
The highest-paid N.F.L. player, Green Bay Packers quarterback Aaron Rodgers, earns a bit less than Trout is expected to: an average of $33.5 million from a four-year, $134 million contract (though only $98.7 million of that is guaranteed). Unlike Major League Baseball, the N.F.L. and N.B.A. have salary caps.
Compared with superstars in other sports, Trout has a limited ability to earn money outside the game. Baseball playerstypically aren’t as well-known nationally or internationallyas their counterparts in other major sports, and Trout’s lack of marketability has been lamented by M.L.B. Commissioner Rob Manfred.
Trout does have a number of endorsement deals with companies including Rawlings and Nike, and in 2014 he became of the first baseball player since Ken Griffey Jr. to get a Nike signature cleat. But baseball players’ ability to move merchandise pales in comparison to that of a basketball player or a soccer player, and endorsement contracts reflect that.
Trout earns an estimated $2.5 million from endorsements annually,according toForbes. Kevin Durant’s endorsementdeal with Nikealone is worth up to $300 million over 10 years, while Hardenwill earn$200 million over 13 years from Adidas. LeBron James of the N.B.A. and Cristiano Ronaldo, the Portuguese soccer star for Juventus, have lifetime deals with Nike that are rumored to be worth $1 billion each.
While a handful of athletes earn more from their contracts annually than Trout, those individuals almost assuredly will not be doing so in 2030, the final year of Trout’s deal. N.B.A. contracts last a maximum of five years, andwith a few exceptions, soccer contracts are rarely longer than that, either. Boxers typically earn their money fight to fight, while golf and tennis players simply claim a share of tournament prize money.
But in 2030, no matter how Trout’s baseball career progresses, he will earn at least $36 million — a priceless long-term assurance.
He has earned the payout by putting together seven astounding seasons to begin his career; the most similar players, production-wise, at his age, according toBaseball Reference, have been the Hall of Famers Frank Robinson, Ken Griffey Jr. and Mickey Mantle. Trout has won two American League Most Valuable Player Awards and been the runner-up four times. His career batting average is .307 and he is the majors’ active leader in on-base plus slugging percentage, at .990.
But, adding to Trout’s lack of recognition and earning power, postseason success has eluded him. He has reached the playoffs just once, in 2014, when the Angels were swept by the Kansas City Royals in a division series. The possibility of Trout departing for a new team loomed after the 2020 season, when his six-year, $144.5 million contract was set to expire; Harper, for one, had said he would love for Trout to join him in Philadelphia.
Trout still lives in his hometown, Millville, N.J., in the off-season, and is a die-hard Philadelphia Eagles fan. But the Angels had tried to impress upon Trout the benefits of keeping his work and home lives separate, and to sell him on the idea of being a one-team icon with a franchise with which he has thrived. And with a promise of an enormous paycheck — at least for on-field performance — the Angels put together a winning pitch.



Supported by
ByKevin Armstrong
PORT ST. LUCIE, Fla. — Robinson Cano adjusted his neon orange batting gloves, strapped blue protective guards around his right shin and elbow, then took a step toward home plate to face live pitching on Wednesday. Before Cano could take a full swing, Mets Manager Mickey Callaway made a request of his new second baseman.
“Hey, man,” Callaway said. “Try not to kill the pitchers today.”
Cano smiled. Already in rhythm less than a week into spring training, he had rocketed balls back up the middle in a previous session. Pitcher Jason Vargas, a left-hander, proceeded to throw inside to Cano, who stepped back to avoid being hit. Vargas expressed frustration about his control and apologized; Cano remained calm. Callaway took note.
“He’s so relaxed,” Callaway said. “He just knows he’s going to do it, and that’s the goal for every player, letting the work they’ve done in the past speak for itself.”
Cano, 36, arrived in camp asa newcomer to the Mets, and their oldest player. The former Yankee is returning to New York after five seasons in Seattle amid increased scrutiny because he servedan 80-game suspensionlast season after testing positive for a banned substance.
He has expressed optimism about his new team’s prospects, in spite of two consecutive losing seasons, and vowed to help build a winner in Queens.
“I feel like I’m 25,” said Cano, who also sustained a fracture to his right hand after being struck by a pitch just before he was suspended. “I want to go out and grind and feel like I’m competing for a job. I don’t take anything for granted.”
Plenty has changed since he signed a 10-year deal worth $240 million with the Mariners in December 2013. Back then, Brodie Van Wagenen, now the Mets’ general manager, represented Cano as an agent,Tim Tebowwas still exploring his options as a quarterback in the N.F.L., and Alex Rodriguez was one of Cano’s teammates with the Yankees.
Cano reconnected with Rodriguez, now an ESPN broadcaster, by the batting cage on Wednesday. Rodriguez, 43, referred to Cano as his “student.”
No longer a sidekick to future Hall of Famers in pinstripes, Cano will be counted on to help mentor the younger Mets as the organization transitions from the David Wright era.
“Nobody is going to replace David Wright in this organization,” Cano said. “We all know what he did.”
Cano, who made three All-Star Games as a Mariner but did not reach the playoffs, maintained that he had no regrets about the cross-country move. Van Wagenen negotiated his free-agent contract with Seattle in December 2013, and Cano left the Bronx after nine seasons and a World Series title.
Mets outfielder Michael Conforto, a Seattle native, was a sophomore in college at the time, and he began studying Cano’s fluid strokes more closely.
“He makes everything look easy: the way he swings, the way he throws, the way he fields,” Conforto said. “I’ve always been a fan of his. So when he was signed, I was pumped up about that. For me to be in the same locker room, maybe he’ll rub off on me a little bit, and we can talk what he thinks when he is up there.”
Cano is a cautionary tale now, as well. Though he hit .303 in 80 games last season, Major League Baseball handed down the 80-game ban because Cano tested positive for furosemide, a diuretic he said he received from a doctor for a medical condition. It is also used as a masking agent, to disguise the presence of other banned substances. Under Major League Baseball’s drug policy, a player who tests positive for a diuretic is suspended if he cannot prove that he used it for legitimate purposes.
After Van Wagenen acquired Cano in a trade during the off-season, Jeff Wilpon, a Mets owner and chief operating officer, asserted that he was “very comfortable” with Van Wagenen’s explanation of Cano’s suspension.
“I could be proven wrong, but I don’t think he’s a drug cheat,” Wilpon said of Cano after the trade.
Cano has been quick to establish himself in the clubhouse. His stall puts him next to Todd Frazier, another former Yankee, and to Pete Alonso, a 24-year-old battling for the first base job. Callaway recalled Cano standing up in the Mets’ first spring training meeting to address his teammates.
On Thursday, Cano, who drew criticism for not running out ground balls as a Yankee, set the pace during baserunning drills. He said he believed they could be the first steps toward a return to the playoffs.
“I grew up through the Yankees system,” he said. “They teach you how to be a champion from the minor leagues. You want to win a championship, you want to make it the playoffs so many times. Coming back here. I’m looking forward to getting back in the playoffs.”
In the clubhouse at First Data Field, Cano inherited Wright’s locker. Cano played in the minors and majors against Wright, who suited up for his last game in September after years of battling back injuries. “It was sad that he had to end his career that way,” said Cano, who will be 40 when his contract is up. He said he did not plan to join Wright in retirement anytime soon.
“As long as I feel good, for me, I love to play this game,” he said. “You know, as a young kid, I wanted to play in the big leagues, so as long as I have the opportunity to go out and play everyday, I would love to.”



Supported by
ByTyler Kepner
Mariano Rivera, the career saves leader whose elegant efficiency helped the Yankees win five World Series, on Tuesday became the first player ever elected unanimously to the Baseball Hall of Fame.
Two other right-handed pitchers, Roy Halladay and Mike Mussina, also were elected, Halladay on his first try and Mussina on his sixth. Edgar Martinez, the longtime Seattle Mariners designated hitter, gained entry in his 10th and final year on the ballot. Halladay, a former ace of the Toronto Blue Jays and the Philadelphia Phillies,died in a plane crash in 2017.
Rivera was named on all 425 of the ballots cast by members of the Baseball Writers’ Association of America, eclipsing the previous record percentage, 99.3, by Ken Griffey Jr. in 2016. Halladay and Martinez both received 85.4 percent of the votes, and Mussina — a stalwart for the Baltimore Orioles and the Yankees — 76.7 percent. Candidates need 75 percent for election.
“After my career, I was thinking that I had a shot to be a Hall of Famer,” Rivera said on a conference call with reporters. “But this was just beyond my imagination. I was amazed the way all this has been, through my whole career — and this being the pinnacle of every player that plays the game of baseball, to be unanimous.”
The players will be inducted to the Hall of Fame on July 21 in Cooperstown, N.Y., along with designated hitter Harold Baines and reliever Lee Smith, who were passed over by the writers but were electedby a smaller committeelast month.
Barry Bonds and Roger Clemens, whose dominant careers stretched from the mid-1980s through 2007, were again denied entry in what was the seventh appearance on the ballot for both players. Both have strong ties to performance-enhancing drugs, which baseball did not test for until 2003. Bonds got 59.1 percent of the vote, and Clemens 59.5 percent — their highest totals yet, but still shy of 75 percent.
Rivera, 49, signed with the Yankees from Panama in 1990 for a $3,500 bonus. He reached the majors five years later and started 10 games; the last batter he faced as a starter was Martinez, who singled home a run in the fifth inning against him on Sept. 5, 1995, knocking Rivera from the game and sending him to the bullpen forever.
It was a perfect fit. Rivera thrived as a setup man in the Yankees’ 1996 championship run and took over as the team’s closer in 1997, the year he discovered his devastating cut fastball, which broke hundreds of bats with its hard, late movement into the hands of left-handers. Rivera remained the closer through his retirement in 2013, compiling 652 saves with a 2.21 earned run average, the lowest in baseball history for anyone born after 1889 (and with a minimum of 1,000 major-league innings).
Rivera was even better across his record 96 postseason games, with a 0.70 E.R.A. and 42 saves — matching his uniform number. He was the last player to regularly wear No. 42, which is retired across Major League Baseball for Jackie Robinson.
Rivera was so prolific that M.L.B. named an award after him to recognize the American League reliever of the year. Likewise, Martinez is the namesake for the award recognizing the best designated hitter. Martinez, 56, made only 560 career starts in the field (mostly at third base) but nearly 1,400 as the Mariners’ D.H.
Martinez won A.L. batting titles in 1992 and 1995, when he helped lead the Mariners to their first playoff berth, securing the team’s future in Seattle. For his career, he hit .312 with a .418 on-base percentage and a .515 slugging percentage; only two other right-handed hitters in the game’s history — Jimmie Foxx and Rogers Hornsby — were better in all three categories with at least 5,000 plate appearances.
Even so, it took a while for Martinez’s case to build momentum. The writers had never elected a player with as many games as Martinez as a D.H., a position created in 1973 to boost offense in the American League. In 2014, only 25.2 percent of the writers voted for Martinez.
But that support has grown steadily, and Martinez became the fifth player elected in his final year of eligibility by the writers, joining Red Ruffing (1967), Ralph Kiner (1975), Jim Rice (2009) and Tim Raines (2017). Martinez made it just in time — but, he said, the time was right.
“The fact that I’m going in with Mariano, that means a lot, especially because not only was he the top reliever in the game, but also he’s a great human being, a great person,” said Martinez, who went 11 for 19 in his career against Rivera. “It’s also the fact that he got 100 percent of the votes — that makes it also extra special.”
Mussina, 50, earned 270 victories and finished with a flourish, securing his first 20-win season on the final day of his career in 2008. His strikeout-to-walk rate — 3.58-to-1 — is the best in history among pitchers with at least 500 starts, and he did it all in the A.L. East, taming its brawny hitters in small ballparks with a wide array of pitches and a knack for improvisation.
“I just kept trying to make adjustments,” said Mussina, whose curveball was perhaps the best of his generation. “You keep trying to do things as you get older and certain skills start going away. You have to find other ways to do your job and be good at it. That’s really all I was ever trying to do — to be one of the five starters every year.”
Halladay reached the majors in 1998 but tumbled to Class A in 2001 to rebuild his mechanics and confidence. He re-emerged as baseball’s pre-eminent starter from 2002 through 2011, averaging 17 victories a season and winning the Cy Young Award in both leagues.
He led his league in complete games nine times and finished with 67, a figure unlikely to be matched anytime soon. No active pitcher has more than 38 complete games, and no staff last season collected more than five. Halladay, who threw a perfect game and a playoff no-hitter for the Phillies in 2010, now seems like a relic in a craft that relies more and more on relief pitchers.
“It’s funny, nobody’s getting to 200 innings anymore, and to me 200 was like the minimum,” Halladay said in March 2017. “You watch the minor leagues and young players now, there’s such an emphasis on swing-and-miss and strikeouts, so there’s more pitches, there’s deeper counts. I felt like my best games were when I threw under 100 pitches and threw a complete game. To me, that was a better game.
“Sometimes I’d go out and throw seven or eight innings and be at 120 pitches, but if I was efficient I wanted to throw nine in under 100 pitches. But that was: ‘challenge ’em, pitch to contact,’ where now there’s so much put on, ‘with two strikes, you can’t let him hit it.’ For me, I felt like with two strikes — 0-2, 1-2 — if they didn’t swing at it, it was going to be strike three.”
Halladay, the son of a pilot, took up aviation after back and shoulder problems forced his retirement in 2013. He was only 40 when he crashed his small plane into shallow water near Holiday, Fla., on Nov. 7, 2017. He is the first player elected posthumously by the writers since Roberto Clemente, the Pittsburgh Pirates outfielder who died in a plane crash in 1972.
“If only Roy were here to personally express his gratitude for this honor,” said Brandy Halladay, his widow, in a statement, “what an even more amazing day this would be.”



Supported by
Mets 2, Nationals 0
ByKevin Armstrong
WASHINGTON — A beard on his face, a new catcher in front of him and Robinson Cano at his back: Plenty had changed in Jacob deGrom’s world between the time he won the National League Cy Young Award last fall and when he took the mound for the Mets’ season opener on Thursday.
He needed time to reorient himself at first.
His schedule had also been upended in recent days. Coming out of spring training, he had to leave the team to attend a marathon negotiating session in Sarasota, Fla., and had to rearrange his travel schedule so he could undergo a physical examination in New York before he was reunited with his teammates in Washington.
Though the diversions all resulted in a five-year contract extension worth $137.5 million, deGrom said the process had been taxing. He also had unfamiliar jitters.
“I was really nervous,” he said. “There was some pressure on me today.”
DeGrom, who had only a 10-9 record despite a 1.70 earned run average last season, welcomed support from all corners, including from the newcomers, as he worked through an adrenaline rush and early struggles with off-speed pitches for a 2-0 win over the Nationals.
Catcher Wilson Ramos, making his Mets debut, kept deGrom on track. Cano, 36, demonstrated why General Manager Brodie Van Wagenen traded for him in December with a home run in the first inning, stylish fielding in the third and an inside-out swing for a single that drove in the insurance run in the eighth.
Cano’s work assured defeat for the Nationals’ Max Scherzer, who has won three Cy Young Awards and finished as the runner-up to deGrom in last season’s voting.
“That’s what it takes to win, not just the standard routine plays,” Mets Manager Mickey Callaway said. “You have to do the small things right, but you have to have baseball awareness and make other teams pay when they make a mistake, and Cano did that.”
DeGrom, who despite all his accomplishments had not been given the ball on opening day before, kept the Nationals off balance. His fastball reached as high as 98 miles per hour, and a changeup on a 3-2 count to Juan Soto, the Nationals’ cleanup hitter, with a runner on third base in the bottom of the sixth yielded the last of deGrom’s 10 strikeouts.
“One of the filthiest pitches I’ve ever seen,” Callaway said. “I kind of figured he was going to throw it. He had him sped up. It was the perfect time to do it. You just can’t lay off of it. It drops a foot and looks just like a strike until the last second. An unbelievably well-executed pitch to a great hitter.”
In a game billed as a classic duel of aces, both pitchers looked ready for another year of competing for the title of best in the league.
DeGrom, 30, lasted six innings, throwing 93 pitches and yielding five hits. Scherzer, 34, went seven and two-thirds innings, threw 109 pitches, struck out 12 Mets and gave up two earned runs.
The Mets’ bullpen, which often faltered last year as the team went 77-85, kept the shutout intact with strong work that included appearances from two off-season acquisitions.
Seth Lugo followed deGrom by striking out the side in the seventh. Jeurys Familia, back with the Mets after finishing last season in Oakland, handled the eighth without giving up a hit. Then closer Edwin Diaz, who became a Met in the deal with the Mariners that also yielded Cano, collected the save.
“That was a hell of a trade by Brodie,” Callaway said of the general manager.
Van Wagenen, who was in attendance, watched his off-season investments pay immediate dividends. Shortly after switching from life as an agent to management last fall, Van Wagenen had traded for Cano, one of his former clients.
“It’s a perfect day,” Cano said after the win. “Being behind deGrom is always fun.”
Callaway and deGrom marveled at Cano’s awareness on defense, particularly in the bottom of the third, when Nationals center fielder Victor Robles stroked a double to left and then celebrated at second base with the motion of shooting an arrow into the sky. He advanced to third when right fielder Adam Eaton knocked a single.
DeGrom proceeded to strike out shortstop Trea Turner. The Nationals’ Anthony Rendon then chopped a ball to third baseman Jeff McNeil, who fielded it and threw to Cano at second to record one out. Cano, alert to Robles’s starting and stopping, threw to Ramos at home, who then had Robles in a rundown. Ramos threw back to McNeil, who sprinted after Robles before tagging him for the out. DeGrom expressed appreciation not only for the out but for the timing.
“I was covering home there,” deGrom said. “I don’t know if this ball is going to get thrown to me, but I think you’re allowed to get run over at the plate. McNeil did a nice job of tagging him before he got to me.”
With the jitters gone and the opener won, deGrom said, “Now just get back into my routine.”


Supported by
THE PERSONALITIES
Many people, and a cat, played a part in the Mets’ road to a championship.
ByJay Schreiber
He wore the uniform of the Brooklyn Dodgers, the New York Giants, the Yankees and the Mets. Although he was often depicted as engaging in “Stengelese,” Robert Lipsyte, who covered the early Mets for The Times, said that was nonsense. “His hourslong monologues made perfect sense,” he wrote. And if you listened, you would hear the always quotable, always clever Stengel advise young players to “get in shape now, you can drink during the season,” and proclaim after another loss that “the attendance got robbed.” In every way, Lipsyte said, Stengel was the Mets’ leading man.
His real name was Marvin Eugene Throneberry, which meant his initials spelled MET. Originally a Yankee, he joined the Mets in May 1962 and, in the spirit of things, immediately started tripping over himself. His crowning moment came in a game in June when, playing first base, he was called for interference in the top of the first and then, in the bottom of the inning, failed to touch first and second base after hitting a triple. When a teammate, Charlie Neal, followed with a home run, Stengel came out of the dugout and pointed at each base for Neal’s benefit.
Long before he won the Pulitzer Prize for his newspaper columns, Breslin wrote a slim, engaging account of the 1962 Mets, “Can’t Anybody Here Play This Game?” From Breslin’s gleefully subversive point of view, the Mets were nothing less than great comedy, as good as Bert Lahr in “The Wizard of Oz” or the Marx Brothers in “Room Service.” “Take any day, any town, any inning,” Breslin wrote of the season. “With the Mets, nothing changed, only the pages on the calendar. It was all one wonderful mistake.” Before long, Breslin’s book became a byword for the Mets. They had, with his help, become even more amusing.
“The Mets Is Coming,” declared one of the banners that Mets fans brought to the Bronx — although not into the stadium — on the night of June 20, 1963, for the first Mayor’s Trophy game. It was a matchup of the worst team in baseball and the mighty Yankees. The banner may not have made it inside Yankee Stadium but tens of thousands of Mets fans did. Amazingly, the Mets won, 6-2, although, to be fair, the Yankees had played a regular-season game earlier that day. Still, as Robert Lipsyte wrote in The Times afterward: “A frightened man told his foreman to shut up, a beaten dog bit a cruel master. The long shot came home and beautiful, blue-eyed tomorrow finally arrived.”
She was a wealthy society matron who was at home at the racetrack and at the ballpark, and in 1962 she became the first owner of the Mets. She had been a minority stockholder in the New York Giants, and had even tried to block their move to San Francisco. That didn’t work, but then along came the Mets, a team whose games she would sometimes follow at the track with a transistor radio stuck to her ear. Despite all her money, she was, said the writer Frank Sullivan, “a simple, generous woman with no swank.” And all her considerable patience was ultimately rewarded with a championship.
The Mets had begun their existence with a lot of players who were near the end of their careers. So it was hardly surprising that Snider, a Brooklyn hero who had gone to Los Angeles with the rest of the Dodgers, was back in 1963 as a Met. In Brooklyn, he had been a graceful center fielder, famous for sharing that position in New York with Willie Mays and Mickey Mantle. In 1963, at age 36, he usually played right field or left. And as a Met, he hit 14 homers, batted .243 and then went to San Francisco for the 1964 season, where he ended his career amid a lot less losing.
The original bedsheet banners that popped up at the Polo Grounds in 1962 and 1963 essentially came out of nowhere. There was no internet to organize the effort; no publicity campaign by the Mets to get things going. Instead, there were just banners, some of them pretty clever. But soon enough, the Mets tried to put a more respectable gloss on the phenomenon by creating an annual Banner Day. And for years at Shea Stadium, it proved to be a popular event, even if the banners tended to be a little more cute (see above, 1965) and a little less irreverent than the originals.
As a Yankee, he won 10 championships and three Most Valuable Player awards before retiring in 1963. A year later, the Yankees fired him after just one season as their manager. And by the following May, Berra, about to turn 40, was back in uniform, for the Mets, but as a catcher and pinch-hitter. The Berra experiment did not last long. Four games, including two behind the plate. Nine at-bats. Two singles. At that point, Berra proclaimed himself “an old man” and retired again. But 1969 would bring him his 11th championship, as the Mets’ first-base coach.
He was a fixture at first base for the Brooklyn Dodgers in the 1950s, and the ball landed in his glove for the last out of the 1955 World Series, the only time those Dodgers won it all. He finished his playing career with the Mets, in 1962 and 1963, and by 1968 he was managing them, his powerful physical presence allowing him to convey a quiet, unbreakable authority. George Vecsey, a longtime sports columnist for The New York Times, said he came to think of Hodges “as one of the most decent, straight, strong-minded managers I ever met.” It was a strength that “made you listen,” said Tom Seaver, and it would propel the Mets in 1969.
At 36, Charles was the elder statesman of the 1969 Mets, a team with many key players in their mid-20s. The team’s part-time third baseman and sometime poet, Charles grew up in the segregated South of the 1930s and ’40s and as a teenager he drew inspiration from spotting Jackie Robinson in spring training. He once even ran after a train on which Robinson was riding with his Dodger teammates. Charles hit only .207 in 1969, but he started the winning rally in Game 2 of the World Series. And at the Mets’ victory parade, he read a poem he had written while stuck in the minor leagues.
He joined the Mets in June 1969 in a trade with the Montreal Expos and represented the only significant pickup the Mets would make during the season. He turned 34 a month later, making him the second-oldest player on the team. Like Charles, a fellow African-American, he became a veteran leader on a team that was mostly white. Tall and powerful, Clendenon became part of the four platoons that Manager Gil Hodges used daily. He played first base against left-handed pitchers; Ed Kranepool played against righties. And it was Clendenon, who later earned a law degree, who became a huge factor in the World Series.
He was born in 1931, played for the same Negro league team that Jackie Robinson did and in 1953 became the first African-American player on the Chicago Cubs. In the years that followed, Banks became one of the best and most popular players in the game, first as the Cubs’ power-hitting shortstop and later as the team’s first baseman. He also became known as Mr. Cub, the optimist who endured one losing season after another and still hoped for better. And 1969 seemed to be that season, the one that would get him to his first World Series. It didn’t happen.
In 1948, Durocher was the colorful, controversial manager of the Brooklyn Dodgers and Gil Hodges was his rookie first baseman. But by July of that year, Durocher had left Brooklyn to become the manager of the Giants. After that, it was in the caldron of Dodgers vs. Giants that Hodges and Durocher sized each other up. In 1969 they were squaring off again, Durocher managing the Cubs, Hodges running the Mets; Durocher still fiery and quotable, Hodges just the opposite. But Hodges got the last word when the Mets beat out the Cubs.
And what were the Yankees up to in 1969? What were they up to while the Mets pulled off one of the great reversals of all time? The answer is nothing much. The Yankees went 80-81, continuing a decline that came out of nowhere in 1965. The manager was Ralph Houk, in his second stint in that role. In his first, he had led the Yankees to World Series titles in 1961 and 1962. But in ’69 the Yankees weren’t winning. The best player on the team was Mel Stottlemyre, who went 20-14. Notable teammates included Gene Michael, Joe Pepitone, Horace Clarke and Bobby Murcer. All of them were overshadowed by the events in Queens.
The cat showed up uninvited, strolling right into the middle of a crucial Mets-Cubs game at Shea Stadium on Sept. 9, 1969. More precisely, it chose the top of the fourth to make its appearance, walking behind Cubs third baseman Ron Santo, who was in the on-deck circle, and then parading past the Cubs’ dugout. At the time, the Cubs were losing, 2-0, and the Mets had Tom Seaver on the mound. A black cat was not what the Cubs needed. In the end, the Cubs did get a run that inning, but that was it. The Mets won, 7-1, and moved to half a game behind the Cubs in the standings. The cat disappeared, its work done.
He was the Mets’ Sign Man, the guy with the degree in design art from Pratt Institute who, from his seat at Shea Stadium, would hold up preprinted placards throughout the game to comment on the action. He was, in effect, picking up where all the fans’ bedsheet banners left off. A banner hung from a railing and stayed there. But Ehrhardt, with his bag of 20-by-26-inch placards by his side, could go with the flow as the game proceeded. He said he liked to anticipate what might happen in a game by studying beforehand. He began holding up his signs when Shea opened. Five years, and a lot of bad baseball later, he, too, made it to the postseason.
The Mets confronted one future Hall of Famer after another on their way to the championship in 1969, but not one was better than Atlanta’s Hank Aaron, the Braves’ slugger and right fielder. And in the three-game National League Championship Series against the Mets, the 35-year-old Aaron was superb: three home runs and two doubles in 14 at-bats. But all of his heroics at the plate couldn’t bring the Braves a single victory against a Mets team that normally relied on pitching, but simply outhit Atlanta in the N.L.C.S. Afterward, Aaron called the Mets “amazing.” Casey Stengel had often called the Mets that, too, but with a big wink. Aaron was serious.
Photo credits:Casey Stengel: Patrick Burns/The New York Times;Marv Throneberry: The Topps Company;Jimmy Breslin: Neal Boenzi/The New York Times;The Uprising: Larry C. Morris/The New York Times;Joan Payson: Neal Boenzi/The New York Times;Duke Snider: Ernie Sisto/The New York Times;The Banners: Ernie Sisto/The New York Times;Yogi Berra: Harry Harris/Associated Press;Gil Hodges: Meyer Liebowitz/The New York Times;Ernie Banks: Associated Press;Leo Durocher: Associated Press;Ralph Houk: The New York Times;The Black Cat: Dave Pickoff/Associated Press;Karl Ehrhardt: Barton Silverman/The New York Times;Hank Aaron: United Press International;Tug McGraw: Associated Press.
Supported by
The World Series
With stunning catches and stealthy base-running, they manage to clinch a world championship.
ByThe New York Times
Memorial Stadium, Baltimore | Saturday, Oct. 11, 1969
First pitch: Bowie Kuhn, baseball commissionerNational anthem: Joseph Eubanks, opera singer
Leonard Koppett covered the World Series for The New York Times. Following are excerpts from his articles about the first four games.
BALTIMORE, Oct. 11 — The euphoric suspicion that the New York Mets might never lose another game was dispelled conclusively today as the Baltimore Orioles defeated them, 4-1, in the opening game of the World Series.
Mike Cuellar, the 32-year-old left-handed Cuban, pitched a strong six-hitter, striking out eight men. Tom Seaver, the most glamorous Met, also gave up six hits, but one was a leadoff home run by Don Buford in the first inning and four more hits came with two out in the fourth, when the Orioles scored their three other runs.
So Seaver, who left after five innings, suffered his first defeat since early August after 11 consecutive victories. And the Mets, for the first time in three weeks, lost a game that counted.
The Orioles, however, were not concerned with Met statistics. Having run away with the American League’s Eastern Division title (by 19 games) and polished off Minnesota in three straight in the championship series, they extended some streaks of their own by taking a 1-0 lead in the four-of-seven Series.
The only other time a Baltimore team had played in the Series was in 1966, when the Orioles swept the Los Angeles Dodgers, winning the last two games by 1-0 scores here in Memorial Stadium.
Thus, when the Mets finally scored on a sacrifice fly by Al Weis in the seventh inning, the run ended a string of 39 consecutive scoreless innings posted by Baltimore pitchers in Series competition. The Orioles also stand at this moment as the only team that has won every Series game it has played.
The Mets could have had that distinction had they won today, but the only real threat they mounted against Cuellar came too late because Seaver did not approach the form that had brought him 25 victories during the regular National League season.
In his last start, against Atlanta in the opening game of the pennant playoff there, he was also hit hard, but he emerged as the winning pitcher. This time, he didn’t get away with it.
Memorial Stadium, Baltimore | Sunday, Oct. 12, 1969
First pitch:Clara Merritt-Ruth, second wife of Babe RuthNational anthem:York Suburban High School band
BALTIMORE, Oct. 12 — Amid the sort of ninth-inning melodrama that makes baseball legends, the New York Mets evened the World Series at one game apiece today by beating the Baltimore Orioles, 2-1.
Three straight singles with two out, by Ed Charles, Jerry Grote and Al Weis, gave the Mets the go-ahead run in the top half of the ninth inning. Then Jerry Koosman, who had held Baltimore hitless for six innings before yielding the tying run in the seventh, needed Ron Taylor’s help to nail down the final out with the potential tying and winning runs on base.
For the Mets and their followers, the entire final inning was a moment of truth.
If they lost this game, especially after Koosman’s fine two-hit effort, their position would approach hopelessness.
Dave McNally had been tagged for a home run by Donn Clendenon in the fourth. The Orioles then made it 1-1.
Now, with two outs in the top of the ninth, Charles, the 36-year-old third baseman to whom this World Series is an unexpected and immeasurable experience, bounced a single through the left side, his second hit in a row.
Grote also singled on a hit-and-run play and Charles reached third. Then Weis, the unappreciated infielder, lined McNally’s first pitch to left for a single, scoring Charles.
Now it was up to Koosman, who needed three more outs. He retired Don Buford and Paul Blair but that brought up Frank Robinson, as feared a batter as baseball can provide.
Robinson walked. So did huge Boog Powell. Out of the dugout came Manager Gil Hodges, out of the game came Koosman, and out of the bullpen came Taylor to face Brooks Robinson.
On a full count, Robinson then swung and hit a sharp grounder to Charles, wide of third. Charles started to run the few steps to third base for a forceout, saw he didn’t have a play, and threw to first. Clendenon dug up the low throw and Robinson was out.
The Series was even at a game apiece.
Shea Stadium, Queens | Tuesday, Oct. 14, 1969
First pitch:Roy Campanella, Hall of Fame catcherNational anthem:Steve Lawrence, actor/singer
The victory scene in the New York Met dressing room, once a subject for jokes or dreams, is becoming routine pandemonium. The players are getting used to it and more polished in handling the invading army of interviewers.
However, Tommie Agee, the superhero of Game 3 of the World Series, wasn’t in the dressing room. He was off in a special conference room, where superheroes are subjected to mass questioning, and later was on television. He did come in for a while to stand on a table and answer more massed questions and then went out again. An hour and a half after the game was over he was still in his uniform, finally seated before his locker in an emptying room, answering questions again.
Most dealt with the two great catches, the one that ended the fourth inning with two men racing for home plate and the one that ended the seventh with three base runners and the batter, Paul Blair, all intent on scoring (Elrod Hendricks had hit the first one).
“I was shading him a little bit toward right field,” said Agee of Hendricks, who bats left-handed. Hendricks hit a high drive toward the left-center-field fence, and Agee and Cleon Jones convened on it. “I saw the ball well because the sky was cloudy, not bright, but I wasn’t sure I could reach it. I figure, if I can touch a ball I can hold it.”
He held it, in the webbing between the thumb and body of the glove, with which he had reached across his body.
“I knew it would be tough because it was away from my glove side,” he said.
Blair’s ball, Agee felt, was less difficult.
“It’s an easier play because it was on my glove side,” he said, “and I didn’t have as far to go, but the wind kept taking it away and I had to dive.”
Most observers, however, voted for the second catch as more remarkable — among them, Manager Gil Hodges.
“They were both great, but the second one was the greatest,” said Hodges, who has seen a lot of World Series in the past 22 years as a player or spectator. He was pressed to issue a rating.
“I’d have to say the second one was No. 1 of any World Series catch I’ve seen,” he replied.
Shea Stadium, Queens | Wednesday, Oct. 15, 1969
First pitch:Casey Stengel, Hall of Fame managerNational anthem:Gordon MacRae, actor/singer
Following is an excerpt from an article published Oct. 16, 1969.
Neither the umpires nor the Baltimore Orioles noted that the New York Mets scored the winning run in Game 4 of the World Series on an illegal play.
The run scored because the throw by Orioles pitcher Pete Richert to first, on J. C. Martin’s bunt in the bottom of the 10th, was deflected by Martin’s left wrist a few strides before he reached the base. The ball bounced away from second baseman Dave Johnson, who was waiting for the throw, and only after that did pinch-runner Rod Gaspar, who had gone from second to third, continue home with the run that ended the game.
But Martin, running to first base, was not in the lane that exists specifically to prevent this sort of interference with a throw. Pictures show that he ran on the left side of the foul line instead of the right side, where he is supposed to run when there is a possibility of a throw being made to first base from behind him.
There is a special marking for this lane: a white line, three feet to the foul side and parallel to the foul line, extending the last 45 feet of the distance between home plate and first base.
No umpire called this infraction, for which Martin should have been declared out — and no Baltimore player or coach protested the oversight.
If Martin had been called out, the game would have continued with one out, Gaspar on third, Al Weis on second and Tommie Agee coming to bat, with Bud Harrelson due to bat.
The 3-foot lane has been the source of controversy in several American League games during the last two years. On 99 plays out of a hundred, the lane doesn’t matter, since it takes effect only if there is a throw from behind the runner. Which is what happened in Game 4.
Unlike photographs of some controversial plays, pictures of this play leave no room for ambiguity. Martin had both feet on the wrong side of the foul line. The throw hit his left wrist. It could not have done that if he had been in the proper lane.
The home-plate umpire in Game 4 was a National Leaguer, Shag Crawford, but the play could also have been called by the first-base umpire, Lou DiMuro, of the American League.
A complete game from Koosman and complete lunacy in New York as the Mets dot the ‘i’ in impossible.
Shea Stadium, Queens | Thursday, Oct. 16, 1969
First pitch:Joe DiMaggio, Hall of Fame outfielderNational anthem:Pearl Bailey, actress/singer
This article was originally published in The Times on Oct. 17, 1969.
ByLeonard Koppett
“We did it all.”
Ron Swoboda said it, and in saying it, he said it all. The New York Mets had their biggest, their longest, their noisiest, their sweetest and their third victory celebration in 22 days at Shea Stadium yesterday.
On Wednesday night, Sept. 24, they clinched first place in the National League East. Champagne splashed like bath water, and everyone got splashed by it.
On Monday afternoon, Oct. 6, they completed a three-game sweep of Atlanta in the first “championship series” to determine the National League pennant winner. The activity was similar, but the intensity was less, and the World Series loomed ahead.
And now, on a mid-October Thursday a good two weeks before Halloween, the Mets had won the World Series and this was positively the last — and wildest — champagne shower.
“This is the summit,” cried Ed Charles, 36 years old and, until a couple of months ago, beyond hoping for this particular thrill. “We’re No. 1 in the world and you just can’t get any bigger than this.”
“Some people still might not believe in us,” said Cleon Jones, “but then, some people still think the world is flat.”
“It boiled down to this,” declared Bud Harrelson. “When it had to be done, we did it and they didn’t.”
The tumult was augmented by the crowded condition of an otherwise ample dressing room. This time, the crush of interviewers, cameramen and others carrying various equipment was as dense as the subway at peak rush hour, far denser than for the other two celebrations. No one could move a full step in any direction without pushing someone else aside.
That was the main dressing room. But the office of the manager, which is to the left of the entrance door (while the corridor leading into the rest of the clubhouse leads off to the right) was an oasis of order.
Manager Gil Hodges at first was in the mob outside. The first one into the empty office was Gil Jr., the C.W. Post College student, who hastily climbed out of his civilian clothes and into his Met uniform for the sweaty hour to follow.
Then came his mother, and the older two of his three sisters.
“We’re champions,” cried out Joan Hodges, who has lived through her husband’s baseball triumphs and setbacks with such fervor all these years. “Imagine, we did it!”
A moment later, the head of the family entered, and Joan hugged him and squealed:
“You know what we are? You know? Champions. We’re champions of the world.”
Hodges hugged her back, and his daughters. And they kissed him, and he grinned, and Gil Jr. put his arms around them from behind while the Mets photographer snapped a family portrait.
And then the stream of interviewers began to trickle in, filling the office with bodies but not with any of the hysteria outside. Hodges, as he has always been, was calm, speaking softly but distinctly, mopping his face, listening attentively, answering carefully, smiling quickly — working, in a way, harder than during the game.
Mrs. Joan Payson, the team’s owner, arrived, too.
“Oh my, oh my,” she kept repeating. “Oh my.” Donald Grant, the chairman of the board, was there, and then Johnny Murphy, who actually ran the club as general manager, and Georgie Weiss who had started it, and other members of the Mets family.
“Yes, it’s the same and it’s different,” said Hodges, trying to answer questions about how this victory felt alongside other World Series triumphs he experienced with the Dodgers, in 1955 and 1959. “As a player, and as a manager, it’s different — it’s hard to explain. In a way this means more. I’m so proud of them all.”
Did he think Donn Clendenon was the most valuable player, worthy of the car given for that distinction?
“That’s not my job,” said Gil. “I think of all 25 of them — and four coaches. Let’s see, that’s 29.”
“And the manager,” someone suggested.
“No, no, not the manager,” demurred Hodges.
“The manager already has a car,” a voice interrupted, and everyone laughed, including Hodges.
Later it became celebrity time — Pearl Bailey, who kissed Hodges, called him a “cool cat,” and wound up dancing in the main room with Charles while a record player blared the singalong record the Met squad had made two weeks ago; Robert Merrill, the opera star, who sat with the Met party all three days at Shea and was still shaking. Bill Shea, who set the whole thing in motion and for whom the stadium is named, saying “in my lifetime — they did it in my lifetime!”
After an hour or more, Joan Hodges was casting anxious glances at her husband — who, after all, had suffered a heart attack only 13 months before and whose marvelous discipline and recovery can’t eliminate worry. Only two days ago, however, a doctor’s examination had shown Gil in fine shape.
But sporadic yelling and singing were still going on in the clubhouse, the floor slippery, the room less crowded, but few players dressed. In another hour or two, they would go upstairs to the Diamond Club for a real party, with their wives and the whole Met official family.
“It’s the first one,” Swoboda had shouted at the beginning, “and the sweetest, and because it’s the first, nothing can ever be that sweet again.”
In other words, all they have to look forward to is repetition.
The Final Out: The announcer Curt Gowdy on NBC: “There’s a fly ball out to left. Waiting is Jones … the Mets are the world champions! Jerry Koosman is being mobbed! Look at this scene!”
In both years, the World Series lasted five games, but the similarities pretty much ended there. Daytime games then, nighttime now. Complete games then, an army of relievers now. And so on. However, each Series did have a first baseman who excelled and did so with virtually the same statistics. What was very different was the vehicle they drove away with as the Series M.V.P.
1969
2018
13
22
PITCHERS USED
9
47
PITCHING CHANGES
4
0
COMPLETE GAMES
63
109
STRIKEOUTS
30
38
WALKS
Shoe Polish
Instant Replay
UMPIRE ASSIST
1969
2018
DAY GAMES
ILLUSTRATIONS BY JOE PETRUCCIO
How Long the Games Took
1
2
3
4
5
1969
2:13
2:20
2:23
2:33†
2:14
TIME OF GAME
START
1:00 P.M.
1:00 P.M.
1:00 P.M.
1:00 P.M.
1:00 P.M.
FINISH
3:13 P.M.
3:20 P.M.
3:23 P.M.
3:33 P.M.
3:14 P.M.
2018
3:52
3:12
7:20*
3:57
3:00
TIME OF GAME
START
8:09 P.M.
8:09 P.M.
8:09 P.M.
8:09 P.M.
8:15 P.M.
FINISH
12:01 A.M.
11:21 P.M.
3:29 A.M.
12:06 A.M.
11:15 P.M.
* 18 innings
† 10 innings
Comparing the M.V.P.s
1969 Mets
2018 Red Sox
Donn Clendenon
Steve Pearce
First Base
First Base
POSITI0N PLAYED
Mideseason Trade
Mideseason Trade
ACQUIRED VIA
Montreal Expos
Toronto Blue Jays
CANADIAN TEAM TRADED FROM
3
3
WORLD SERIES HOME RUNS
16
16
WORLD SERIES PLATE APPEARANCES
15
14
TOTAL BASES
Dodge Challenger
Chevrolet Silverado
MOST VALUABLE PLAYER PRIZE
ILLUSTRATIONS BY
JOE PETRUCCIO
1969
2018
13
22
PITCHERS USED
9
47
PITCHING CHANGES
4
0
COMPLETE GAMES
63
109
STRIKEOUTS
30
38
WALKS
Shoe Polish
Instant Replay
UMPIRE ASSIST
5
0
DAY GAMES
How Long the Games Took
1
2
3
4
5
1969
TIME OF GAME
2:13
2:20
2:23
2:33†
2:14
START
1:00 P.M.
1:00 P.M.
1:00 P.M.
1:00 P.M.
1:00 P.M.
FINISH
3:13 P.M.
3:20 P.M.
3:23 P.M.
3:33 P.M.
3:14 P.M.
2018
TIME OF GAME
3:52
3:12
7:20*
3:57
3:00
START
8:09 P.M.
8:09 P.M.
8:09 P.M.
8:09 P.M.
8:15 P.M.
FINISH
12:01 A.M.
11:21 P.M.
3:29 A.M.
12:06 A.M.
11:15 P.M.
* 18 innings
† 10 innings
Comparing the M.V.P.s
1969 Mets
2018 Red Sox
Donn Clendenon
Steve Pearce
First Base
First Base
POSITI0N PLAYED
Mideseason Trade
Mideseason Trade
ACQUIRED VIA
Montreal Expos
Toronto Blue Jays
CANADIAN TEAM TRADED FROM
3
3
WORLD SERIES HOME RUNS
16
16
WORLD SERIES PLATE APPEARANCES
15
14
TOTAL BASES
Dodge Challenger
Chevrolet Silverado
MOST VALUABLE
PLAYER PRIZE
ILLUSTRATIONS BY
JOE PETRUCCIO
1969
2018
13
22
PITCHERS USED
9
47
PITCHING CHANGES
4
0
COMPLETE GAMES
63
109
STRIKEOUTS
30
38
WALKS
Shoe Polish
Instant Replay
UMPIRE ASSIST
5
0
DAY GAMES
How Long the Games Took
1969
2018
2:13
3:52
TIME OF GAME
1
1:00 p.m.
8:09 p.m.
STARTED
2:20
3:12
2
1:00 p.m.
8:09 p.m.
2:23
7:20*
3
1:00 p.m.
8:09 p.m.
2:33†
3:57
4
1:00 p.m.
8:09 p.m.
2:14
3:00
5
1:00 p.m.
8:15 p.m.
* 18 innings
† 10 innings
Comparing the M.V.P.s
1969 Mets
Donn Clendenon
2018 Red Sox
Steve Pearce
First Base
First Base
POSITI0N
ACQUIRED VIA
Mideseason Trade
Mideseason Trade
CANADIAN TEAM TRADED FROM
Montreal Expos
Toronto Blue Jays
3
3
WORLD SERIES HOME RUNS
16
16
W. S. PLATE APPEARANCES
15
14
TOTAL BASES
MOST VALUABLE
PLAYER PRIZE
Dodge Challenger
Chevrolet Silverado
Supported by
ByDavid WaldsteinandMichael Tackett
President Trump, reversing an agreement negotiated by the Obama administration, abruptly ended a deal between Major League Baseball and the Cuban Baseball Federation that had eased the path for players to compete in the United States without defecting from their country.
The Trump administration said that the deal constituted a violation of trade laws because the Cuban federation was part of the government in Havana — a departure from the previous administration’s stance.
In a letter to M.L.B.’s outside counsel, which was obtained by The New York Times, Nikole Thomas, the acting assistant director for licensing at the Office of Foreign Assets Control, outlined the U.S. government’s opposition to the deal, which stipulated that the Cuban federation would receive 25 percent of a player’s signing bonus for a minor league player and between 15 and 25 percent for a major league player.
The letter said that the O.F.A.C. had “determined that M.L.B.’s payments to the Cuban Baseball Federation are not authorized” because “a payment to the Cuban Baseball Federation is a payment to the Cuban government.”
News of the administration’s rejection of M.L.B.’s plan was first reported by The Wall Street Journal and ESPN.
Cuban sports entities, including its baseball federation and Olympic committee, have argued they are independent of the central government, but the Trump administration rejected that assessment.
“The U.S. does not support actions that would institutionalize a system by which a Cuban government entity garnishes the wages of hard-working athletes who simply seek to live and compete in a free society,” said Garrett Marquis, a spokesman for the National Security Council. “The administration looks forward to working with M.L.B. to identify ways for Cuban players to have the individual freedom to benefit from their talents, and not as property of the Cuban state.”
In a statement, M.L.B. said: “We stand by the goal of the agreement, which is to end the human trafficking of baseball players from Cuba.”
One M.L.B. official, who requested anonymity because they were not authorized to speak publicly on the matter, said the league had requested a face-to-face meeting with U.S. government agencies but were not granted one. M.L.B. was prepared to base its argument on the fact that the Obama administration had given it a license in 2016 to do business with the Cuban baseball federation, and that a Trump-era national security presidential memorandum published on June 16, 2017 promised the agreement would be grandfathered in. The memorandum stated that any new regulations “will not affect existing contracts and licenses.”
Several U.S. business entities, including travel and telecommunications companies, do business in Cuba. But M.L.B. officials worried that, as a high-profile organization, its deal would be challenged by hard-liners in the government.
John Bolton, the national security adviser, seemed to foreshadow the move on Sunday when he tweeted: “Cuba wants to use baseball players as economic pawns — selling their rights to Major League Baseball. America’s national pastime should not enable the Cuban regime’s support for Maduro in Venezuela.”
Cuba has produced some of the best players currently in the major leagues, including Aroldis Chapman of the Yankees, Yoenis Cespedes of the Mets and Jose Abreu of the Chicago White Sox. They and most other Cuban players in M.L.B. left their country illegally, in some cases smuggled out by disreputable agents and human traffickers on speedboats and rafts over dangerous waters.
“It’s bad in the sense that they can’t come anymore in the formal, legal way that was planned,” Chapman said on Monday.
For some players, the dangers continued after they arrived because they were at the mercy of the smugglers.
“To this date, I am still harassed,” Abreu, who has played for the Chicago White Sox since 2014, said in a statement issued at the time the deal was announced in December.
M.L.B. and its players union sought to eliminate that dangerous process by creating a posting system similar to the one used with players from Japan and South Korea. Under the plan, a major league team seeking to sign a Cuban player would pay a posting fee to the Cuban federation, which would in turn allow the player to leave the country and return home at will. Just days ago, the Cuban federation released the names of 34 players it said were eligible to sign with M.L.B.
“The objective of the agreement, which is the product of years of negotiations with the F.C.B., is to end the dangerous trafficking of Cuban baseball players who desire to play professional baseball in the United States,” M.L.B.’s lawyers said in their petition to the Treasury Department in January.
M.L.B. and the Cuban baseball federation commenced talks after the United States and Cuba began a thaw in relations under the Obama administration in 2014. Soon after that, baseball’s commissioner’s office secured a license from the Treasury Department to legally begin negotiations with the Cubans.
After announcing its agreement in December, M.L.B. quietly sought to convince administration officials — who immediately criticized the plan publicly — that it fit within the guidelines for an exemption to the trade laws. At the same time, M.L.B. officials were also resigned to the political opposition to the deal and the possibility of returning to the old method of signing Cuban players.
James Wagner contributed reporting.
Supported by
ByVictor Mather
A machine helping with ball-and-strike calls. An end to the hallowed 60 feet 6 inches between the pitcher’s rubber and the plate. Bigger bases.
At the behest of Major League Baseball, theAtlantic League, an independent minor league based mostly in the Northeast, will try out several rule changes in the coming season. M.L.B. said its goal was “to create more balls in play, defensive action, base running, and improve player safety.”
Baseball made no promises about eventually including the changes in the majors, but presumably the experiment is not merely for academic interest.
The changes are:
M.L.B. said it would consider changing or dropping some of the rules at the halfway point in the season, depending on their effectiveness.
M.L.B. has a three-year deal with the Atlantic League, covering selling of players, scouting, statistics and other matters.


Supported by
ByKen Belson
Tom Seaver, the most dominant and prominent player in Mets history, is stepping back from public life because of advancing dementia, his family said Thursday.
“Tom will continue to work in his beloved vineyard at his California home, but has chosen to completely retire from public life,” the Seavers said in the statement, which was released by the Baseball Hall of Fame. “The family is deeply appreciative of those who have supported Tom throughout his career, on and off the field, and who do so now by honoring his request for privacy.”
Seaver’s family said he recently learned he has dementia. But for many years, Seaver, 74, has suffered from theeffects of Lyme disease, which can cause cognitive problems similar to dementia.
Seaver was known as The Franchise during his career with the Mets, which extended from 1967 to 1977 and included a one-year stint in 1983. He holds numerous team records and is the only former Mets player besides Mike Piazza to have his number retired. He retired from baseball in 1986.
Seaver won 311 games and struck out 3,640 batters during his 20-year career, which included time with the Cincinnati Reds, Chicago White Sox and Boston Red Sox. He was selected for the All-Star team 12 times. Seaver was elected into the Hall of Fame in 1992 by near-unanimous decision.
The announcement on Thursday came just months ahead of a celebration of the 50th anniversary of the Mets team that won the 1969 World Series. Seaver had appeared less frequently in public in recent years, and even before the announcement he had informed the Mets that he would not be at the ceremony at Citi Field at the end of June.
The Mets released a statement from Jeff Wilpon, the chief operating officer, that said the team’s thoughts were with Seaver and his family.
Seaver will not be the only member of that team to miss the ceremony. Several memorable players from that team have died, including Tommie Agee, Donn Clendenon and Tug McGraw. A few others who are not in good health may also decline to attend.
Still, Seaver was without a doubt the star of the 1969 team; he went 25-7 and won the first of his three Cy Young Awards. The Mets beat the heavily favored Baltimore Orioles, which shocked the baseball world because they had finished last or second to last every year since they joined the National League as an expansion franchise in 1962.
The conversion from lovable losers to Miracle Mets was the culmination of a three-year climb that started when Seaver arrived in New York as a rookie in 1967. He won rookie of the year honors that season, and went 16-13 with a 2.76 E.R.A. The next year, Gil Hodges became the manager of the team, and Seaver blossomed under his wing.
Seaver credited Hodges, who died in 1972, for helping him develop a better work ethic and become a smarter pitcher. But it was Seaver’s confidence, enthusiasm and ease in front of the camera that made him a favorite with fans, who dubbed himTom Terrific. For years, crowds at Shea Stadium were noticeably larger when Seaver pitched.
“To have such a special baseball player, such a special pitcher, a legend of the game of baseball be a Met is a tremendous honor for our organization,” Mets Manager Mickey Callaway said Thursday in West Palm Beach, Fla. “Our thoughts and prayers go out to him and his family.”
Seaver helped the Mets return to the World Series one more time, in 1973, as they surged from last place in late August to become division champions. The Mets went on to defeat the Reds in a wild, five-game playoff, and then pushed the Oakland Athletics to seven games in the World Series before losing.
Seaver’sdeparture on June 15, 1977, is considered one of the darkest days in Mets history. After a long dispute with management over his salary, Seaver was traded to the Reds for Pat Zachry, Doug Flynn, Steve Henderson and Dan Norman. Seaver energized an already-powerful Reds team, while the Mets finished in last place four out of the next six years. Almost a year after he was traded to the Reds, Seaver pitched his only no-hitter, against the St. Louis Cardinals in Cincinnati.
Seaver returned in 1983 for one more year in New York, making him the last member of the 1969 team to play with the Mets. He was welcomed warmly on opening day that year and pitched six shutout innings. But he ended the season with an 9-14 record. He was picked up by the Chicago White Sox in the off-season and won his 300th game in Yankee Stadium in 1985.
Seaver worked as a Mets broadcaster after he retired and was a regular fixture at the annual induction weekend at the Hall of Fame in Cooperstown, N.Y. Seaver also appeared at memorabilia shows in the New York area.
Seaver’s arrival in New York almost did not happen. He was drafted by the Atlanta Braves in 1966, but the pick was voided on a technicality. Seaver’s name was put into a lottery, and the Mets won.
After he left broadcasting, Seaver focused much of his energy on making wine at a vineyard on his 116-acre estate in Calistoga, Calif. At awine tasting in New York several years ago, he talked about his new passion.
“You end up with the job you have and you end up in the Hall of Fame, and when you get there, you realize it’s the journey, not the destination,” Seaver said, by way of explaining what excited him about making wine.
Seaver also appreciated how his success in baseball enabled him to pursue a second life working outdoors producing something he, his family and many others could enjoy.
“Every night, when you close the gate and look back at the house,” Seaver said at the time, his voice cracking and his eyes welling up with tears, “and you realize, how cotton-picking lucky am I?”
Kevin Armstrong contributed reporting.

Supported by
On Baseball
ByTyler Kepner
SURPRISE, Ariz. — After the Kansas City Royals departed for a spring training road game last month, their general manager, Dayton Moore, stayed behind at the team’s training complex to watch prospects on the back fields. It was from there, more than a decade ago, that a longtime coach, Bill Fischer, had called him excitedly to share a vision.
“Fish said, ‘I just saw the Latin version ofJohnny Bench,’” Moore said, sitting in a dugout and smiling at the memory. “I said, ‘Who’s that?’ He said, ‘Salvador Perez.’ Fish recognized it right away.”
Bench may have been the greatest catcher ever, but Perez is the only other catcher to make at least six All-Star teams while winning five Gold Gloves and a World Series Most Valuable Player Award.
He is a rare modern species: a high-impact offensive catcher who plays a lot of games.
As recently as 2007, 28 players appeared in at least 95 games as a catcher. Last season that number had dwindled to 15, the fewest since the majors expanded to 30 teams in 1998. Perez did it for the sixth season in a row, but his streak will end in 2019: At the moment Moore spoke, Perez was in Los Angeles to undergo Tommy John surgery, which will cost him the season.
“It’s a big blow to the morale of the organization, because Salvy’s our energy-giver out there,” Moore said. “The fans adore him, and they show up to watch him play regardless of where we are in the standings.”
Without Perez — who hit 27 homers in each of the last two seasons — catchers’ offensive production could slip again this season. In 2018, major league catchers produced a .233 batting average and a .678 on-base plus slugging percentage, both the lowest figures of the 30-team era.
“It’s a very physically demanding position, but that’s been true for years,” said Matt Klentak, the general manager of the Philadelphia Phillies. “On top of that, there has been a shift throughout the league in recent years in the way catcher defense is evaluated, prioritizing catcher framing. The impact of framing on a game is real, and in some cases teams are willing to trade out some offense in exchange for better receiving skills.”
Catchers who can hit are still valued, as evidenced bythe Phillies’ trade with the Miami Marlins for J. T. Realmuto, the game’s best offensive catcher. But the Boston Red Sox showed last season that a slugger behind the plate is not always necessary: They won the World Series despite a .194 average and .533 O.P.S. from their catchers, the worst marks for any champion in the live-ball era.
“We look at catcher as a defensive position,” said Dave Dombrowski, Boston’s president of baseball operations. “And so the defensive efficiencies they bring to us, not only the things you can measure with framing, throwing guys out and time to second base, but handling the staff, following the game plan that we want — we put a high priority on that.”
And the job is only getting more challenging. Teams use more pitchers per season than ever, and while fastball velocity has risen in recent years, pitchers are also throwing a greater percentage of breaking balls. That is one factor explaining why wild pitches and passed balls are on the rise.
More important, though, is the emphasis on framing — that is, getting borderline pitches called for strikes. When a catcher tries to present a pitch on the corner as a strike, he will try to keep most of his glove in the strike zone. Catching such pitches in the tip of the webbing, and not the pocket, naturally leads to more pitches that clip the edge of the mitt and roll away.
“It may be the most demanding position in all of sports,” Moore said. “There are more good N.F.L. quarterbacks than there are complete major league catchers with the standards we were raised with.”
Those standards are changing, as reflected by the Red Sox, who were so satisfied with catchers Blake Swihart and Christian Vasquez that they brought them both back despite their weak bats. Boston catchers excelled on defense, ranking third in the majorsat framing, according to Baseball Prospectus. The two teams above them were the National League champion Los Angeles Dodgers and, in first place, the Arizona Diamondbacks.
It is no coincidence that one of Arizona’s catchers last season, Jeff Mathis, attracted the attention of the team that ranked worst at framing, the Texas Rangers. Mathis hit .200 and has a .198 average across 14 seasons, but his exceptional defensive skills earned him a two-year, $6.25 million deal from the Rangers.
That is a modest deal by industry standards, but it is the richest one Mathis, who turns 36 this month, has ever signed. He might have had little market appeal anymore if not for today’s methods of measuring defense.
“I’ve always taken a lot of pride in the defensive side of my game,” Mathis said. “Obviously I’d love to contribute a lot more offensively, and I think I can. But for them to acknowledge defense the way they have the last few years is something that I’ve definitely benefited from and definitely thankful for.”
Jon Daniels, the Rangers’ president of baseball operations, said the team determined at the start of the off-season to target a defensive-oriented catcher. The Rangers are entering their final season at outdoor Globe Life Park — a hitter’s paradise — and plan to integrate young pitchers onto their roster as they move to an indoor ballpark in 2020.
Besides Mathis, the Rangers considered Martin Maldonado, who lingered on the market and eventually signed with the Royals as Perez’s replacement, for $2.5 million. Maldonado had a meager .616 O.P.S. for the Los Angeles Angels last season but still appealed to the Houston Astros, who traded for him in July and started him in six of their eight playoff games.
The previous October, Brian McCann caught every inning for the Astros through their victory in Game 7 of the World Series. The 35-year-old McCann, who is second on the active list in games caught behind the St. Louis Cardinals’ Yadier Molina, slumped to a .212 average last season and signed for one year and $2 million with his original team, the Atlanta Braves.
Jeff Luhnow, the Astros’ general manager and a former Cardinals executive, spoke wistfully recently about “the days of having a Yadi Molina.” He could not bring himself to say that those days are over, but he does not see a successor.
“I’m sure there will be some guys like that in the future, but I don’t know why we’re not developing catchers as much,” Luhnow said. “Of all the positions in baseball, that’s probably the thinnest.”
This may simply be a down cycle; Baseball America ranked seven catchers among its top 100 prospects this season, the most since 2012. Then again, that crop from seven years ago — Travis d’Arnaud, Yasmani Grandal, Devin Mesoraco, Jesus Montero, Wilin Rosario, Gary Sanchez and Swihart — has not yielded many stars.
Neal Huntington, the Pittsburgh Pirates’ general manager, said the rise of year-round amateur baseball could be burning out catching prospects; the relentless physical demands, he said, do not help developing hitters. If a catching prospect shows a promising bat, he added, talent evaluators may want him to change positions. (Bryce Harper, the Phillies’ new $330 million outfielder, was a catcher as an amateur.)
“The guy who may be a midrange defender but can swing the bat a little bit, we may be thinking about shifting him out from behind home plate because we want the bat to play — and we’ve become so strict on receiving analytics that we’re almost unforgiving in some cases,” Huntington said.
“So we’ve shifted the pendulum way to the defensive side because we recognize the value it brings. There’s also value in that guy who can receiveandhit, but that guy who’s an exceptional receiver, he gets the benefit of the doubt every single time, and we’ve been able to quantify that. So the guys that used to kind of fade away are now hanging around longer.”
Mathis was not the only veteran catcher to receive a multiyear deal in free agency. Kurt Suzuki, 35, got a two-year, $10 million contract in November from the Washington Nationals, who did not stop there. Ten days later, they traded for Yan Gomes, an All-Star catcher for Cleveland last season.
Suzuki — who caught 141 games for Oakland in 2008, his first full season in the majors — said he was happy to share the role. The same analytics wave that identifies and values catchers’ defense also makes the job more demanding because of the volume of information to process before games.
“It used to be a DVD,” Suzuki said. “You’d watch video and go, ‘This is how we’re going to get him out.’ Now you’ve got all these heat maps, velocities, and you’re like, ‘Wow, this is a brain cram.’ It’s a lot of studying, a lot of stress and strain on the brain. To have that mental rest is awesome.”
The Nationals’ time-sharing plan is becoming more of the rule than the exception. The productive hitter who catches nearly every game is harder and harder to find — even, at least for this season, in Kansas City.



Supported by
Sports of The Times
ByMichael Powell
A few weeks back I drove across central Florida, that flatland of farms and cattle and sweet-smelling orange groves, in the company of a childhood friend, Peter Kurz, and we talked, as we have been prone to do over many years, about our lifelong obsession with the New York Mets.
We recalled our preadolescent battery at the Soldiers and Sailors Monument on Manhattan’s Upper West Side, my imaginary Tom Seaver tossing fastballs to his imaginary Jerry Grote. We got everyone out of course, Willie Stargell and Roberto Clemente, Frank and Brooks Robinson, too, because that was just the way Tom Terrific rolled.
The 1969 Mets inhabited our consciousness, as happens when the hypnotic beauty of baseball sinks its hook in kids. Those Mets, those world champion guys, have been stepping into mortality’s shadow for years now, Tommie Agee and Donn Clendenon, Ed Charles and Tug McGraw, all gone, so we can not lay claim to shock that another star will now be moving off the stage.
Except that Seaver was the immortal, the forever young, so composed and so fiercely competitive and so analytical about his efforts. Now his family says that at age 74 he suffers from dementia and we will see no more of him in public life. He will tend to his vineyards in Napa as long as he can.
[ReadAbout the Seaver family’s announcement that the baseball legend has dementia and will retire from public life.]
That is not how I will remember him and maybe that’s the point of his withdrawal. He was a powerful, stocky pitcher from California and he dominated his mound like a tenor astride his stage. He would pull off his cap and run his hand through that thick shock of hair and then ready himself and rear and toss and rear and toss. No need to put a 20-second clock on him; out there on his mound he was pure business and if a batter fiddled around too much he just might sneak a hard fastball under the batter’s chin by way of a reminder to buckle down.
He perfected the drop-and-thrust delivery, dropping so far down as he threw that his measure of a good night was whether his right knee had dirt on it from dragging on the mound. No weight work and iron sleds for him; he ran and he worked out with light weights. And still that fastball crackled.
Magic could happen any night he pitched and so you tried to wheedle your parents into letting you stay up and watch with them on the black-and-white WOR Channel 9 broadcast, or you’d curl up in bed with a transistor radio and listen to Bob Murphy paint the picture for you, of Seaver tossing and tossing.
Data can be a sportswriting crutch although it’s also true that baseball without statistics is like the Bible without words. So in 1969 Seaver went 25-7 with a 2.21 earned run average. He also threw five complete-game shutouts.
I recently took a look at the prevailing, and too little questioned, orthodoxy that starting pitchersshould not go more than six or seven inningsinto a game. By way of making a point, Seaver became my insane outlier. If hitters wanted to get to him, they were well-advised to swing early before Seaver tuned up his curve and that live snake of a fastball. His career E.R.A. in the first inning of a game was 3.75. In the last three innings, his lifetime E.R.A. was 2.75.
And forgive me my statistical drunkenness but peak-performance Tom tilted into absurdity. In 1969, he pitched in the ninth inning 17 times and surrendered not a single run.
Oh yes, in September of that year, he went 6-0 with an 0.83 E.R.A. All this courtesy of Baseball-Reference.com.
Seaver like his peers Bob Gibson and Juan Marichal and Jim Palmer grooved on competition. That was never more true than in 1973, when the Mets became the most unlikely team in baseball history to reach the World Series, stumbling into the postseason with a motley record of 82-79. Many Mets had been injured that season, they fell into one ditch after another and yet somehow they dusted themselves off and made it to the Series against the vastly more powerful Oakland As.
That series went a taut seven games and Seaver facing off against Reggie Jackson was alone worth the price of admission. Reggie had led the American League in home runs and runs batted in that year, and Seaver was Seaver, 19-10 with a 2.08 E.R.A. and 250 strikeouts. Reggie strutted to the plate, wiggle-wagging his bat, ready for the struggle. Seaver looked in to Grote for the signs but there really was not much doubt what the call would be.
My mind’s eye recalls Seaver throwing more or less nothing but fastballs, mano a mano. He got Jackson and Jackson got him. Seaver was perhaps not at his best in that Series as he actually lost a game and had a 2.40 E.R.A. He also struck out 18 men in 15 innings.
This fairy tale ended badly. Seaver wanted more money and the Mets’ board chairman, M. Donald Grant, who was imperious to the point of self-satire, bridled at the help acting up. Goaded by Dick Young, a reactionary columnist for The Daily News, Grant sent Seaver into exile in Cincinnati. If that city by the Ohio River was to be his Elba, he made do well enough, going 14-3 in his first year there.
None of it felt right though. He was the essential Met. He returned in the midst of the Mets’ Dark Ages, 1983, and the team lost 94 games. He was an old man in baseball terms, the vigor had left his fastball, but he still fashioned a reasonable season, with a 3.55 E.R.A. He gave up up just 201 hits in 231 innings.
He moved on, an itinerant starter, and won 16 games at age 40 for the White Sox. A year later he called it quits. He had a Hall of Fame career, one of the best in the history of the game, and his cumulative career earnings in 20 years totaled a hair under $6 million, or roughly what an average relief pitcher makes in today’s game.
Me, I remember trying to mimic that drop-and-thrust motion of his. And I recall riding the No. 7 train to Shea Stadium with my friend Peter. We bought $1.30 tickets and took our seats for a doubleheader: Jerry Koosman in the opener, Tom Terrific in the nightcap.
If I could, I’d give him a standing O still.
Email: powellm@nytimes.com


Supported by
ByJay Schreiber
Ask Rod Gaspar what moment he remembers most from the Mets’ 1969 season, and the backup outfielder with the powerful arm points to a head-spinning game in San Francisco at the end of August. And why not? It was a game in which he and Donn Clendenon combined to throw out three Giants runners at third base and home plate in the eighth and ninth innings before the Mets won it in the 10th.
Or, as Gaspar put it: “Typical Mets.”
Ask Ron Swoboda the same question and he graciously overlooks his famous catch in the World Series and instead cites a September game against the Chicago Cubs, with first place on the line.
In the bottom of the first inning, the Cubs knocked down the Mets’ invaluable leadoff hitter, Tommie Agee. Swoboda takes it from there:
“In the top of the second, Jerry Koosman throws a rocket right at Ron Santo’s coconut and he put an arm up. You want to play this game? I don’t think so. He hit Santo in the arm. Koosman was a warrior, he was an assassin. They threw at Agee, that’s all Koosman needed.
“After they knocked down Agee, I remember Tom Seaver yelling in the dugout, ‘You don’t want to do that.’ Koosman took care of the rest.”
Ask Koosman who or what stands out most 50 years later and he is quick to cite Gil Hodges, the manager behind the Mets’ miracle.
“Gil was the man — there was a lot of quiet management that went on,” he said. “Gil talked a little bit in code, but you knew what he meant. You knew where he stood and what he expected of you. And it worked great. We won, didn’t we? At 100-to-1 odds in Vegas before the season, and we end up winning.”
Ed Kranepool, who played 18 seasons for the Mets, remembers what it was like to be a platoon player in the World Series. In the five games it took for the Mets to upend the favored Baltimore Orioles, Kranepool and three other left-handed hitters — Art Shamsky, Ken Boswell and Wayne Garrett — were in the starting lineup just once, for Game 3.
“Did the left-handers want to play in the World Series?” he said. “Yeah, but you had to respect Gil and what he was doing. We did get to face Jim Palmer in Game 3 and we knocked him out. The next day, we sat down again. So we sat there, but we were winning.”
Jim McAndrew, who was in the back end of the 1969 starting rotation, was on the postseason roster and didn’t get to play a single moment. But he almost did.
“I was scared to death because Seaver gave up that leadoff homer in the first inning of the World Series, and Hodges immediately had me up in the bullpen,” he said. Still, he didn’t get into that game or any other in the Series.
“But you can’t gripe,” he said.
McAndrew, Gaspar, Swoboda, Koosman and Kranepool spoke to The New York Times early this month in connection with the 50th anniversary of one of the most remarkable moments in baseball history — the sudden ascent of the Mets to a championship after the team’s previous life as a laughingstock.
The five spoke with pride of what they accomplished, but with some sadness, too. Fifty years is a long time, and a half-dozen players from that team have died. Others have serious medical issues.
It is a somber scorecard that also includes Hodges, who died of a heart attack before the 1972 season, and the death of three of his four coaches. And Seaver, 74, the best player on that 1969 team, has advancing dementia.
The disclosure of Seaver’s condition was made shortly after the former Mets had spoken with The Times. But they were all aware that Seaver had been struggling with the effects of Lyme disease for years. More than anything, they were aware of how relentless time is.
“Casey was right when he said you get old very quick,” said Kranepool, referring to Casey Stengel, who was the Mets’ manager when Kranepool joined the team as a teenager. Now Kranepool is 74 and in need of a kidney transplant, although he remains intent on being part of the 1969 reunion the Mets will stage at Citi Field in June.
“It’s frustrating,” he said. “You would like to see everybody, but it doesn’t work that way. I don’t think I’m going to be around for the 100th, so I’m glad we’re doing this.”
Swoboda, who is also 74, said: “I don’t know where the 50 years went, but we are a band of brothers. Very few of us were involved in anything else of that magnitude.”
“It’s no fun seeing our guys go down,” said Gaspar, who is 72. “I hope we can have 15 of us at the reunion.”
Koosman said he planned to be there. He is 76, the oldest of the five, but still doing back-and-forth bantering with Swoboda. Except now it’s via email instead of in the clubhouse. And what do they jab each other about?
“Politics,” said Koosman. Swoboda, he said, is too liberal. “Tell him to get a life,” he said, joking. “Tell him to quit watching MSNBC and reading The New York Times. Tell him to read the sports section and stop there.”
Told what Koosman had said about him, Swoboda laughed. ‘I love the guy,” he said, “but he sends me all this stuff from the blogosphere.’’
McAndrew, amused by all of this, was willing to volunteer that he views himself as “socially compassionate, fiscally responsible.” Swoboda, he added, “is a non-backing-off lefty.”
A lefty who, in 1969, played right field, and not always that well. Hodges would take him out of games for defensive purposes and insert Gaspar, “which drove me crazy,” Swoboda said.
“I wanted to be good enough for Hodges not to have to do that,’’ he added. “And eventually, I was. Eventually, he left me alone.”
Right through the top of the ninth inning of Game 4 of the Series, when Swoboda’s do-or-die catch of Brooks Robinson’s line drive kept the Orioles from taking control of the game.
“Clendenon,” Swoboda noted sardonically, “called it the stupidest catch he ever saw because I went for it.”
Clendenon. Alert, tough, college-educated. A veteran voice in the clubhouse. And a central figure in that wild August game in San Francisco that Gaspar so vividly remembers. Here’s how he tells it:
“It’s the bottom of the ninth, tie score, one out, Bob Burda is on first, Willie McCovey is up and we have the McCovey shift on. Everyone is pulled over to the right. I’m playing left, but I’m almost in center. Tug McGraw is pitching and McCovey sticks out his bat and hits a high, nine-iron shot down the left-field line. I chase after the ball, pick it up and throw blindly toward home plate.
“I knew it was the game right there. I figured Burda was going to score easy. But you know what? I threw a rocket to Jerry Grote, all the way in the air, and Burda was out by 15 feet. And Grote was so stunned he rolled the ball back to the mound even though there only two outs. And McCovey, who had reached second, sees this and takes off for third. And Clendenon, who was always paying attention, picks the ball up and throws to third. Double play.
“The next inning, Clendenon hits a home run and we win the game.”
McAndrew said: “Clendenon could strap you on his back and get those big hits to drive in runs for a week or 10 days. All the low-scoring games, we won them.”
And all the crazy games — the Mets won them, too. Some mystical combination of talent, toughness, luck and magic conquered everything in its path. For one season.
“The next year,” Swoboda said, “we tried to make it happen, rather than let it happen. Something was missing. All it does it add more mystery to 1969 in my book.”
A magical, mystical mystery, actually. One that, 50 years later, still endures.




Book Excerpt
Pitchers have used all sorts of tricks to adulterate balls and make their jobs easier. These days, though, it’s harder to create the necessary mess.
Gaylord Perry pitching for the Indians at Yankee Stadium in 1973. Perry is one of several Hall of Fame pitchers with a reputation for doctoring baseballs.CreditCreditAssociated Press
Supported by
ByTyler Kepner
The Brooklyn Dodgers met an old friend on a trip to St. Louis early in the 1955 season. Preacher Roe, a sly and slender lefty who had just retired to West Plains, Mo., entertained his former teammates at the Chase Hotel. He needed their advice.
“We sat around a big table, all talking to Preacher,” recalls Carl Erskine, a top Dodgers starter then. “He said, ‘Fellas, I want to ask you a question: Sports Illustrated has offered me $2,000 to tell them how I threw the spitter. You think I should do that or not? With that $2,000 I can blacktop my driveway and I can fix up my house. I could really use that $2,000. What do you think?’
“The guys all said, ‘Yeah, go ahead, Preach, sure, why not?’ I did not. I admired Preacher. He was a great study to watch pitch. He was very clever and won a lot of games; he was really a pitcher’s pitcher. So I didn’t say yes to that. As we were leaving the dining room, Preacher said, ‘I didn’t hear you speak up.’ I said, ‘No, I didn’t, Preacher. You were such an outstanding pitcher without the spitter, I’d hate to see you taint your whole career by talking about throwing it.’
“So anyway, Preacher did the article, he got the $2,000, and sometime later when I talked to Preach he said, ‘Carl, you know what? I just ruined my chances for the Hall of Fame by admitting I threw the spitter, and you’re the only one that advised me not to do it.’ And I said, ‘Well, Preacher, I saw you pitch, you were a pitcher’s pitcher. You could have won without the spitter.’”
Maybe, maybe not. While Erskine believed in Roe, the man himself didn’t: In his confession, Roe said he turned to the pitch after slumping to 4–15 with the Pirates in 1947. Reviving the spitter, which he had practiced with Harry Brecheen as a Cardinals farmhand, was his last chance. He made the most of it, becoming a regular All-Star, though not quite a Cooperstown candidate, for the Dodgers. Cheating only made sense.
“Why shouldn’t I have?” Roe told Dick Young in the Sports Illustrated article. “I was about through when I decided to get me the pitch. ‘If I get caught,’ I told myself, ‘they’ll kick me out. If I don’t, I’m through anyway, so how can I lose?’”
He didn’t lose very often. Roe won so much — he hada .715 winning percentageover seven seasons with Brooklyn — that he guessed the spitter had earned him $100,000. On the bench between innings, Roe would pop a stick of Beech-Nut gum into his mouth and announce, “I’m going to get me a new batch of curveballs.” In the game, he’d spit on the meaty part of his thumb while pretending to wipe his brow. Then, while hitching his belt, he’d subtly wipe his index and middle fingers on the saliva. Two wet fingers on top, a dry thumb underneath, and Roe was ready. He compared it to squeezing a peach pit or a watermelon seed with your fingertips.
“The idea is to get part of your grip wet, and the other dry,” he said. “When the ball leaves your hand, it slips off your wet fingers and clings, just tiny-like, to the dry part of your thumb. The ball jumps on account of it. If it’s a good ’un, it drops like a dead duck just when it crosses the plate.”
Roe’s confession only confirmed his reputation. As Stan Musial wrote decades later, “I’d always be first-pitch hitting against Roe, because when he had two strikes on you, he’d usually load up, and I hated to get a shower.” Anticipation of the spitter helped Roe, and he knew how to destroy evidence. He was never caught in the act.
“The umpire would call for the ball, and Preacher would stomp around and look at his hand like, ‘Uh-oh, you probably got me this time,’” Erskine says, “and then instead of tossing the ball in, he’d roll it to the umpire on the ground!”
Like steroid users decades later, Roe stayed ahead of the cops and thrived. But his pang of regret to Erskine — at least for going public and bursting his cloud of mystery — showed that he knew what he had done. The specter of the dark arts would indeed follow Roe to his grave; when he died in 2008, the word“spitball” appeared in the headlineof his New York Times obituary.
After two chaotic decades or so, the spitball was banned for 1920, the same year the country went dry under Prohibition. The rule simply turned the mound into a speakeasy, with many pitchers going undercover to get the same slippery edge as their predecessors.
The physics behind the spitball is simple enough: When the ball slides off wet fingers, it loses backspin and therefore rotates less — something like a knuckleball, which should not rotate at all, or a forkball tumbling in its final plunge.
Defacing the surface of a ball produces the same kind of effect — added movement, to the opposite side of the scuff. This also dates to the game’s early days. Imagine what the baseballs looked like in the early 20th century:
“We’d play a whole game with one ball, if it stayed in the park,” Wahoo Sam Crawford, a Hall of Famer who played from 1899 to 1917, says in “The Glory of Their Times,” a book by Lawrence S. Ritter.
“Lopsided, and black, and full of tobacco and licorice stains,” Crawford continues. “The pitchers used to have it all their way back then.”
Even the possibility of scuffing gives pitchers an edge. These words come from Chet Brewer, a star for the Kansas City Monarchs of the Negro National League in the late 1920s, and they sound timeless:
“A cut ball? I got credit for that,” he told John Holway in the book “Black Diamonds.” “If I picked up a rough one, I didn’t throw it out of the game. I didn’t exactly put the cuts on it myself, but I could pitch it.”
Scuffing charges never dogged Mike Mussina, a Hall of Fame right-hander for the Orioles and the Yankees from 1991 to 2008. But like any smart pitcher, he would never reject a ball that came to him with a mark. This was Mussina’s order for every catcher: If a ball scrapes the ground, never volunteer it to the umpire.
“Say a guy hits a ground ball to short and they throw it back to me from first base — as soon as I grab the ball, I’m running my thumb over these,” Mussina says. He is holding a ball and referring to the white area within the horseshoe. “Do I have a sinker out of this ball? And if I find one I think’s pretty good, I flip it to the other side to see if it’s scuffed up on the wrong side.”
By that he means the opposite side; if both horseshoe areas are scuffed, they’ll counteract each other, to no advantage. If there’s a scuff where the seams narrow — the sweet spot — it creates a four-seam sinker, a pitch that spins like a straight fastball but veers away, in the direction opposite the scuff.
A common lament among retired pitchers is that too many balls are now thrown out of play. To them, it underscores a lack of craftsmanship on the mound.
“I’ve literally seen teammates, when there’s a scuff on the ball they get rid of it,” says Jamie Moyer, who won 269 games in a career that ended in 2012, the year he turned 50. “They’ll say, ‘Oh, it does funny stuff,’ and you go, ‘Wait a minute, that funny stuff can be a benefit to you!’”
Hitters are conditioned now to ask umpires to discard any ball that skips. Umpires and catchers know this, so catchers tend to have an almost reflexive response: They will spear a ball from the dirt, transfer it quickly to their throwing hand, and hold it up for the ump to keep or reject.
Of course, some fielders still try to create a scuff: Catchers may deliberately short-hop their throws before innings, and outfielders may do the same on routine throws to the infield. But times have changed.
“When I played, a ball hit the dirt, it was still in play,” says Chili Davis, the Mets hitting coach, who played from 1981 to 1999. “Today’s game, if a catcher throws a ball down to second on a short hop, or a ball gets blocked in the dirt, that ball’s out of the game. It’s just automatic now.”
Pitchers also seek ways to look natural while applying moisture or tackiness to their fingers. One former player, now a broadcaster, reached into his team’s ball bag for me and pulled out a canister of colorless Tuf-Skin, a spray that helps secure athletic tape. With one spritz of Tuf-Skin on my arm, I had an invisible island of instant tackiness for my fingers.
That’s also why pitchers like putting clear BullFrog sunscreen on their arms. Grab the rosin bag, aimlessly touch the BullFrog spot, and you’ll have just enough stickiness to help guide your pitches. One catcher says he has seen pitchers leave the dugout between innings and wrap their fingers around a ball coated with pine tar, leaving just enough residue on their hands to get a better grip when they return to the mound.
Next time you go to a game, notice all the surfaces a pitcher touches with his hand. Pitchers are fidgety creatures, constantly tugging and swiping and scratching their caps, their sleeves, their skin, something. Corey Kluber, the two-time Cy Young Award winner for Cleveland, grabs his tongue on the mound before every pitch — which became legal again years ago — then wipes his hand on the side of his pants.
“The way they rub the balls up now, they rub them up all in advance,” Kluber says. “They’re not rubbed up all day, and they sit in the bucket with all the dust and stuff, and they get so slippery. Just get a little bit of moisture on your hand, at least. You’ve still got to wipe it off, obviously, but you get a little bit of moisture on your hand so the ball’s not as dry.”
Kluber does this no matter the weather, but such tactics are especially handy in the cold and at high altitude, where it’s harder to generate moisture.
“I tell you what,” says one 10-year veteran, “if they could get a camera behind the dugout in Colorado, it would be like a mad scientist’s laboratory down there, people doing anything they can to find a grip.”
Most players, even hitters, tend to accept this practice. A pitch can be an instrument of destruction, after all, and a hitter would rather the pitcher know where it’s going than accidentally fire a cue ball at his head. It is a fine distinction, to be sure, but this is the logic: Tackiness helps command and finish on a pitch, and that’s O.K. Sandpaper or K-Y Jelly helps enhance movement, and that’s not.
“In the cold weather in Minnesota, you had to have something to grip the curveball,” says Jim Kaat, who starred for the Twins in the 1960s. “Pitchers for years have lobbied: If hitters can use pine tar to grip the bat better — it doesn’t help ’em hit it any farther — we should be able to use pine tar.”
Then again, it comes back to discretion: In 2014, when the Yankees’ Michael Pineda brazenly smeared pine tar on his neck on a chilly night at Fenway Park, it was so overt that the Red Sox felt compelled to object. Pineda got a 10-game suspension and widespread ridicule. But generally, as long as a pitcher is discreet, the other side has no problem with pine tar.
Pine tar is one thing — cheating by the letter of the law, yes, but not by the spirit. Whatever happened to the spitball, the Hall of Fame pitch of Jack Chesbro and Ed Walsh, Stan Coveleski and Red Faber, Burleigh Grimes and Gaylord Perry? Richie Ashburn, who had the most hits of the 1950s, always thought of pitchers as shifty characters, never to be trusted.
Where have all the scoundrels gone?
When I asked Perry in 2018 why more pitchers were not as, shall we say, crafty as they were in his day, he had a short but telling answer: “Well, maybe they don’t need it.” Dan Plesac, who pitched in more than 1,000 games, agreed.
“You’re not looking for a Don Sutton now, a guy that can sink it and cut it and make the ball move,” Plesac says. “If you don’t have velocity, you can’t pitch anymore. How many guys, how many real power pitchers, need to scuff the ball to be successful? Not many. You don’t need to, if your stuff is that good.”
Plesac works for MLB Network, founded in 2009, the hub of baseball’s vast and ever-expanding visual empire. Every fan can watch games on the At Bat app. Every team has a bank of video screens, usually just off the dugout, showing every conceivable angle for replays and analysis. Good luck evading the most sophisticated alarm system in baseball history.
“When there’s so many TV cameras, it’s so hard to get away with it,” says Jason Giambi, who played 20 seasons in the majors. “You have so many sets of eyes on these guys, and especially if they see a pitch that looks really abnormal, the (team video analyst) rewinds it 5,000 times: ‘O.K., what did he do different? Oh, he went to the side of his pants, he went to his belt, he went to the top of his hat.’ Then they start to put together the timeline of every time he’s pitched, does that ball do the same thing? What about his last start, his start before that? And before you know it, they’ve got it down — all right, go tell the umpire to check his hat, or check the side of his pants, or check inside his glove. You can’t hide anymore.”
But what if you could? What if the next Preacher Roe or Gaylord Perry was hiding in plain sight on a diamond near you, fiendishly fooling all the viewers and video technicians at the ballpark and beyond?
He could blacktop a lot of driveways by selling those secrets — and he’d probably keep the supplies after finishing the job. The sticky sealant just might come in handy.
The article is an excerpt from “K: A History of Baseball In Ten Pitches,” by Tyler Kepner, a New York Times sportswriter. The book will be released on April 2.




Supported by
ByGeorge Vecsey
With the Vietnam War dragging on, 1969 was not a good year for discussing the character-building value of the military.
From a distance of half a century, however, it seems rather clear — at least to me — that the loopy young Mets franchise had its spine stiffened by two men trained by the United States Marines.
Two of the steeliest people in the Mets clubhouse were Gil Hodges, the manager, and Tom Seaver, the pitcher, later known as The Franchise. Both could turn downright taut — eyes narrowing, jaws tightening, speech clipped — when reporters or broadcasters or fans or even Mets ballplayers acted as if these were the Same Old Mets.
We reporters were the worst. I know I was conditioned to believe that the Mets were fun, but terminally hapless.
Wipe that smile off your face, Mister. This is no laughing matter.
Hodges had seen combat on Okinawa, while Seaver was a Marine reservist. Semper Fi. They staked out territory and they did not give it up.
Hodges had been part of the Mets in the first goofy days, in spring training 1962, when Casey Stengel was filibustering to catch the public’s attention. Hodges was happy to be back from Los Angeles, in his wife’s home borough of Brooklyn, where he was beloved for his grand decade-plus with the Dodgers. His knee was shot, and Marvin Eugene Throneberry (check out the initials) became the regular first baseman and an immortal Met blunderer.
The Mets were not adequate enough to benefit from Hodges’s Boys of Summer way of doing things. He became the manager of the Washington Senators for what some felt was an apprenticeship for the Mets’ job, which he was offered in 1968.
Seaver arrived from the farm system in 1967, after growing up fast in the Marines and later learning the game under Rod Dedeaux at the University of Southern California. In some ways, Seaver was a normal young man in his early 20s — full of energy, a whooping laugh, pranks on teammates. He could also do The New York Times crossword puzzle and converse with writers. When he was playing, he did not bring up his time in the Marine Corps Reserve in 1962-63, but later he talked proudly about it.
“I was a mediocre student,” Seaver recalled on Veterans Day, Nov. 11, 2011, at a ceremony in Manhattan honoring military veterans. “If it didn’t have a ball involved, I wasn’t much interested.” But the Marines sharpened his focus.
“The principles that I learned in boot camp were the principles that I took to the mound,” he said. “Focus, dedication. I wouldn’t have made it without the Marine Corps.”
Seaver mentioned a picture taken of him on the mound, locked into attention, during the playing of the national anthem. “You look at my feet, they’re in military position, absolutely,” he said. “That’s the discipline that was instilled in me. It’s a very important reason why I’m in Cooperstown.”
It is not clear how much Seaver and Hodges discussed their Marine roots with each other. They had served under vastly different circumstances — Seaver stateside, Hodges facing incoming kamikaze pilots in the Pacific Theater.
Hodges was a college boy from southern Indiana, noticeable because of his muscles. Stengel, on one of his franchise-building conversational rambles, once said that Hodges was so strong “he could squeeze your earbrows off.” Nobody knew what an earbrow was, and nobody wanted to ask.
I had a mentor in the newspaper business who had been a young Columbia University dropout and baseball freak, sent to the island of Okinawa. There were rumors that a large young Marine on the island was a major league ballplayer. (The Dodgers had let Hodges play one game at third base in 1943 before he shipped out.)
On Okinawa, my friend heard rumors that Hodges had been in hand-to-hand combat, but that rumor has been deflated by Mort Zachter, the author of “Gil Hodges: A Hall of Fame Life,” published in 2015. Hodges was awarded a Bronze Star, with the citation mentioning his duties supporting his commanding officer, in a dangerous zone, but there is no mention of his being in direct combat. He surely saw death all around him.
When Hodges became a star with the Dodgers, he often went to the movies in his free time. A friend who accompanied him said Hodges would grow solemn if there was a scene of combat, and he would pray, “Amen,” at every fallen military person.
Hodges carried his Marine steel in the manager’s uniform. When reporters made jokes he smiled weakly and politely, but he did not encourage levity or cynicism.
Few players challenged Hodges, except for the earnest and curious young outfielder Ron Swoboda, otherwise known as Rocky, who had grown used to the garrulous orations of Stengel.
“I would sit and listen to him,” Swoboda said of the Old Man in 2009. “It would sound as if he was speaking in Stengelese, but all of a sudden I’d say, ‘Hey, man, this guy is telling a parable — and it’s aimed at me!’”
By 1969, Casey was three full seasons into retirement and Gil Hodges was the manager. “When you’re young and full of yourself, you do things you regret,” Swoboda said. “Gil sometimes made me feel he was rubbing our noses in his authority, but that was me, that was my fault.
“I remember one time early in 1969 he held a meeting and he said, ‘You guys are professionals, you set your own curfew,’ and somebody suggested two and a half hours after the game, and Gil said it was too long, and I popped up, ‘Gil, why don’t you just tell us?’ I would do my thing like that. Why didn’t I just shut up?”
One player who was definitely in tune with Hodges was the third-year pitcher Tom Seaver. On May 21, 1969, Seaver beat the Braves in Atlanta to bring the Mets to an 18-18 record — the latest in their first eight seasons that they had been even.
“Tom, Tom,” babbled one of the regular reporters (not me, but it easily could have been). “You’re a .500 ball club. Aren’t you going to celebrate?”
Seaver, who could be garrulous when he wanted to be, gave us the Hodges stare.
“What’s so good about .500?” Seaver snapped. “That’s only mediocre. We didn’t come into the season to play .500 ball. I’m tired of the jokes about the old Mets.”
And he wasn’t done. Seaver then invoked two fan-and-writer favorites from the first few years of the Mets.
“Let Rod Kanehl and Marvelous Marv laugh about the Mets. We’re out here to win. You know when we’ll have Champagne? When we win the pennant.”
Seaver and Hodges seemed to have similar drill instructors in the Marines. Hodges was changing the work habits of the team, backed up by having talented young players at his command. Nobody was exempt from protocol. One day he trudged slowly out to left field and inquired about the health of Cleon Jones, his best hitter, who had pursued a ball a little too slowly for Hodges’s taste. The manager then escorted Jones to the dugout, and fans and writers wondered if he might have lost Jones. Instead, Jones played well down the stretch.
Those of us who were around in 1962 — The Year of Marvelous Marv — never thought the Mets, even with those young arms, could ever win anything. But they did win the pennant, and they did spray Champagne.
Just before the World Series, Seaver was asked about the national antiwar protest planned for Oct. 15. He was quoted as asking, “What is so unpatriotic about being against such a terrible war?” He touched off some debates, and stopped commenting on the war, but he had made his point.
The Mets won the World Series in five games, and they sprayed everybody all over again — Seaver being one of the chief celebrants.
In that stunning autumn, we did not think of Seaver and Hodges as ex-Marines, but now it seems that some of their discipline was part of those Amazing Mets.
George Vecsey wrote about the Mets in the 1960s for Newsday and The New York Times.



Supported by
Keeping Score
ByBenjamin Hoffman
Ronald Acuna Jr. is 21 years, 106 days old. He has played just 115 games at the major league level. He has not hit .300 in a season, nor has he reached 30 career home runs. Yet on Tuesday he and the Atlanta Braves agreed to a contract that locks him up for eight years at a record price for a player his age: $100 million.
And the Braves, as ridiculous as it may sound, almost assuredly got a bargain.
The contract for Acuna, which will carry him through his age-28 season — and includes team options that could keep him in Atlanta until he’s 30 — continued a trend this spring in which players, seemingly wary of a slowing free agent market, are signing extensions with their teams earlier than usual. For the players, it can lock in a large payday at a relatively young age but postpone their entry into free agency, a process that for decades had been considered the best way to maximize career earnings.
Mike Troutwas the most prominent player to sign a huge extension this off-season, agreeing to a $360 million extension with the Angels two years before he was set to become a free agent.Nolan Arenado,who was supposed to be the jewel of next year’s free-agent class, signed a $234 million extension with Colorado instead. Chris Sale got $145 million from Boston;Jacob deGromgot $137.5 million from the Mets;Paul Goldschmidtgot $130 million from St. Louis; and Alex Bregman got $100 million from Houston.
And those were just the nine-figure deals.
The extension spree may seem like baseball lavishing its players with cash, but for clubs wary of enormous free-agent deals like the ones signed by Bryce Harper and Manny Machado before this season, it is a way to save money in the long run: lock players up early and they won’t reach free agency at an age in which they can maximize their payday. And those players, unwilling to endureyears of lower payand the process that Harper and Machado went through, are agreeing to take less overall money in exchange for a dose of security.
That seems especially relevant in the case of Acuna, an outfielder who has already done so much at such a young age that two of the players he can most easily be compared to are Harper and Machado.
Last year in his Rookie of the Year Award-winning campaign, Acuna accounted for 4.1 wins above replacement as a 20-year-old despite playing in just 111 games. Going all the way back to John McGraw in 1893, only 24 position players age 20 or younger have recorded a season with a WAR figure of at least 4.0, according to Baseball Reference. That group includes 12 Hall of Famers, three players (Trout, Harper and Machado) on a Hall of Fame track, and Alex Rodriguez, a player who will have a complicated Hall of Fame case when he becomes eligible, but who certainly put up Hall of Fame numbers.
Of the members of that group, only Claudell Washington, an outfielder for several teams in the 1970s and 1980s, and Dick Hoblitzell, a first baseman for Cincinnati and Boston in the early 20th century, failed to live up to their early promise. And there’s Jason Heyward, who despite having been sensational from age 20 to 25, fell off in the latter half of his 20s.
But even accounting for the limitations of Washington, Hoblitzell and the mixed results of Heyward, it remains a relatively solid decision to gamble on players who are stars at age 20 — especially considering the potential savings for the Braves.
Had Acuna eschewed an extension for a more traditional path, he most likely would have spent this season and the next one earning at or near the major league minimum of $555,000. In 2021, he would have entered baseball’s arbitration process, where he most likely could have commanded more than $10 million in his first year, $20 million or more in his second year, and $25 million or more in his third year. He would have been a free agent at 26, presumably setting himself up for a deal worth $30 million or more per year.
So, realistically, Acuna might have cost himself more than $15 million over the lifetime of this deal, and another $25 million or more considering the two $17 million team options that the team can exercise at the end of the eight years. He is also unlikely to hit the open market before turning 30, an age at which players become much less likely to receive lengthy, high-dollar contracts.
There are plenty of reasons to celebrate this deal for both Acuna and the Braves: A player who has been with the organization since he was 16 gets to be paid now instead of waiting for a payday down the road, and Atlanta has secured the face of its franchise through much of that player’s prime. But for the Braves, the upshot includes a healthy bit of savings in the long run.


Supported by
Sports of The Times
ByMichael Powell
Can we talk starting pitchers or, more to the point, their ritual sacrifice on the altar of Major League Baseball analytics?
I put this question to Leo Mazzone, the former pitching coach for the Atlanta Braves and the custodian of one of baseball’s greatest rotations of starting pitchers: Greg Maddux, John Smoltz and Tom Glavine, Hall of Famers all.
The 2018 playoffs and World Series offered a parade of twitchy managers yanking their starting pitchers after four innings, summoning a parade of faceless relievers to throw one mind-numbing fastball after another for fractions of an inning.
This is spectacular for the radar gun industry, but is it watchable and good baseball?
I heard Mazzone snorting on the other end of the phone line, no, no and no. “It is an embarrassment and insults the intelligence,” he said. “They are abusing pitchers and calling it smart.”
Mazzone imparted this gospel to his pitchers: Trying to heave balls as fast as you can is for muscle-beach dolts. A good pitcher throws at 85 to 90 percent of effort and makes the pitch move and hit its location. Varies speeds, too. As for the notion a pitcher can last but five or six innings before batters grow wise and clobber him?
Please.
“A high school coach asked me, ‘Leo what do you think of analytics showing that pitchers struggle the third time through a lineup?’ I’ll tell you want that is, that’s the manager covering his (you know what),” he said.
The equation guys who run most major league teams bow to holy verities: No starting pitcher should throw more than 100 pitches. Some starters should not throw as many as 70. To admire the number of wins a pitcher accumulates or to encourage him to toss a complete game is to expose yourself as a Paleolithic hunter-gatherer. Pitching is all about WHIP and FIP (I’d explain the definitions, but then our heads would hurt) and a conga line of relief pitchers.
Look, on a good day I don’t drag my knuckles along the sidewalks of Flatbush, Brooklyn. I dig sabermetrics and back in the day treated Bill James annuals as religious text. I keep a three-foot-high stack of the analytics-obsessed Baseball Prospectus at home. But at risk of registering as a get-off-my-lawn crank: So much of the wisdom about pitchers is dubious.
I set to thinking about this after watching my Mets spend much of November and December in a modestly lunatic attempt to trade Noah Syndergaard, one of the National League’s best starting pitchers. They appear to have failed at this self-mutilation. Now that they have retained two true aces — Syndergaard and Jacob deGrom, the Cy Young Award winner — why not stretch them out and push them to go deeper into games? What is the point in allowing an ace to pitch six innings before turning the ball over to a committee of anonymous relievers?
Game 4 of the 2018 World Series presented something of a nadir when Los Angeles Dodgers Manager Dave Roberts, a bright fellow no doubt, pulled his starting pitcher after he had yielded a single hit through six and a third innings and was ahead, 4-0. The Dodgers ended up marching six relievers into that game, lost, 9-6, and exited the World Series the next day.
Mazzone pulled out a few of his remaining hairs.
“The greatest teacher for a pitcher is starts,” he says. “Pitch and pitch and pitch. Let a pitcher find himself.
“The problem is that so many pitching coaches and managers are yes-men and don’t want to challenge their front offices.”
There’s a sizable mound of statistical evidence to back such assertions. At risk of giving the quadratic dudes a seizure, I turned toBaseball Referenceand selected 40 pitchers from the past half-century, men who ran the gamut from solid to superb. These are the sort of pitchers you’d expect to see in the postseason, and my list included Bobby Ojeda, Mike Torrez, Steve Avery, Tom Browning, Tom Seaver, Steve Carlton, Ferguson Jenkins and Mazzone’s troika of Hall of Famers. I examined their performances across games, from beginning to end.
For most good pitchers, their worst inning was the first. Once they found a rhythm and once pitches began to crackle, they became progressively more difficult to hit.Tom Seaver’s career earned run average in the first inning was 3.75. His E.R.A. for the last three innings of a game, that dreaded third and fourth time through the batting order, stood at 2.75.
So current analytic wisdom does a headstand.
(By way of insane outlier, Seaver won 25 games in 1969 and helped pitch the Miracle Mets to a World Series championship. He pitched the ninth inning 17 times that season and surrendered not a single run.)
This is a familiar pattern. Mike Mussina gave up fewer runs on average in the seventh, eighth and ninth innings than he did in the first three. He was at his best in the ninth inning. The best inning for Ron Darling and David Wells was the eighth. (Requisite caveat: By definition, these pitchers were having a good outing if they made it to the late innings.)
If you hoped to beat Dodgers pitcherFernando Valenzuela, you were advised to start hacking early. He had a career E.R.A. of 4.25 in the first inning. When Valenzuela was still pitching in the ninth inning, and he got there roughly 127 times in his career, his E.R.A. was 2.19.
Luis Tiant, the Red Sox and Cleveland ace, was nearly as tough. He pitched just over 206 times in the ninth inning and had an E.R.A. of 2.40.
Greg Maddux had a 3.23 E.R.A. in his first three innings and a 2.86 from the seventh inning through the ninth. And while he possessed a good fastball, it was not a three-digit express train. One spring training in the mid-1990s, Maddux, who in a 23-year career piled up 355 fairly meaningful wins, asked to speak with the team’s young pitchers.
Mazzone nodded. Sure thing, Mad Dog, whatever you want. The coach lined up the young guys and Maddux walked over.
“You know why I am a millionaire? Because I can put my fastball wherever I want to,” Maddux told them. “Do you know why I own beachfront property in L.A.? Because I can change speeds. O.K., questions?”
Mazzone was not enraptured by pitch counts. He would not push pitchers to stupid extremes, but he refused to hew to limits without basis in medical fact. He had pitchers run and throw every day in between starts, and they had remarkably few injuries. In one three-year stretch, his pitchers missed a single start.
“We kept track of pitches and I had a clicker,” he said, “but if Tommy Glavine gets a pop-up on a changeup, hell, I’m not counting that.”
He recalled a Braves vice president by the name of Henry Aaron who offered advice about the dangers of radar gun intoxication. “Don’t worry about pure speed,” Aaron said. “You can run a jet airliner through the strike zone, and I will figure out how to rope it down the line. Locate a ball that moves at my knees, and I’m out.”
All of which brings me back to the Mets, a team I’ve followed for many, often hapless, decades. Their manager, Mickey Callaway, sounds as enamored of pitch counts as his peers are. All of this seeps into the brainpans of young pitchers who labor under the impression that five or six innings constitute a day’s work.
Syndergaard is a fine pitcher and susceptible to the idiocies of the age. A year ago he pumped iron in the off-season in hopes of throwing even harder than 100 miles per hour, and that season he blew a muscle in his side. He appears to accept the notion that pitching through the seventh inning lies beyond the limit of human exertion, and last season he posted a 7.88 E.R.A. in that inning.
His rotation mates are no different. On the rare occasions they pitched into the seventh inning, Zack Wheeler and Steven Matz posted calamitous E.R.A.s of 5.65 and 6.35.
Mazzone went to Cooperstown in 2014 for the Hall of Fame inductions of Maddux and Glavine. They got to yakking before the ceremony, and Mazzone asked what they would have done if, in the course of pitching a World Series shutout, he had come to the mound to pull them from the game.
Glavine looked at him, smiled thinly and replied, “Mazz, we were going to have a fight on that mound.”



Supported by
ByKevin Armstrong
PORT ST. LUCIE, Fla. — When Mets Manager Mickey Callaway considered the 64 bodies in his clubhouse at the start of spring training, he noted an improvement.
“We have way more depth than we’ve ever had,” he said.
He mentioned his stockpile of four catchers who could work in the major leagues this season. At first base, he welcomed a four-man competition among Pete Alonso, Dominic Smith, J. D. Davis and Todd Frazier.
“We’re excited that it’s going to be kind of a battle royale for a bunch of positions this year,” he said.
That battle has become something of a war of attrition. Within days of arriving in camp, Jed Lowrie, the utility infielder who signed a two-year contract worth $20 million in the off-season, was flown back to New York to learn that he had a sprained knee capsule. Frazier followed the same flight path to a doctor’s office a few days later with a left oblique strain that required a cortisone shot. The setbacks forced Callaway to start mixing and matching his Grapefruit League lineups before March commenced.
“Unforeseen things are going to happen,” he said. “That’s just the reality of baseball.”
Outfielders have not been immune to the rash of injuries. Jeff McNeil, slated to start in left field, was scratched from the lineup two days after scraping his left wrist while diving for a batted ball during a game. Center fielder Brandon Nimmo missed action because of an upset stomach after cooking chicken for himself.
“We’re going to have to teach him how to cook so he doesn’t miss any more games,” Callaway said.
The unfortunate has been familiar to the Mets of late. Last spring, outfielder Tim Tebow tripped on a sprinkler head during his first workout. Over the summer, pitcher Noah Syndergaard received a diagnosis of hand, foot and mouth disease. In the fall, David Wright retired because of chronic neck and shoulder ailments. All were reminders that the best plans can go sideways quickly.
With opening day less than a month away, here is how the roster looks.
Infielders: Who’s at first? It depends on the day. Alonso led off the exhibition season with a solo home run in his first at-bat, and Davis, who can play first or third, countered by blasting a two-run homer as he went 3 for 5 as a designated hitter.
The Mets are sure-handed up the middle, with Robinson Cano bringing his nifty fielding and a smooth stroke to second base. Shortstop Amed Rosario will be a running threat on the bases, and Adeiny Hechavarria, a late pickup who previously played with the Yankees, “covers us in so many ways,” Callaway said.
When healthy, Lowrie, who has primarily played at second base and shortstop but is expected to start at third for Mets, will provide versatility. So will Frazier, a veteran whose experience is valued in the clubhouse.
Outfielders: Yoenis Cespedes, who is recovering from operations on his heels, is in camp and singing along to country songs in the clubhouse. But he will not be patrolling the outfield anytime soon. Callaway considers Cespedes “the icing on the cake” if he can come back for a late summer run.
For now, center field belongs to Nimmo. McNeil, who may need to be called into duty at third base, will be in left, and Michael Conforto will be in right.
There are plenty of legs with Juan Lagares and Keon Broxton playing reserve roles, but the Mets also need hits. Last season, only one team in the majors had fewer hits than the Mets — the Philadelphia Phillies. Conforto and Company will be counted on to put more balls in play.
Starting Pitchers:
According to Callaway’s calculations, the Mets should plan to use 11 or 12 pitchers this season. Jacob deGrom, who won the Cy Young Award with a 1.70 earned run average last season, and Syndergaard, who posted a 3.03 E.R.A., will anchor the rotation. Both have looked healthy in workouts and game action
Zack Wheeler went 10-1 with a 1.96 E.R.A. down the stretch in the second half of last season, and Jason Vargas was 5-1 with a 2.62 E.R.A. in his final eight starts. Steven Matz will try to build off a season with 30 starts, a career high.
The only certainty is who will take the ball on opening day in Washington.
“I think Jacob decided that last June,” Callaway said.
Bullpen: Cano headlined the seven-player trade that brought him back to New York during the off-season, but Edwin Diaz, the 24-year-old closer who collected 57 saves in 61 chances for Seattle last year, may be the most important part of the transaction for the Mets.
Jeurys Familia, once the closer, returns as the setup man. In six and a half seasons with the Mets before he was traded to Oaklandlast summer, he saved 123 games and his E.R.A. was 2.66.
Seth Lugo can set up, close or start.
Catchers: Wilson Ramos has been well received by the pitching staff. He looks fresh after spending the off-season working on agility drills and convincing General Manager Brodie Van Wagenen that he can do the job despite twice tearing the anterior cruciate ligament in his right knee.
Travis d’Arnaud is returning from Tommy John surgery, and Devin Mesoraco is back behind the plate after catching 21 of deGrom’s starts last season.
Though he can play other positions, d’Arnaud will focus on catcher rather than risk injury during rehabilitation. He could be an option elsewhere, in the outfield or at first base, depending on how the team’s depth holds up.
Supported by
ByReuters
WASHINGTON — The Trump administration on Monday scrapped a historic agreement between Major League Baseball and the Cuban Baseball Federation that would have allowed Cuban players to sign with U.S. teams without needing to defect.
The existing deal will not be allowed to go forward because it was based on an erroneous ruling by the former Obama administration that the Cuban Baseball Federation was not part of Cuba's Communist government, a senior U.S. official said.
The move essentially overturns an agreement reached between MLB and the Cuban federation in December after three years of negotiation under which Cuban players would have had a safe, legal path to playing professionally in the United States. In the past, some Cuban stars have undertaken risky escapes, including being smuggled off the island in speedboats.
The U.S. decision was the latest step by President Donald Trump to roll back the rapprochement with Havana, America's old Cold War foe, that was spearheaded by his predecessor, Barack Obama. Trump has especially stepped up pressure on Cuba recently over its support for Venezuela's socialist president, Nicolas Maduro.
"The agreement with #MLB seeks to stop the trafficking of human beings, encourage cooperation and raise the level of baseball," the Cuban Baseball Federation said on Twitter. "Any contrary idea is false news. Attacks with political motivation against the agreement achieved harm the athletes, their families and the fans."
The senior Trump administration official suggested that the agreement would have subjected the players to "human trafficking" by the Cuban government, making them "pawns of the Cuba dictatorship."
Carlos Tabares, a member of Cuba's 2004 Olympic gold medal-winning squad who until last year played for a Havana team, said the Trump administration was seeking "to destroy us, even through baseball." The MLB deal, he said, would have allowed Cuban players "to enter legally rather than falling into the hands of traffickers and having to risk their lives."
The U.S. official, speaking on condition of anonymity, said the administration would be willing to work with MLB to seek an arrangement consistent with U.S. law.
"We are unsure of the next steps," an MLB source said.
The announcement came just days after the Cuban federation released its first list of 34 players authorized to sign contracts directly with major league teams.
'A PAYMENT TO THE CUBAN GOVERNMENT'
The U.S. Treasury Department on Monday reversed the Obama-era ruling that Cuba's league was not part of the Cuban government, which had laid the groundwork for the baseball deal.
The Trump administration considers the Cuban Baseball Federation to be part of the island's National Sports Institute, which, according to the U.S. official, is a government entity that U.S. law says makes such business dealings illegal.
"A payment to the Cuban Baseball Federation is a payment to the Cuban government," Treasury said in a letter to MLB.
Cuba maintains, however, that its baseball federation is not part of the state. It says the federation falls under the Cuban Olympic Committee, which in turn reports to the International Olympic Committee, not the Cuban government.
MLB teams would have paid the federation a release fee for each Cuban player signed, providing a windfall for Cuban baseball, which has suffered from dwindling budgets and the defection of its best players.
In the past, many Cuban players seeking riches in the big leagues have made dangerous journeys via human traffickers to defect. Others abandoned the Cuban national team while playing abroad.
Cuban MLB players who had defected include Yasiel Puig of the Cincinnati Reds, Yoenis Cespedes of the New York Mets and Jose Dariel Abreu of the Chicago White Sox - all of whom have signed multi-year, multimillion-dollar contracts.
Puig defected from Cuba on a speedboat at age 21 and soon found himself entangled with Mexico's notorious Zetas crime organization, which threatened to chop off his arm if it failed to receive the promised $250,000 fee for his passage.
When Puig finally reached U.S. shores in 2012, he was rewarded with a seven-year, $42 million contract with the Los Angeles Dodgers.
Under the deal agreed by MLB and the Cuban federation in December, MLB teams were going to pay the federation a fee ranging from 15 percent to 25 percent of the value of player contracts.
That money, which was not to be deducted from the player’s salary but be paid on top of it, would have been used to help Cuba further develop its baseball program.
Cuban players older than age 25 and with six years of service in the Cuban league would have been free to sign with MLB teams. Younger players would have needed Cuban baseball’s permission to leave.
(Reporting by Matt Spetalnick, additional reporting by Dan Trotta in New York and Sarah Marsh in Havana; Editing by Bill Berkrot and Tom Brown)
Supported by
ByJay Schreiber
On July 20, 1969, men walked on the moon in what became the centerpiece of one of the more indelible years in American history.
That same day, 50 years ago, the New York Mets split a doubleheader with the Montreal Expos. You could say, so what? But the Mets, until then a baseball punch line, had suddenly become a team to reckon with in the eighth year of their existence. The two games against the Expos gave them a 53-39 record, which meant they were a big, fat 14 games over .500. Considering everything that had come before for the Mets — the initial buffoonery, the occasional lunacy, the lopsided losing records — it seemed that they, too, were now defying gravity.
A month later, on the same weekend as the Woodstock music festival, the Mets really took flight. They swept four games from the San Diego Padres and began a surge that carried them into first place in September and all the way to the World Series in October — which they proceeded to win, in five games, against the heavily favored Baltimore Orioles.
When it was over, after the Mets had been drenched in ticker tape in a parade up Broadway — a feat that had been unimaginable when the season started — it took a while for people to regain their senses.
Just how had this happened? Yes, the Mets had excellent pitching, solid defense at key positions and some very good young players, but their lineup was hardly overwhelming. And yet, that didn’t matter in the regular season, when the Mets won a whopping 100 games and, in the process, beat out a Chicago Cubs team that played three future Hall of Famers every day.
Nor did it matter in the National League Championship Series, when the Mets swept an Atlanta Braves club led by Henry Aaron, one of the best players in the sport’s history. Or in the World Series, when the Mets went up against a mighty Orioles team anchored by the two Robinsons, Frank and Brooks. The Orioles, winners of 109 games in the regular season, seemed unbeatable until the Mets quickly proved otherwise.
Making this all the more remarkable is that the 1969 Mets did not represent the beginning of a dynasty. In the seasons that followed, the Mets won considerably fewer games and while they did make it back to the World Series in 1973, they did so almost by accident, having finished the regular season with a thoroughly mediocre 82-79 record.
But none of that diminishes what occurred in 1969. Here was a group of players who stumbled all over the place in 1962, with fans who embraced them almost in defiance. A team that slowly improved in the years that followed, but only slowly. And yet a team that proceeded to figure it all out for one intensely memorable season.
It is not easy to explain, but 50 years later, it is worth revisiting. Time has taken its toll on this team; a half-dozen players who had significant roles have died, and others, including Tom Seaver, are now struggling with serious health issues. But what endures through all the bittersweetness is what they accomplished together. From the depths of the standings they soared right into space.
NEXT UP:1962: The Bumbling Beginning
George Vecseywrote about the Mets in the 1960s for Newsday and The New York Times.Robert Lipsytecovered the Mets in the 1960s for The New York Times, both as a beat writer and a columnist. The archival material in this section is drawn from articles by a number of Times writers:Leonard Koppett, Joseph Durso, Louis Effrat, Gerald Eskenazi, Robert Lipsyte, Joseph Lelyveld, Robert Teague, George VecseyandGordon S. White. Additional material in this section was written byJay Schreiber. Research was provided byFred Bierman, Elena Gustines, Wayne Kamidoi, Dolores MorrisonandJoe Ward.



Supported by
Baseball’s Hall of Fame shouldn’t continue to overlook someone whose influence on the game has been profound.
ByJamie Malanowski
Mr. Malanowski,a former Little League player with a .125 batting average over 18 games,is a speechwriter.
This week, the Baseball Hall of Fame will announce a new class of inductees, setting off rounds of celebrations — and debates. Fans will argue over whether Mariano Rivera deserves unanimous approval, or whether the use of performance-enhancing drugs should permanently block the enshrinement of Barry Bonds.
Oddly, amid these debates, one of the Hall of Fame’s key omissions is likely to be overlooked. How is it that it has left out — and perhaps not even discussed — the man who has had the greatest influence on baseball in the last 40 years, who has changed how the game is understood, how it is enjoyed and even how it is played? I’m talking about the statistician and historian Bill James.
A graduate of the University of Kansas,Jamesbegan his professional involvement with baseball in the late ’70s, while working nights as a security guard at a cannery. When not foiling pork-and-bean burglaries, he used his free time to record and analyze baseball statistics. He had a quirky curiosity that led him to ask offbeat questions, whose answers he extracted from the numbers he kept. He wasn’t afraid to deflate reputations or debunk conventional wisdom. He turned his findings into articles, and eventually best-selling books. His writing was smart, funny, contentious, and unlike anything fans had ever read.
It may be hard for younger fans to grasp how innumerate baseball was. There were homers and R.B.I.s and batting averages for hitters; wins and losses and E.R.A.s for pitchers. Teams had winning and losing streaks. Instead of analysts, broadcasts had color commentators.
As a result, fans had little understanding of the game’s subtleties. Suddenly, here was James, unearthing hidden explanations, revealing lame assumptions, uncovering the value of overlooked variables. How much did it cost the Cubs to play day games in Wrigley Field? Did Ted Williams lose more homers playing in Fenway Park than Joe DiMaggio lost playing in Yankee Stadium?
James did his best work re-evaluating reputations. He showed that the infielder famous for diving catches actually lacked range, that the genius manager who strategically bunted was actually squandering outs, that more of your favorite slugger’s homers could be ascribed to close fences than to his prodigious power.
James revealed a game in which your eyes deceived you. Abanjo-hittingsecond baseman who walked a lot was a bigger offensive asset than the long-ball threat who struck out a lot. The wily catcher who knew how to frame pitches might be more responsible for strikeouts than the pitcher who threw them.
James did not invent analytics — other students of the game formed the Society for American Baseball Research years before he began his studies. But his lively, provocative writing helped him elevate the field at just the right time. The new network ESPN integrated stats into its programming. Players of the new pastime, fantasy baseball, hungered for stats. Agents and general managers alike gobbled up stats to justify free-agent contracts. Numbers enriched the whole show.
I met James once, at a corporate event in the early ’80s. We were part of a group that attended an ordinary game at Shea Stadium between a poor New York Mets team and the first-place Los Angeles Dodgers. James was a typical fan; he drank a beer, he did the wave. But he also carried a bedraggled notebook, in which he recorded the lineups and the game conditions, drew stick figures showing the pitchers’ windups, and noted every pitch that was thrown.
We were in the middle of a scoreless game when James did something astounding. The Dodgers pitcher had just recorded out No. 1 for the inning, and James said, “The Mets are going to score this inning.” Yeah, right, I thought. One out, nobody on, average hitters coming up. But then, yes, the Mets scored, and again, and again.
“The Dodgers’ starter took 11 pitches to retire the first hitter," James explained. “Pitchers usually need 15 pitches to get through a whole inning.” With the pitcher faltering, he said, “the Mets’ chances dramatically increased.”
This year, watch any game, and you will almost certainly hear the announcers discuss spin ratio, exit velocity, wins above replacement and other analytical concepts. Teams will shift defenders, arrange lineups, substitute players and choose pitches all based on the numbers. You may even gripe about the preponderance of strikeouts and homers — another stat-derived trend.Jamesdid not uncover all these findings, but his analytics revolution pervades baseball — and all major sports are now influenced by analytics. Did you know goalies who start on back-to-back nights record save percentages on average 11 points lower on the second night? N.H.L. general managers do.
Fundamentally, baseball is the same game it has always been — hit, throw, catch. But thanks to Bill James, there have been changes. For one thing, James isnow an executive with the Boston Red Sox.But more important, a new era of fans knows that inside good old country hardball there’s a deeper, richer game. Cooperstown, the next move is yours.
Jamie Malanowski is a speechwriter for Gov. Andrew Cuomo of New York.
Follow The New York Times Opinion section onFacebook,Twitter (@NYTopinion)andInstagram.
An earlier version of this article misstated the name of a research organization. It is the Society for American Baseball Research, not the Society for Advanced Baseball Research.
Supported by
ByVictor Mather
When Bryce Harper hit a powerful eighth-inning home run on Tuesday night, it wrapped up a dramatic homecoming narrative. But getting almost as much buzz was his top-notch bat flip.
It was Harper’s first game back in Washington after leaving the Nationals to join the Philadelphia Phillies as a free agent in the off-season. Before the game, he made a magnanimous statement on Instagram thanking Nationals fans and saying he would “always remember the cheers.”
Nonetheless, he faced a predictable deluge of boos throughout the game from the home fans. (Perhaps they took their cue from the mayor, Muriel Bowser, whotweeted and then deleteda picture of Harper as Benedict Arnold.)
Parked in right field, where Harper plays, was a group of noisy Phillies fans, and Harper took a moment to salute them.
He started slowly, with two strikeouts. But then he had a double and a run-scoring single. In his final at-bat, he powered a shot into the second deck in right, fittingly just above those Phillies fans.
That brought the bat flip. The typical home run flip comes immediately after the swing and tends to be horizontal. Sometimes it is performed with enthusiasm and sometimes with arrogance.
But Harper took his time. He switched hands, then heaved it up one-handed. The toss had good height and tremendous speed, completing several rapid rotations.
That was followed by the home run trot and a complex series of fist bumps and poses with his teammates in the dugout.
Bat flipscan cause hard feelings, as some opposing players tend to feel it violates an unwritten code of the game. Some flips have cleared the benches.
Nationals Manager Davey Martinez was more concerned with his shortstop Trea Turner’s broken finger after the game. “I try not to watch,” he said when asked about his thoughts on bat flips. “It’s the way the game’s evolved.”
Flips are unlikely to become a disciplinary issue like steroids or beanballs. Major League Baseball can’t be too upset, considering it has posted a video highlighting thetop 50 bat flips of all time.
And those unwritten codes do not really translate to other baseball cultures. In South Korea,flamboyant flipsdrawshrugs, not scorn.
Some more memorable flippery:
The nonchalant flip.Junior Lake’s slow, deliberate flip in 2015 prompted an on-field brouhaha.
The disdainful flip.Albert Pujols dripped derision with a delayed toss in 2009.
The historic flip.Barry Bonds tied the home run record with 70 in 2001, then executed a soft, high, looping flip that seemed as if it would never come down.
The long-delayed flip.Jose Ramirez annoyed the Twins in 2015 with a flip that came halfway to first base.
The famous flip.Jose Bautista’s flip from the 2015 division series has yet to be bettered. His homer broke a tie in the deciding game of the series. After the swing, Bautista stood immobile at the plate watching the ball, then performed a muscular hurl that sent his bat deep into foul territory.
“He’s doing stuff kids do in Wiffle ball games,” Rangers reliever Sam Dyson groused.
That’s a Wiffle ball game many people might like to see.

Supported by
ByVictor Mather
Here comes the baseball season, which means, in more and more of the United States, here comes the baseball betting season.
In Europe, where sports betting thrives, wagering on N.F.L. and N.B.A. games has been fairly popular for years, but baseball, mostly unknown on the continent, has not made a huge impact. With the American market opening up after aSupreme Court rulingthat struck down a gambling ban, baseball betting could be ready to take its place alongside hot dogs and apple pie.
So if sports betting is legal in your jurisdiction, peruse these odds and try to find a bet that will keep you in peanuts and Cracker Jack.
Sorry to bore you, butit’s the Boston Red Sox and the Yankees again. The Red Sox won 108 regular-season games and the World Series last year, losing only three postseason games. They are 6-to-1 favorites to repeat. Many bookmakers are putting the Yankees up at the same odds, and some are hedging even further by making the Houston Astros 6-1 as well. Just behind are the World Series runners-up, the Los Angeles Dodgers, at 7-1 or so.
Want to make the big bucks? The Baltimore Orioles were 47-115 last season. If you think that adding Nate Karns and Jesus Sucre will somehow allow them to emulate the Miracle Mets, you can get a price of as much as 500- or 600-1.
A couple of the races seem like locks. The Astros are 1-6 to win the American League West (that means you must put up $6 to win a buck). The Dodgers in the National League West and the Indians in the A.L. Central are 1-4. Not a lot of moneymaking opportunities there. The Red Sox and the Yankees should finish 1-2 in some order in the A.L. East.
But the two remaining races seem like barnburners. In the N.L. East, the Philadelphia Phillies and their big acquisition, Bryce Harper, are favorites along with the Washington Nationals at 2-1. The Atlanta Braves, the defending division champions, are getting a little less respect this year at 3-1. And the Mets, at 7-2, are far from out of the race. Only the Miami Marlins (150-1) are given no hope.
In the N.L. Central, it’s a three-way race, with the Chicago Cubs, the St. Louis Cardinals and the Milwaukee Brewers closely matched at 2-1 or slightly above. Depending on where you bet, any one of them might be a slight favorite.
Even if you don’t like to wager, the odds can be revealing about which teams have a good chance of surprising, or slumping, at least according to the prevailing wisdom.
It probably isn’t too shocking to see the Orioles and the Marlins as long shots. But three teams that had discouraging seasons last year seem to be attracting some betting interest. The Chicago White Sox (62-100) and the Cincinnati Reds (67-95) would seem to have a long way to go. But each is about 10-1 to win its division, a real puncher’s chance. So are the San Diego Padres (66-96), but the reason here is a lot clearer: the arrival of Manny Machado.
It’s unlikely that all three of these teams will turn it around this season, but the odds seem to be telling us that at least one will.
If betting on teams isn’t enough, most bookies are happy to take your action on the players as well.
The players expected to hit the most home runs this year are the Yankees sluggers Giancarlo Stanton (7-1) and Aaron Judge (8-1). That leaves last year’s home run king, Khris Davis of the Athletics, at 10-1.
Davis hit 48 homers last season, while Stanton had 38 and Judge 27 (in 112 games), so the odds might well be testament to the legion of Yankees fans eager to support their favorites.
Mookie Betts of the Red Sox and Jose Altuve of the Astros are favorites in the hits category, while last year’s leader, Whit Merrifield of the Royals, is given little chance of a repeat: 25-1.
The predicted runs batted in champ is J.D. Martinez of the Red Sox at 6-1 after a season with a major-league-leading 130.
Pitching wins can be an unpredictable category. No one has repeated as the majors’ leader since C.C. Sabathia in 2009 and 2010, and bettors have to weigh the quality of the pitcher and of his team. The odds reflect that. Chris Sale of the Red Sox is the favorite, but plenty of other aces — including Max Scherzer of the Nationals, Corey Kluber of the Indians and Justin Verlander of the Astros — are given a good shot.
Season-long bets are all well and good, but they certainly take time to resolve. Action-hungry gamblers will be heading for more traditional fare and betting on the opening day games.
The result of any single baseball game is unpredictable, of course, and many of the opening day contests seem like tossups.
Well, except one. The Yankees, playing at home behind Masahiro Tanaka, are 3½-1 favorites over, yes, the hapless Orioles.



Supported by
Yankees 15, Orioles 3
ByJames Wagner
BALTIMORE — Gary Sanchez stepped to the plate in the ninth inning on Sunday with a chance at history. Four-homer games are more rare than perfect games, and Sanchez had already gone long three times on Sunday as part of an offensive explosion by the wounded Yankees that produced 14 home runs against the Baltimore Orioles this weekend.
With the goal of the at-bat so clear, and with Hanser Alberto, an infielder, on the mound, Sanchez was under enormous pressure to go deep a fourth time.
“I tried to do what everyone was thinking about,” Sanchez said, smiling. “But some anxiety didn’t let me hit it.”
It did not matter that Sanchez flew out to left field. With seven home runs on Sunday, the Yankees still drubbed the Orioles, 15-3, to improve their record to 5-4 and cap a three-game sweep in which 26 of their 29 runs came via the long ball.
“That would’ve been a way to top off,” left fielder Clint Frazier, who clubbed two home runs himself, said of Sanchez. “But three homers isn’t too bad, either.”
Fault Sanchez, the Yankees’ primary catcher, for certain aspects of his game; he has made a handful of baserunning and defensive miscues a week and a half into the season. But do not fault him — or, for that matter, the Yankees’ depleted lineup — for a lack of power.
Serving as the designated hitter on Sunday, Sanchez produced career highs in home runs and runs batted in (six). The four hits and four R.B.I. by Frazier, who missed most of last season because of a concussion, were also career bests.
“I just feel healthier this year, and I feel better,” said Sanchez, who endured the worst all-around season of his career in 2018 along with off-season surgery on his nonthrowing shoulder. “And I hope to keep doing that.”
After the game, Sanchez grinned while describing how thrilled he was with his performance at the plate. His six home runs over all pace a Yankees squad that has 11 players on the injured list. Although the injured hitters Miguel Andujar, Didi Gregorius, Giancarlo Stanton and Aaron Hicks accounted for 119 of the Yankees’ major-league-record 267 homers last season, the lineup still showed off its firepower against the Orioles, who are rebuilding after posting the worst record in baseball in 2018.
“Sometimes, it takes the whole 40-man roster,” Frazier said, adding later, “We’re someone to still be worried about whenever we come to town.”
The power display, which also featured home runs by shortstop Gleyber Torres and catcher Austin Romine, supported the stout pitching of Domingo German, who did not allow a hit until the sixth inning. German has pitched well in two starts for a rotation lacking the ace Luis Severino and C. C. Sabathia, who might return from the I.L. next weekend.
“Now I have the opportunity, I’m doing everything I can to show all my work on the field,” German said. “Every start I want to execute like it’s my last.”
At the plate last year, the Yankees led baseball with 51 percent of their runs coming via homers. They were second entering Sunday.
“Never too much for us,” Yankees Manager Aaron Boone said. “I’m always good with us hitting as much as we need to.”
The Yankees needed Sanchez now, and on Sunday he reinforced the team decision makers’ faith in him — previous defensive and baserunning miscues and all.
“He’s a great player that’s still growing, and it’s our job to help him continue to reach his peak in every facet of the game,” Boone said. “He’s making strides in a lot of areas of the game. And we know we’ve got a special talent on our hands and a guy that impacts the game — period.”
INSIDE PITCH
Sunday’s win was the 2,000th ofBrian Cashman’s 22-season tenure as the Yankees’ general manager.


Supported by
On Baseball
ByTyler Kepner
FORT MYERS, Fla. — The Boston Red Sox ran away with the American League East last summer, then stormed through the postseason with only one loss in each round. It was one of the most emphatic championship runs in recent history — but only in the retelling.
“People generalize and they’ll say, ‘O.K., the Red Sox won 108 games and went 11-3 in the postseason, look how easy it was,’” saidDave Dombrowski, the president of baseball operations, from his office at JetBlue Park this week. “Well, it wasn’t easy. It really wasn’t. During the regular season, even with 108 wins, the Yankees won 100.
“And I know people say, ‘Oh, that’s an eight-game difference,’ which I understand can be quite a bit. But it sure didn’t feel that way.”
The season essentially hinged onBoston’s four-game sweep of the Yankeesat Fenway Park in early August. Had the Yankees won those games instead, both teams would have finished with 104 victories. That is how close the old rivals were.
They diverged this winter, though, with revealing approaches to the off-season. The Red Sox are prepared to rely heavily on their starting rotation, while the Yankees reinvested significantly in their bullpen.
The Yankees gave three-year deals to two free-agent relievers: Zack Britton ($39 million) and Adam Ottavino ($27 million). The Red Sox, who will face the Yankees for the second and final time this spring at Steinbrenner Field on Friday, spent about the same amount to retain starter Nathan Eovaldi for four years and $68 million. But they lost two relievers — Joe Kelly, who signed for three years and $25 million with the Los Angeles Dodgers, and closer Craig Kimbrel, who is unsigned — without replacing them.
“They wanted me back, I wanted to be back here and we were able to make that work,” Eovaldi said Wednesday, after his first start of the exhibition season. “We kept on that same game plan with that goal in mind to be able to come back and win a World Series. We’re taking the little steps now to be able to do that.”
The Red Sox will again have baseball’shighest payroll, at more than $220 million. But they still had to make choices, especially with several important players facing free agency within the next two years.
They chose to keep their sturdy rotation together — at a cost of about $83.5 million for Chris Sale, David Price, Rick Porcello and Eovaldi. Those four and Eduardo Rodriguez, who earns $4.3 million, went 68-28 for Boston last season, including October.
“In my opinion, it’s just good baseball,” said Porcello, the2016 A.L. Cy Young Awardwinner. “Most of the teams that are competing for a World Series year-in and year-out have good starting rotations, and almost all of the teams that have won have had ace-type guys, and guys that fill out the rotation to give them the foundation they need.
“For us as starting pitchers, we want to chew up the most innings as possible and give the team a chance to win as frequently as we can.”
Several teams have shifted to a model that emphasizes quality over bulk from their starters’ outings — fewer innings but more effective ones, a plan that relies on a procession of reliable relievers. The Yankees should have that luxury this season, with Britton and Ottavino to go with Chad Green, Dellin Betances and closer Aroldis Chapman.
The Red Sox bullpen is far less imposing: Matt Barnes, Ryan Brazier, Heath Hembree, Brian Johnson, Tyler Thornburg, Hector Velazquez and another spot to be determined. Dombrowski said he was confident in the group, and in the team’s ability to identify other options if it fails.
“You can find relievers, and relievers have a tendency to come from anywhere,” he said. “History shows you that right now, short of the premium guys, there’s a lot of inconsistency in relievers from year to year. Part of it is they get used so much when they’re pitching well that one season. For me, I just choose to go with the starting pitchers, assuming they’re of quality nature.”
The Red Sox’s trick last fall was in letting their elite starters double as dominant relievers. ManagerAlex Corabrought along the starters slowly last spring training — as he is doing again now — and the sweep of the Yankees in August allowed him to carefully manage their workloads down the stretch.
The result was a mostly fresh rotation, as Sale, Price, Porcello, Eovaldi and Rodriguez all appeared as both starters and relievers in the postseason. Eovaldi pitched in a setup role to help win Games 1 and 2 of the World Series in Boston, then threw 97 pitches in relief at Dodger Stadium in Game 3, an18-inning Red Sox loss.
That was the rare moral victory that also had tangible benefits, galvanizing the Red Sox clubhouse around Eovaldi and crystallizing the starters’ selfless approach — even if they still don’t buy the hoopla.
“Ever since I was watching baseball as a kid, I’m watchingRandy Johnson run out of the bullpenand pitch the eighth inning or whatever,” Porcello said. “As far as I’m concerned, I actually don’t understand the big deal around it, because that’s our job, and if we’re not here to sell out when we have the opportunity to win a World Series, then what are we doing?”
Cora absorbed the starters-as-relievers strategy in 2017 as the bench coach for Houston’s championship team. The Astros and Red Sox showed that the bullpen listed on a regular-season lineup card is not always the same as the one a team will use to win a title.
Dombrowski said it was presumptuous, with a long season ahead and the Yankees always looming, to plan on reprising that plan this October. But Cora is eager for an encore — knowing, perhaps, that it represents this roster’s best chance to repeat.
“It was fun to get text messages: ‘Hey, give me the ball tomorrow,’” Cora said. “It’s a testament to who they are, how they felt and what they wanted. I tell you, we get to October this year, I guarantee you it’s going to be the same thing, the same mode: ‘I’m there for you.’”

Supported by
On Baseball
ByTyler Kepner
TAMPA, Fla. — If the San Diego Padres had stayed away from elite free agents this winter, people would have understood. They gave out the richest contract on last year’s free-agent market, yet finished with their worst record in a decade.
But the Padres could not resist the allure of Manny Machado, and on Tuesday they established a new standard for free agency to get him. They agreed with Machado on a 10-year contract worth $300 million, the most ever guaranteed to a free agent.
The Padres did not announce the agreement, because Machado must first pass a physical, but the deal — which includes an opt-out clause after 2023 — was confirmed by a person in baseball with direct knowledge of it.
Machado, a four-time All-Star at third base and shortstop, spent last season with the Baltimore Orioles and the Los Angeles Dodgers, hitting .297 with 37 homers and 107 R.B.I. He joins first baseman Eric Hosmer —who signed with the Padres last Februaryfor eight years and $144 million — in an effort to revive a team that went 66-96 last season, itseighth losing record in a row.
“There’s not that many guys who get to free agency at that superstar level at 26 years old,” Dodgers starter Clayton Kershaw told reporters in Glendale, Ariz., when asked about Machado. “Ten years seems fair, for sure, and getting that 30 a year is great. I can’t say I’m happy for him — he’s on the Padres now — but it’s good to maybe get that market going a little bit, for sure.”
Until Machado’s agreement, only one free agent,Patrick Corbin of the Washington Nationals, had signed for more than $68 million this off-season. Outfielder Bryce Harper, a former National League most valuable player for Washington, surely hopes to break Machado’s mark soon. Harper has drawn interest from the Philadelphia Phillies and the San Francisco Giants, among others.
As good as Machado is, the Yankees — who lost to Boston in a division series last fall — believe they did not need him.
“The lineup and team that we have is pretty darn good,” outfielder Aaron Judge said. “We won 100 games, so we weren’t in a position, I felt like, that we needed to go out there and grab too many big pieces. We were already set.”
The Yankees have baseball’s other $300 million player,outfielder Giancarlo Stanton, who is entering the fifth year of a 13-year, $325 million contract extension he signed with his previous team, the Miami Marlins. Stanton said Machado’s deal was “great for him,” but it did not seem to quell his dismay at the state of free agency in baseball.
Indeed, Tuesday’s news is unlikely to stifle the rhetoric from players, who always expected Machado and Harper to get lucrative contracts. Players are more concerned about the rank-and-file free agents who have struggled to find jobs as several teams field threadbare rosters.
Stanton cited infielder Mike Moustakas, who hit 38 homers for Kansas City in 2017 and then turned down a one-year qualifying offer for $17.4 million. He lingered on the open market, returned to the Royals for one year and $6.5 million, then signed another one-year deal with Milwaukee for $10 million on Sunday.
“You’ve got guys hitting 30-plus homers who have to settle for one year, below their grade of pay, going year to year,” Stanton said, referring to Moustakas. “We’ve got to figure it out. It’s not good. Not good on the players’ side.”
Baseball’s collective-bargaining agreement clearly encourages teams to rebuild with prospects — that is, to accept losing for a while — by baking in so many incentives to help the worst teams get the best amateur talent. But not all unsigned free agents are unwanted.
One factor we rarely know is the value of the offers free agents reject. Pitchers like Dallas Keuchel and Craig Kimbrel have not found suitable contracts yet, but it is possible they have priced themselves out. The data revolution has changed how teams evaluate players, and those who refuse to accept this can be left out.
For Machado, his youth and performance prevailed in the end, leading to a record deal. The Padres should have plenty of cheap labor around him — they have seven of the game’stop 50 prospects, as ranked by MLB.com — and hope to finally win a World Series for a city with no other major pro sports teams.
For most of their 50 seasons, the Padres have been better known for helping other teams win. This is the franchise that dealt Ozzie Smith to St. Louis,Roberto Alomar to Toronto, Gary Sheffield to the Marlins, Fred McGriff to Atlanta andAnthony Rizzo to the Chicago Cubs. All of those players won championships with their new teams.
Machado struck out against Boston’s Chris Sale to end the World Series last October, but at least he got there. The Padres have not been since 1998. They remain a long way from contention — quick, name two Padres pitchers — but took an important step on Tuesday with a deal that shows there is plenty of money to go around in this sport.



Supported by
ByJames Wagner
Sandy Alderson,who left his post as the Mets’ general managerlast summer because of a cancer recurrence, will return to his baseball roots now that his health has improved.
The Oakland Athletics announced on Tuesday that Alderson, 71, would rejoin the club as a senior adviser in the baseball operations department, two decades after he left the team in the hands of Billy Beane.
Alderson announced on Saturday at the New York Baseball Writers’ Awards dinner, where he received an award honoring his career, that he had been cancer-free for four months. He received a standing ovation.
Alderson began his baseball career with the A’s in 1981 and was one of the sport’s pioneers in sabermetrics. Back then, he counseled Beane, his successor, whose reliance on advanced statistics kept the small-market team competitive and was famously documented in the book “Moneyball.”
“His mentorship and friendship have been invaluable to me over the course of my career, and I look forward to the expertise and perspective he will add at every level of the organization,” Beane, the A’s executive vice president of baseball operations, said of Alderson in a statement issued by the team.
Referring to David Forst, the current A’s general manager, Beane added, “David and I couldn’t be more excited to bring him back to Oakland.”
Alderson was the architect of the A’s teams that won three straight American League pennants from 1988 to ’90, as well as the 1989 World Series. He left in 1998.
“I am really excited to return to the A’s and the Bay Area,” Alderson said in the team’s statement. “I look forward to being as helpful as I can to Billy, David and the rest of the baseball operations staff.”
After his 17-season stint with the Athletics, Alderson spent seven years working in Major League Baseball headquarters and four years as the chief executive of the San Diego Padres, before going back to the M.L.B. commissioner’s office for a year.
From October 2010 until June 2018, Alderson served as the Mets’ general manager, guiding them from a period of financial austerity to the 2015 World Series,during which he dealt with his initial cancer diagnosis, and to a 2016 wild-card game.
Then came a 92-loss season in 2017, a rough first half in 2018 and the cancer recurrence. Alderson took an indefinite leave of absence, with the expectation that the Mets would find a replacement. The team hiredBrodie Van Wagenen as their new general managerin October.
In other front-office news, the Mets announced that their longtime assistant general manager, John Ricco, had moved into a newly created position with the title of senior vice president, senior strategy officer. Ricco, 50, joined the Mets in 2004 and served as a right-hand man to four general managers.
Ricco will now oversee special business projects involving the Mets, while continuing to advise Van Wagenen in baseball matters, such as overseeing salary arbitration, budget and payroll.
Follow James Wagner onTwitter:@ByJamesWagner.
Supported by
ByJames Wagner
TAMPA, Fla. — Over the winter, there was an unusual sight in the offices of Yankee Stadium. For a few days, amid the busy period as front-office employees reshaped rosters with trades and signings, Carlos Beltran was sitting among them, learning how to use the club’s internal networks to view video and file scouting reports.
In December,a year after considering him for their managerial vacancy, the Yankees hired Beltran, a nine-time All-Star who spent two and a half seasons with the Yankees, as a special adviser to General Manager Brian Cashman. While front-office positions like special adviser or special assistant can often be nebulous roles handed to former managers, coaches or players who assist at their leisure —Alex Rodriguez, Mariano Rivera andDavid Wright, to name a few — Cashman said Beltran was approaching his job with a full-time student’s mind-set.
“Some parachute in and out, which is great,” Cashman said. “But some are heavily invested, and he is heavily invested.”
Beltran, 41,retired in 2017 after finally winning a World Series, with the Houston Astros. The title capped what some believe is a career with Hall of Fame credentials: 435 home runs (fourth most by a switch-hitter), 2,725 hits and three Gold Glove awards in addition to his All-Star selections.
And after earning more than $220 million over 20 years in the major leagues, Beltran could be doing anything now, such as sitting on the beach in his native Puerto Rico. But he has chosen to work in the Yankees’ front office, writing his version of scouting reports and counseling the younger players throughout the organization.
“I had a career in baseball, I played at a high level, and I made a lot of money in the big leagues, but man, I want these kids to accomplish their dreams,” he said in Spanish during spring training at the team’s facility in Tampa, Fla. “Those were my dreams, too.”
Before the Yankees settled onAaron Boone as their replacement for Joe Girardi before the 2017 season, Cashman asked Beltran to interview for the manager opening. Beltran had just finished playing, and thus had no background in management, but Cashman admired Beltran for his experience, his commanding presence and his genuine personality.
“There’s passion and joy he brings every day,” Cashman said. “He’s capable of anything he wants to do.”
So Cashman contacted Beltran again, this time about a front-office position. Beltran, who lives in New York, told Cashman what he was interested in working on, and Cashman gave him the freedom to do so. For Beltran, the chance to learn the intricacies of the front office from Cashman, who has won four World Series during his two decades as the Yankees’ general manager, was enticing.
“Now it’s my turn to ask a lot of questions, see what interests me and knock on the needed doors to learn baseball from another point of view,” Beltran said.
For Beltran, that view is from the stands, where the scouts sit and analyze the Yankees’ minor league teams during the season. It’s a different perspective, but Beltran gave himself plenty of training for his new job during his playing days. On road trips, he often spent traveling time watching video of the opposing team’s pitchers and hitters on his iPad and then shared his written notes with teammates and coaches. If his team was trading for a new teammate, he would call friends on the player’s former team to get the lowdown on the new acquisition and his personality.
“I’m passionate about this,” he said. “Since I lived the game, I don’t just talk about the visual aspects, but the feelings of the player or what he might be thinking in difficult situations that sometimes analytics cannot see. The front office looks a lot at the numbers, but I’m talking about the mental side that has value. It’s a cool combination.”
Beltran spent the winter writing and filing notes on several dozen players, mostly on prospects in the Yankees’ system but also some major leaguers. It took him 90 minutes to watch video on a player and write up his thoughts, he said. He averaged two per day.
“He’s breaking swings down and he’s breaking down the pitching mechanics,” said Matt Daley, the Yankees’ assistant director of pro scouting. “He’s getting pretty detailed. It’s good information.”
Beltran has also given the Yankees his perspective on how prospects can be helped to develop, particularly those from Latin America. As a player,Beltran encouraged clubs to hire Spanish-language interpretersto prevent messages from getting lost in translation between players and the team or reporters. Language barriers still persist today, he said, and can be factors in players’ growth.
“He’s speaking from the perspective of a guy who’s just off the field and sees it through a player’s lens, which is a unique aspect,” said Tim Naehring, the Yankees’ vice president for baseball operations. “We don’t have many other guys writing reports or putting their opinions down coming from a teammate’s side of things.”
Beltran will also counsel players throughout the season, as he did during two trips to the Yankees’ spring training this year. He will juggle that plus time at home with his wife and three young children and his baseball academy in Puerto Rico.
“Now, it’s about how I can impact the younger players,” he said. “If they can get something out of one conversation or one bit of advice, then at the end of the day, that’s your legacy.”
Among the players Beltran has advised are infielder Gleyber Torres, 22, and outfielder Estevan Florial, 21, the team’s top prospect, who broke a wrist during spring training. Torres, who is from Venezuela, said he had sought out Beltran for tips on improving his focus and taking better care of his body.
“I’ll keep talking to him and, if anything is needed, I have the trust to ask and know he’ll have an answer,” Torres said.
Florial, who is from the Dominican Republic, said Beltran had advised him on how to better use his legs in his swing and how to sharpen aspects of his defense. “To take the time to help someone who isn’t even a big-leaguer is really great,” he said.
So how do all these responsibilities fit into Beltran’s future? Asked if he wanted to run a team one day, either as a manager or as an executive, Beltran would say only that he loved baseball and wanted to learn new skills.
“This will help me if in some future I want to manage, then I understand how an organization thinks, how to develop an organization, and how they evaluate players,” he said. “But in the future, if I say that managing isn’t for me, maybe I want to be more involved in a front office, I have more tools.”



APRIL 8, 2019
“I wanted to understand why I kept shooting myself in the foot. I wish it was in the foot, actually.”
A-Rod on doping, getting therapy and no longer being the villain.
Alex Rodriguez has, in retirement, fashioned a comeback that far exceeds any reversals he engineered on a baseball field. It wasn’t all that long ago that the former Yankee was one of professional sports’ biggest bad guys, and not without reason. He was suspended for the 2014 season for violating the league’s antidoping rules. Even aside from that, he was widely considered to be vain and disingenuous, especially in his hometown. (The New York Post honored him with “A-Hole” and “A-Rat” cover lines, following allegations that he used performance-enhancing drugs.) But three years after his last game, Rodriguez, newly engaged to Jennifer Lopez, is a respected baseball broadcaster, a warm and self-deprecating presence on social media and a deferential businessman. You couldn’t exactly call his image rehabilitationorganic, given how hard he’s worked at it, but it has no doubt been successful. “I tried to build a certain image while I was playing,” Rodriguez said, “and that plan failed miserably.” Now, he explained simply, “I have more clarity.”
What have you learned that would have madedealing with the press1easier as a player?What I’ve learned is that a lot of it was self-inflicted.
What specifically?I represented myself the wrong way.Coming out of the suspension,2I wanted to be honest, be accurate and be fair with the media — and mix in levity. I could not wait to make fun of myself. Doing that made everybody relax about me. I’d wake up the next morning thinking I was going to get crushed by them for a mistake I’d made. But then I’d see that they’d barely be talking about my [expletive] up because I’d beat them to the punch. I still think that, for the most part, I had a good relationship with the media, but it became excellent postsuspension.
Did the depiction of you as a villain feel like a misrepresentation?I would have booed me, too. I felt that being the tough guy who had all the answers and being robotic was the right thing to do. I was wrong, and now I think it’s O.K. if I say, “I don’t know the answer.”
This is almost more of a philosophical thing, but baseball has a long history of players using performance enhancers —“Ball Four”3talks about guys gobbling amphetamines before games. And I’m thinking of that in conjunction with a pointMalcolm Gladwell once made4in The New Yorker, about how players aren’t allowed to take P.E.D.s, but it’s O.K. for them to get Tommy John surgery, which is also a completely unnatural method of aiding your career. Does it seem at all arbitrary that baseball says P.E.D.s are cheating but certain other things aren’t?I don’t know. I think, with time, we’ll be able to determine what’s what.
Of all the big-time baseball players who were implicated during the steroids era, you seem to have done the best — better than guys like Barry Bonds or Roger Clemens — at coming out of that controversy in a positive way. Why is that?I cannot speak about anybody else. If you’re asking about me, I think it started with taking full responsibility for my missteps. I paid a huge price: the longest suspension in the history of M.L.B. for P.E.D. use. And while I was away, I took that year to reflect. I wanted to understand why I kept shooting myself in the foot. I wish it was in the foot, actually.
What understanding did you arrive at?I’m still a work in progress, but one thing I learned was that I was good enough. I did not need to overreach. And when I turned the lens inward, I found this incredible amount of gratitude and appreciation and respect for others and myself in a way that perhaps was not there in the past. With that attitude, I was able to enjoy life better. It made me a nicer person to be around; it made me a better father.
Before making the personal realizations you’ve described, how distorting was fame to your self-conception and decision-making?I went to my high school prom, and several months later I was playing at Fenway Park. I was good enough physically to be there, but mentally, I was still in high school. I never make excuses for myself, but not benefiting from being on a college campus for four years and having the time to evolve — I lost my way somewhere along the line.
How aware were you of any emotional disconnects in the moment?You know when something doesn’t feel right. What you find is that — and I’ve never thought about it this way before — you suppress that voice that’s telling you not to do the wrong thing.
This is maybe a shot in the dark, but did the suspension really cause this 180-degree epiphany for you? Or was it maybe more that it — and its aftermath — gave you a way of understanding your own story that allowed you to move forward emotionally and publicly?Well, when the suspension first happened, I was pissed off at everyone. I was blaming everyone. It wasn’t until I got deeper into it that I said: No, it’s not their fault. It’s your fault.
Were you in therapy at the time?That’s when I got into it.
Is there any culture of therapy in major-league baseball?What’s more common in baseball is performance coaches. That’s totally different than deep therapy, which is serious business. It was the hardest thing I’ve ever had to do. In many ways, it’s rewiring the brain.
Before your suspension, did you or your advisers ever discuss just coming clean about P.E.D.s? Or was the strategy always deny, deny, deny?This part, I want you to make sure that we’re superclear. Because I want this to be a story that’s about the facts, and it’s not me trying to [expletive] you. I think I didn’t have the tools that I have today. Let’s go to the next one, David, and we’ll come back to this, because that’s real important. I want to make sure that I address that in a clear way.
How consciously, as you’ve transitioned out of playing, have you tried to build a new brand or persona for yourself?Today I showed up here with you, and I didn’t know anything you’d want to talk to me about, and I’d rather have it be that way. Before, I would have studied for six months before sitting down with you. I wanted to be more buttoned-up and have done due diligence and seen what your angle was. Now I just trust we’re going to have a good conversation, and I go for it.
What persona or brand were you trying to build back then?Robotic, tough. Very serious.
How did that Details photo shoot where you were kissing your reflection in a mirror fit in with that image?I cringe at that.5We were ending the photo shoot, and I wanted to run out of there. I think Steven Klein was the photographer, and he was like, Let’s just shoot one more. And I’m like, What? I just want to eat a burger. Let me get out of here.
Were burgers part of your diet back then?No, but I was probably starving. Yeah, I just kissed the mirror, not even thinking. But I did a lot of things like that. I took my shirt off at Central Park anddecided to get sun in the middle of the day.6
Knowing that people would see you and take photographs, right?In Central Park?
Yes.No. Because you think you’ll just do this for 15 to 20 minutes and get some sun. I’m pale as hell. Again, even those situations, if I would have handled them with some levity and more humility, I would have defused the entire thing.
There’s that rumor about your having a portrait of yourself as a centaur.100 percent not true. I wish it was true because it’s such a cool story.
What hasJennifer Lopez7taught you about being a public figure? She’s obviously skilled at it.I’ve never met anyone who’s more honest. She’s so authentic and genuine. It was strange to see someone of such magnitude be so normal, be such a great mother and partner and friend. How can you be like this and then go perform in front of 80,000 people? But that’s her superpower.
Why has balancing your public and private selves in that way been more of a struggle for you?I don’t know. I wish I did.
How hard was the cultural transition from sports to business?There’s financial language that’s different, but in other ways, they’re exactly the same. What you want to do is create a winning culture, where incentive packages are based on the team winning. If you’re not careful and you put in the wrong incentive packages, you can create a culture where everyone is fighting for themselves. The same thing goes in baseball.
There is that expectation in sports that players will sacrifice themselves for the benefit of the team. But if each professional athlete is his or her own business, aren’t the personal incentives fundamentally at odds with the incentives of the team’s management, who are rewarded for team performance? Or is the whole ethos of subsuming your individual self-interest into the team’s a bunch of romantic horse crap perpetuated by those who have a vested interest inathletes’ continuing to think that way?8Look, I played for 22 years andwon one championship.9Dan Marino and Charles Barkley — they didn’t have championships, and to this day I know they hear the echoes. I feared that. So ’09 was an amazing experience, but the other half was relief. But I also had already made a small fortune. It’d probably be different if you asked mewhen I hadn’t signed my contract.10Then that becomes a question of would you rather hit .330 and not win or .270 and win? That’s where it gets a little tricky.
Because that batting-average difference equates to a difference of millions of dollars in salary?Tens of millions. But there are unique players that are truly all about winning. Johnny Damon, Derek Jeter, Andy Pettitte, Dustin Pedroia.
Do you include yourself on that list?I do. I do. I also had an incredible passion to be great. But yeah, probably I do. That’s why I moved over to third base from shortstop. That’s an example of putting the team ahead of myself.
Your life as a baseball player was so regimented. Do you miss that structure?I have as predictable a schedule as I can, but nothing will be as predictable as a baseball season. I was in love with that structure. I had a list of my 10 things I had to do, and I would check it every night before I went to bed to see how many I’d done. I was maniacal about my work ethic. When I was about 19 years old, I played with aguy by the name of Joey Cora.11He’s 5-foot-7 on a good day, he had knee problems and I saw him arriving at the stadium at 11 in the morning for a 7 o’clock game. I saw the way he took care of his body — all the work he did to get ready to play. And here I was a young shortstop hitting .358. I’m going down the stretch competing for the M.V.P., and nothing hurt. I felt like I could rip through a wall, and the wall would hurt, right? God, those were the good old days. But I remember sitting down and watching Joey Cora, and I’m like, His body hurts. He doesn’t complain. He just gets to the clubhouse earlier and earlier. And I said, If I can take my God-given ability and have his type of hunger and desire, I’ll take my chances.
Do you still have a checklist you look at every night?I do. I’m old school. I remember things better if I write them out. The other day, Jennifer said something brilliant at, like, 2 in the morning. I reached over to get my notebook, and everything falls on the floor. Then I grabbed it and wrote it down.
What’d she say?It was about Mariano Rivera. She said, “Mo getting 100 percent12tells you more about his greatness off the field than it does on the field.” I thought, That’s so true. I played with him all these years, and I couldn’t have come up with that.
When you were playing, did you ever see another player and think he was better than you?If you take away my first year and my last season, I don’t think I ever saw that.
Would the answer be different if you’d played against Barry Bonds?I played against Barry. Interleague.
Do you look up to anyone in the business world the way, as a kid, you looked up to, say, Cal Ripken?Think about what Jamie Dimon has done at J.P. Morgan. Barry Sternlicht at Starwood. Jon Gray at Blackstone. Obviously, our Babe Ruth is Warren Buffett.
Buffett’s philanthropy is impressive.My passion in giving back is for education. I’ve had an opportunity to co-teach a class at Stanford Business School.
What was the class?Reputation management.
Was the key lesson authenticity?That was definitely up there. And not being afraid of pivoting.
Something a shortstop is good at. How did getting rich at a young age change your relationships with the people around you?You have a young kid who learned how to play baseball at the Boys & Girls Clubs. Then you climb through the system, you become the No. 1 draft pick. You bypass college. At 21, you get over $10 million in a contract, which is crazy. Then you get a contract that breaks the all-time record in sports. Usually journeys have an arc of many years, but this all happened to me in seven or eight years after high school. So it was a culture shock for me and those around me. There’s no preparation for it.
What were the effects of that culture shock?People around you think that you have all that cash. Whatever they read in the paper you signed for, they feel like someone came in a Brink’s truck and dumped all the money in your garage. And for whatever reason, some people think, Where’s my cut? When that doesn’t happen for them, it can grow into resentment and disappointment.
Let’s revisit the question I was asking earlier. Before being suspended, was the idea of coming clean about P.E.D.s ever discussed?I’ve taken the position of just owning everything. At some point, and maybe it’s in the future, I feel like this is an answer I would like to give on-camera because I think people have to see my sincerity. I’m giving it to you straight because I respect you and I don’t want you to think that I’m [expletive] you in any way. So that’s why I’d rather step away and say, “David, I’d rather not answer that because I’m not ready to give that truth yet.” Does that make sense?
I think I understand what you’re saying. What’s the one piece of advice you have for other athletes trying to transition into business?You have to find people that are experienced, conservative, have alignment with you and have a moral compass. There are so many pitfalls along the way, and if someone doesn’t have a moral compass, there’ll be trouble.
David Marchese is the Magazine’s Talk columnist.
This interview has been edited and condensed for clarity from two conversations.

April 1, 2019
March 19, 2019
March 11, 2019
March 1, 2019
Supported by
daily crossword column
Zhouqin Burnikel opens our solving ... well, you know.
ByDeb Amlen
TUESDAY PUZZLE— Another fun one from Zhouqin Burnikel, and while we’ve seen this sort of theme before, I don’t remember if we’ve seen it the way she presents it.
In nontheme news, while there is a bit of glue holding the grid together, I found it to be a smooth and fun solve.
The clues are all very straightforward. The only thing that may give some younger solvers a run for their money is if they do not remember the book or TV series, “ROOTS,” and the central character, Kunta KINTE.
Also, congratulations to actress Uma THURMAN, for putting the THURMAN back in the puzzle. Before this puzzle, THURMAN had not been seen in The New York Times Crossword for more than 40 years, and it had only been clued to baseball player THURMAN Munson (Hi, kids!) One day, maybe in a late-week puzzle, I hope to see the actress’s father in the puzzle,Robert THURMAN, the linguist and Buddhist author.
Thurs., March 28 is officially baseball’s OPENING DAY, but we are celebrating early and succinctly, in the sense that Ms. Burnikel’s theme is about abbreviations for the days of the week, which are in order when read from top to bottom.
The first parts of the starred theme entries are the abbreviations, starting with SUN. For SUNday in 1A’s SUNG, followed by MON. for MONday in 16A’s MONTE CARLO. That is followed by my favorite theme entry, TUES. for TU ES BELLE (why thank you very much!), and so on.
As I mentioned, the revealer, at 62A, is OPENING DAY, because that is what the days do: They open the theme entries.
I struggled with the Tuesday answer. Just could not find any solid English word or phrase for this theme entry. I did try my best to make the surrounding fill as friendly as possible.
Almost finished solving but need abitmore help? We’ve got you covered.
Warning: There be spoilers ahead, butsubscribers can take a peek at the answer key.
Trying to get back to the puzzle page?Right here.
Your thoughts?
Deb Amlen is the crossword columnist. She has been writing theWordplay columnsince 2011 and believes that everyone can learn to solve the Times crossword. Even the Saturdays.@NYTimesWordplay
Supported by
On Baseball
ByTyler Kepner
Whenever Major League Baseball opens a season in Japan, count on the Oakland Athletics to show up. The regular season will start at the Tokyo Dome for the fifth time on Wednesday, and this is the third time in a row that the A’s will be there.
They are never the main draw, but they love it.
“It’s cool how baseball is such a big part of their culture,” outfielder Stephen Piscotty said in Mesa, Ariz., a few days before the A’s left spring training. “I can’t wait. I was just so fired up when I heard we were going.”
The A’s are there, essentially, because the Seattle Mariners and Ichiro Suzuki need an opponent. The Marinersabruptly ended Suzuki’s season last Mayafter 15 lackluster games, but he will be active on Wednesday and Thursday in games that will start at 5:35 a.m. Eastern, and hoping to add to his career hits total of 4,367 in the majors and Japan.
Oakland, meanwhile, is hoping to stage a revival of 2012, when its visit here began an improbable run to a division title — and a three-year playoff streak. The A’s faced Seattle to begin that season and opened with the Boston Red Sox in Tokyo in 2008.
“It gets you even closer,” Manager Bob Melvin said of the season-opening trip. “We have some new guys here this year but we do have a core group that’s been together, came up through the minor leagues together, has won together. All that plays, and there’s value in that.”
The A’s talk a lot about intangibles, which might seem odd forthe team most responsible for the analytics wavethat has washed across the game this century. But they improved to 97 wins last season, from 75 in 2017, so hear them out. The path to their improbable wild-card berth, closer Blake Treinen said, started with a selfless attitude.
“When everybody does that, a beautiful thing happens, and that’s what happened with us last year,” he said. “I mean, nobody even guessed 80 wins. Nobody guessed 75, probably. You can stack everything up into analytics if you want, and there’s a place for it, but there’s also a place for heart.”
Heart, yes — but Oakland’s formula also includes home runs, stingy relief pitching and, especially, stellar defense from Matt Chapman and Matt Olson, cornerstones on the corners. Olson won a Gold Glove at first base and Chapman won it at third base, while adding a Platinum Glove forbest overall fielderin the American League.
“I haven’t got it yet; I think they present it during the year and then you get to take it home,” said Chapman, 25. “But I don’t have a house, so it’s going to go in my parents’ front room, probably. They’ll probably put the Gold Glove and the Platinum Glove in their house, and hopefully some more to come.”
Last season was Chapman’s first full year in the majors — except for a one-game injury rehabilitation assignment — as it was for Olson, who was the only A.L. player to appear in all 162 games.
Olson’s agility and long levers — he is 6 feet 5 inches — were a big help for Chapman and shortstop Marcus Semien. A reliable first baseman is perhaps more important for the A’s than for any other team because their ballpark has the most foul territory in the majors, and a throw that skips past Olson would typically result in two extra bases.
“I can’t tell you how many times he saved an on-the-run play I made that I threw up the line, or he dug out,” Chapman said. “He’s like 10 feet tall on the bag, but then he’ll pick anything and go in the line; he’s not afraid to sacrifice his body. I’m thankful for him. I probably owe him some steak dinners, now that I think about it.”
Only the Yankees and the Los Angeles Dodgers hit more homers last season than the A’s, who bring back their top four home-run hitters: Khris Davis (the major-league leader with 48), Olson (29), Piscotty (27) and Chapman (24). But they added only Marco Estrada to a thin starting rotation, and Melvin would prefer not to use an opener, as he did inlast fall’s wild-card loss to the Yankees.
That makes it essential for the A’s to prevent runs with standout defense, and Chapman sets the standard.
“He’s a freak athlete, to start,” Olson said. “He gets to some things I had never seen before I played with him. He’s consistent, he’s hard-working. You can find him in batting practice every day, running himself tired taking ground balls. We always say he’s like a dog, just out there having fun.”
Chapman attended El Toro High School in Lake Forest, Calif., withNolan Arenadoof the Colorado Rockies, the perennial N.L. Gold Glove third baseman who is two years older. Both players were shortstops then, but Chapman said he closely followed top third basemen like Adrian Beltre, Evan Longoria and David Wright. To Melvin, Chapman already belongs in their class.
“The arm strength, the ground that he covers, both on the ground and in the air — and at our ballpark, in the air is big, because it’s down into the bullpen, it’s over to the dugout,” Melvin said. “With shifts, you put him at shortstop and you know he’s going to cover the whole left side of the infield — andwantsto cover the whole left side of the infield.”
Added Melvin, who has played and managed in the majors for 25 seasons: “I don’t know that I’ve been around as talented a defender as he is, probably ever.”
Suzuki’s return to the Mariners’ active roster will command the most attention in the opening series, of course; he is 45 years old and a baseball treasure on two continents. But the most captivating, in-his-prime talent is probably Chapman, and the platinum glove so indispensable to his team.



In search of a way to save his career, the Yankees’ newest reliever and his father built a pitching oasis uptown.
Adam Ottavino, a former relief pitcher for the Colorado Rockies, warmed up last month at a facility he rents in Harlem from his father-in-law. He said it had helped him improve his velocity and cook up a devastating slider.CreditCreditMichael Owens for The New York Times
Supported by
ByMatt Foley
Photographs and Video byMichael Owens
The ambient pop of a catcher’s mitt greets you before you see the interior of the Lab. Inside the unmarked door on St. Nicholas Avenue in Harlem, past the canvas tarp blacking out the windows and around the ladder serving as a makeshift camera stand, awaits an 80-foot-long pitching mecca where the outside world quickly disappears.
The hurried passers-by might think this place amiss, but the former shoe store two blocks from the Apollo Theater and beneath a Chuck E. Cheese’s feels just right to the ballplayers who trek uptown to hone their craft.
On a Wednesday in January, that group included Adam Ottavino, the facility’s gatekeeper, host and a major league reliever for the past seven seasons; four minor league pitchers; and one Baruch College catcher. Ottavino’s father, John, an actor based in Brooklyn, is also there.
“These guys are just a bunch of big kids,” said the older Ottavino, gesturing to the men aged 22 to 33. “I come in and clean the place once a week. If they can’t find something, I usually know where it is.”
On this day, that meant finding a misplaced blue lacrosse ball that his son uses for warm-up exercises. On any other Wednesday, Adam Ottavino would be throwing off the portable pitching mound, but on the eve of the day his life would change, there was a bit too much at stake.
“Something good might be happening soon,” a coy Ottavino told the five fellow ballplayers who hope to follow in his footsteps. “I can’t get injured today.”
The next day, Jan. 17, Ottavino, a 33-year-old right-hander from Park Slope,completed a three-year, $27 million contractwith the Yankees.
At the Lab, Ottavino sat behind a laptop and a tripod, filming his friends with a small, blue 3,350-frame-per-second camera and giving advice between pitches. The cameras are part of the data-driven pursuit with which Ottavino has saved his career. Now, after a breakout 2018 season with the Colorado Rockies, he’s spreading the word as he prepares for spring training, which opens Thursday.
“You learn things in here, about preparation and practice, that you didn’t even expect to pick up,” said Alex Katz, a St. John’s alumnus now in the Chicago White Sox organization. When Katz finished throwing, one of the Lab’s most loyal regulars, a 30-year-old left-hander named Andres Caceres, took the mound. A Queens native and veteran of independent leagues, Caceres is trying to perfect a cutter with tons of late movement.
“Whatever it is, it’s filthy,” said Ottavino, suggesting Caceres put more pressure on his pointer finger.
Asked about his role as the veteran sage in a circle of peers still chasing their major league dreams, Ottavino was direct: He’s no one’s superior, nor has he cracked some magic code. Rather, he is still searching for ways to improve.
“I don’t ever want to be the guy who’s always telling people what they’re doing right or wrong,” Ottavino said. “But if I do have some insight, I try to be fair about sharing it and see if we can get each other better. I learn from these guys all the time.”
A die-hard Yankees fan, Ottavino was at David Wells’s perfect game in 1998 and attended the team’s Fanfest annually with his father. Ottavino played ball at the Youth Service League in Brooklyn and graduated from Berkeley Carroll School in Park Slope in 2003. Three years later, he was drafted by the St. Louis Cardinals in the first round out of Northeastern University.
He made his debut with the Cardinals in 2010 and was claimed off waivers by Colorado in 2012. After missing most of two seasons because of Tommy John surgery, Ottavino struggled mightily in 2017. He logged a 5.06 earned run average and 39 walks in 53 1/3 innings and was left off the playoff roster.
“I knew the next year was do or die for my career,” Ottavino said. “But that’s the stuff I really enjoy — attacking the root of the problem. It’s better that I hit rock bottom because I wasn’t holding on to anything I’d done before.”
A power pitcher with a dominant slider, Ottavino decided his command and consistency needed fixing. Having spent time at Driveline —a data-driven performance training centerin Washington State — he determined that videotaping every practice session would be his answer, rather than making adjustments based on “feel” or opinion. Fully committed to coaching himself, he bought two cameras — a Rapsodo to measure spin rate and a high-speed Edgertronic SC2 that compresses each pitch into a slow-motion replay. Then he worked to become more fluent in the data.
The resulting knowledge, he said, helped establish a consistent foundation and led to increased confidence. The only problem? Ottavino had nowhere to do any of this. His off-season throwing partner, the Mets starter Steven Matz, had moved away, and daily trips to a facility on Long Island ate up too much time that could be spent with his wife and two toddlers.
In stepped his father-in-law, a developer with a vacant Harlem storefront for rent. After Ottavino, with his father’s help, spent two weeks laying turf, buying equipment and learning to use the cameras, the Labwas in sessionand the real fun began.
“If he didn’t have this place,” John Ottavino said, “it might have been over for him.”
Ottavino was one of the best relievers in baseball last season with a 2.43 E.R.A. and a career-best 112 strikeouts to 36 walks in 77 2/3 innings. He held right-handed batters to a devastating .142 average and ranked 12th in the majors with 12.98 strikeouts per nine innings. He shut down a Chicago Cubs rally in the National League wild-card game last season, proving capable of getting postseason outs. Can he do it in the Bronx?
Ottavino said the time spent hidden in Harlem — “scheming in an evil lair,” he joked — had prepared him for the challenge.
“You want to show up to spring training with a secret weapon,” he said.
The topic of pitching at Yankee Stadium has often been discussed. In December, he boasted on a podcast that he “would strike Babe Ruth out every time” because players these days are so much better prepared physically.
“If I have a slow start, I’ll never hear the end of it,” he said.
The Lab, in its current state, will close for good this month. Ottavino, Katz, Caceres and the other honorary members will report to their respective clubs with new tricks to unveil, hoping to rescue or advance however much career they have left.
Ottavino, his wife and the children are moving to the suburbs, where he said he would find a suitable space in Westchester County for another lab. So long as it’s hidden, preferably in a dark basement. Or maybe a wooded cabin.
Supported by
On Baseball
ByTyler Kepner
SARASOTA, Fla. — The Baltimore Orioles won the first World Series of Mike Elias’s lifetimein 1983, when he was 9 months old. They have not been back since.
Elias, Baltimore’s new general manager, grew up in Northern Virginia and remembers watching the Orioles at Camden Yards in the mid-1990s. Those teams were stuffed with future Hall of Famers — Cal Ripken Jr., Mike Mussina, Roberto Alomar — and twice made deep playoff runs.
“I just remember you felt so close to the field, and the stadium was packed to the brim, and the passion of the town and the fan base was on full display,” Elias said on Thursday in his office at Ed Smith Stadium. “Even today, I can see how important this team is to the city and what a baseball city it is. The fan base is engaged and educated in a way you don’t get in every market.”
Last season, though, those fans stayed away from Camden Yards like never before. The Orioles, who ranked first or second in the American League in attendance from 1992 through 2000, were 14th last season, ahead of only Tampa Bay. Their average crowd size dropped below 20,000 per game asthe Orioles went 47-115, a mind-bending 61 games behind the Boston Red Sox. No team had finished so far out of first placein 76 years.
“You’d be foolish to flush it away and not at least attempt to try to take something away from it,” first baseman Chris Davis said. “You learn the most when you struggle and face challenges.”
Davis, whose .168 average last year was the lowest ever for a player with at least 500 plate appearances, said he learned to be more open with teammates, to not let his frustration fester. The Orioles’ owners learned it was time to finally rebuild, and Elias was the natural choice as the architect.
Elias,who replaced Dan Duquette, was most recently the assistant general manager for the Houston Astros. He joined the Astros before the 2012 season, when they were the majors’ worst team, and helped build them into champions. A former pitcher at Yale, Elias also helped the St. Louis Cardinals win a title while serving in a variety of scouting jobs.
“Mike has the benefit of having seen two different, successful models that have both gone through a lot of transformation,” said Astros General ManagerJeff Luhnow, who was Elias’s boss in St. Louis and Houston. “He’s going to be able to identify, in a way that others might not be able to, what the Orioles actually need to do to be consistently good again.”
In Baltimore, Elias faces two of the same problems he and Luhnow inherited in Houston: A struggling farm system and the absence of an analytics department. Some teams, like the Red Sox, employ a research and development staff of 15 or more people. The Orioles had no analysts until Elias broughtSig Mejdalfrom Houston as his assistant general manager for analytics.
Mejdal, a former NASA researcher, thrives in baseball start-ups: He built the Cardinals’ analytics department in the mid-2000s, when few teams besides the Oakland Athletics valued new metrics, and then joined the Astros with Luhnow and did it there, too.
The success of those organizations, and others, makes it harder to exploit inefficiencies, and the Orioles’ division rivals — the wealthy Red Sox and Yankees, plus the Tampa Bay Rays and the Toronto Blue Jays — are all committed to data. With other losing teams also tearing down, this is the most challenging project yet for Elias and Mejdal.
“Baseball is a lot different now than it was just seven years ago when we went to Houston,” Mejdal said. “We’re in a division with some of the richest and most innovative teams in baseball, so simply bringing in better processes is not going to ensure a division title. If we do want to win one or a few, this is a mandatory change in the current environment.”
The Orioles are far from hopeless. They have not won a game beyond the divisional round since 1997, but they had the American League’s best record from 2012 through 2016, reaching the postseason three times. The trick is sustaining a winner, and for that model, Elias cites the Cardinals, a mid-market franchise with 12 playoff appearances — and only one losing record — in the 2000s.
“They have done such a great job of not overextending themselves, or painting themselves into a corner,” Elias said. “You have to make some difficult decisions and make your decisions well, which is a challenge on us as a front office, but it is possible to maintain a long, competitive state by having a quality organization, drafting well, making shrewd decisions, and not making emotional, irresponsible decisions when it comes to free agents or extensions.”
The Orioles’ emphasis is clearly on the future — establishing a much stronger presence in Latin America, drafting first over all this June, adding staffers to a lean front office. Themajor league rosteris in flux.
“It’s an open competition in a lot of ways, in a lot of places — on the mound, on defense,” said Brandon Hyde, the Orioles’ rookie manager. “There’s a lot of spots that are open, and open in a great way.”
Hyde, 45, was another fitting hire, to replaceManager Buck Showalter.Hyde spent the last seven seasons with the Chicago Cubs, another team with a deliberate rebuild that worked. He was a minor league field coordinator, player-development director and major league coach for the Cubs, who revived a dormant franchise with smart trades and draft choices.
“A lot of those young guys came a lot faster than we thought, too,” Hyde said. “The same thing with Houston.”
The Cubs, the Astros and the Cardinals now come to camp every spring training expecting to compete for a championship. That goal seems far off for the Orioles, but at least they have the right blueprint.
“I think we’ll look back maybe a year or two from now and see what we had this year, and it’ll be kind of a special moment to see what we’ve become,” pitcher Dylan Bundy said. “You’ve got to start somewhere, and it starts this year.”


Supported by
On Baseball
ByTyler Kepner
The Oakland Athletics were overjoyed to choose Kyler Murray with the ninth pick in the baseball draft last June.
“We just don’t see athletes like this on the baseball field very often,” their scouting director, Eric Kubota,said then, praising Murray’s instincts despite his relative lack of baseball experience. “He’s just a tremendous athlete, which can translate to the baseball field in a lot of ways. He has a chance to really be dominant on both the offensive end and from a defensive standpoint.”
Kubota said the risk of Murray’s playing quarterback at the University of Oklahoma was worth taking.
“Frankly, we’re kind of excited to be an Oklahoma fan for 12 games,” he said.
Everybody knows what happened next. Those 12 regular-season games led to the conference title game and the Orange Bowl, and by the end, Murray had more than 5,000 all-purpose yards, 54 overall touchdowns, a Heisman Trophy — and a new career path.
Murray announcedvia Twitteron Monday that he was “firmly and fully committing my life and time to becoming an N.F.L. quarterback.” His statement made no mention of baseball, the A’s, or the $4.6 million deal he reached with them last June, with the promise to play only baseball after the 2018 college football season.
The A’s were the first team to hold formal workouts for pitchers and catchers on Monday — they started earlier than other teams, to prepare for a season-opening series in Japan with the Seattle Mariners on March 20 and 21 — and Murray will not be joining them. He will return $1.29 million of his $1.5 million signing bonus,according to ESPN, and will not collect the remaining $3.16 million that he was due to be paid next month.
He had been assigned a locker in the clubhouse, and on Monday morning, Oakland officials had expressed hope that Murray would soon slip into his No. 73 jersey.
Bob Melvin, the A’s manager, said he was“cautiously optimistic”that Murray would choose baseball, according to the San Francisco Chronicle. Yet, realistically, those hopes had been dimming since Murray declared for the N.F.L. draft on Jan. 14. The A’s retain his rights should Murray ever reconsider, but they will get no compensation pick for his defection. They gambled and lost — but baseball lost even bigger.
Murray teased the possibility of playing both sports in a photo he posted to Twitter in November, re-enacting a ubiquitous Bo Jackson photo from the 1980s by posing shirtless with football pads on his shoulders and a baseball bat behind his back.
But Jackson, of course, did not play quarterback, an all-consuming position that leaves no room for distraction. To maximize his appeal to teams — and his potential for success — Murray chose football exclusively, which most likely will bring him more money, at least at first, and definitely offers a quicker path to glory.
The sports are fundamentally different in their development processes, of course. Almost every baseball player logs years in the minors, riding buses to remote outposts for a punishing daily test that is at least as much mental as physical. A first-round N.F.L. quarterback is typically hailed as the instant savior of his franchise.
Murray’s predecessor as Heisman Trophy winner and Oklahoma quarterback, Baker Mayfield,needed one monthto establish himself as the starter for the Cleveland Browns. He sat the first two weeks, came off the bench in Week 3 and was starting for good by Sept. 30. What’s more appealing to a 21-year-old athlete: the Mayfield plan, or a summer trying to hit sliders for an A’s affiliate in Beloit, Wis., or Stockton, Calif.?
Murray’s uncle, Calvin Murray, offers an example of the uncertainties of life as a baseball prospect. The San Francisco Giants chose Calvin Murray with theseventh overall pickin the 1992 draft. He played more than 1,600 professional games, but fewer than 300 in the majors. The player taken one pick before Murray did just a bit better. His name was Derek Jeter.
We’ll probably never know what Kyler Murray could have been as a baseball player. He could always try the sport again if football fizzles, asTim Tebowis doing with the Mets. But baseball, as an institution, does not give itself the best chance to attract an athlete like Murray, whose bonus potential was limited by the strict draft-slotting system instituted in 2012.
The draft system has always incentivized losing, to some extent — in 2009 and 2010, the Washington Nationals plotted a new course by taking Stephen Strasburg and Bryce Harper first over all in consecutive drafts. But by awarding a fixed amount of bonus money to teams — with the worst team getting by far the largest allowance — the new rules have greatly encouraged protracted rebuilding.
The Houston Astros understood this better than most, and became a perennial power by using the system to their advantage. They have spawned so many imitators that a record eight teams tallied 95 losses last season.
The players’ union has been dismayed by this trend, which has lessened demand — and therefore salaries — for veteran free agents. Murray’s case shows another regrettable consequence. Perhaps if the A’s had been able to offer more money to Murray last June, they could have kept him off the football field entirely.
Instead, their $4.6 million bought only a half-measure, allowing Murray one final fling with an old flame. As it turns out, he fell truly, madly, deeply back in love. The A’s get their ring back, but baseball is left at the altar.


Supported by
On Baseball
ByTyler Kepner
PEORIA, Ariz. — Practice would not start for hours, but there wasRandy Jones, the most durable pitcher in the sleepy half-century of the San Diego Padres, with his jersey buttoned all the way to the top. His floppy Rawlings glove, the very one he used in 1975, is older than General Manager A.J. Preller and Manager Andy Green. Jones has 100 career victories — plus another overthroat cancer, two years ago — and seems eager for more.
“I’m just so encouraged,” said Jones, 69, as he surveyed the Padres’ locker room at the Peoria Sports Complex the other morning. “It’s so much more fun. The competition is real here — and there are expectations, which is what you need.”
After claiming one of the most prized free agents in Manny Machado this off-season, the Padres are facing something rare for their franchise: high expectations. They have lost more games than any other franchise since they started play in 1969, and have managed just 14 winning seasons, no championships and one lingering stereotype.
“That laid-back atmosphere of San Diego — these players have got to get beyond that; they’ve got to stay focused,” said Jones, who won a Cy Young Award and holds the team record for starts and innings. “Over the 50 years I’ve watched this organization, that might be a challenge, a little bit. It’s just San Diego itself. Keeping that intensity, it takes a little more work in San Diego than maybe some other cities.”
Intensity should not be a problem anymore. The Padresrocked the industrylast month with the huge contract for Machado, 26, a slugger with two Gold Gloves at third base. The right side of their infield also arrived through free agency: first baseman Eric Hosmer, who signed last year, and second baseman Ian Kinsler. Those two have played in five World Series combined; they do not take losing well.
“We don’t play baseball games to develop, we play baseball games to win them,” said Kinsler, after hitting a homer, stealing a base and scoring twice in an exhibition victory on Thursday. “We all play the game a certain way, and that’s what we want to bring.”
So the Padres play with an edge now. They also might have a strong lineup — or at least a lineup that should not finish last in the National League in on-base percentage and first in strikeouts, as it did last year.
“This is a very real offense we have here,” left fielder Wil Myers said. “Two years ago we had threeRule 5guys, and now we have Manny Machado and Eric Hosmer. It’s a completely different flip of what’s happened here over the years, and it’s exciting.”
Even with all the offensive potential, the Padres still lack a modern-day Randy Jones. No current Padre worked more than 130 major-league innings last season. For all the money they invested in Machado, the Padres added only one starter in free agency: Garrett Richards, who had Tommy John surgery last summer and will probably not pitch this season, signed for two years and $15.5 million.
Green and Preller said the Padres might be creative in how they allocate innings this season; they engineered a few shorter starts last year that seemed to work well. Four starters rank as consensus top-100 prospects — Logan Allen, MacKenzie Gore, Adrian Morejon and Chris Paddack — but only Allen has pitched above Class AA.
Preller, who made his reputation as a sharp-eyed, aggressive scout, said his senior scouting advisers had raved about the Padres’ pitching depth, reassuring him the organization was especially well-stocked.
“They’d never seen as much pitching in one spot, in one system, at one time,” Preller said. “We’re going to bank on those guys developing. We understand some guys may not reach their ceiling, but from our standpoint, when you have the numbers we feel like we’re going to have, some guys are going to be better than we think they’ll be, and they’ll step up and take those spots. So we’re going to give those guys an opportunity.”
As Preller spoke, on a patio above the practice fields, another young pitcher, Cal Quantrill, stopped by to chat excitedly about the action on his sinker. Quantrill has also been a top-100 prospect, like another Padres right-hander, Anderson Espinoza.Analysts adorethe future Padres — Baseball America, ESPN, Fangraphs and MLB.com all rank San Diego’s farm system as the best in the game.
This is a source of pride for Preller, but only as a means to producing the kind of consistently competitive team San Diego has never had.
“It definitely wasn’t the goal of anyone in the organization to say, ‘We’ve got one of the better farm systems in the game,’” he said. “I think what that enables you to do — from a trade standpoint, competition, depth, having answers if you have injuries — that’s more important than looking up and saying, ‘You’ve got a farm system.’ Fans want to see it at the major league level. Now our job is to try to convert that to major-league wins.”
The thriving system was critical to affording the contracts of Machado, Hosmer and Myers, who will combine to earn $75.5 million each season from 2020 through 2022. The Padres expect high-impact, low-cost hitters to surround them, including shortstop Fernando Tatis Jr., right fielder Franmil Reyes and catcher Francisco Mejia.
“When we took over a few years ago, I thought it was going to take a few years to build it the right way,” said Preller, who joined the Padres in August 2014. “But I think we’re in position now to start being competitive as a club, and not just have it as a one-year blip — year in and year out, we’ve got more answers than questions.”
For now, though, there are many more questions than answers. The Padres are still a last-place team trying to stop a string of eight consecutive losing seasons, the longest stretch of futility since the brown-and-gold beginnings of this woebegone franchise.
The Padres — who will, at last, bring back theirbrown uniformsnext season — have hope. Now they must justify it.
“We haven’t done enough to warrant being talked about,” Green said. “But there’s conviction in here that we’re going to start doing some things. We’ve got work to do to prove that.”
Supported by
ByDavid WaldsteinandBrad Lefton
Ichiro Suzuki, the unique and pioneering superstar who amassed 4,367 hits in 28 professional baseball seasons across two continents, announced his retirement on Thursday, concluding one of the most remarkable careers in the history of sports.
Suzuki, who is destined for a place in the Hall of Fame,told his Seattle Mariners teammatesthe news in Japan before their regular-season game against the Oakland Athletics at the Tokyo Dome. The news filtered out to the crowd and around the world after the Kyodo News Service reported it during the game.
“After nine years playing in Japan and entering my 19th season in America, I am announcing my retirement,” Suzuki said in Japanese after the game, at a ballroom packed with reporters in a hotel adjacent to the stadium. “I can’t describe how fortunate I feel to have my career conclude in the uniform of the Seattle Mariners.”
A day after he had become the oldest position player to start a season-opening game in the American League, Suzuki started Thursday’s game in right field and batted ninth. After going hitless in four at-bats, he took his position in right field to start the bottom of the eighth inning.
Seattle Manager Scott Servais then came onto the field to make a lineup change. With that, the other eight Seattle players quickly retreated to the dugout, leaving Suzuki a vast, green pathway to the third base bench, and he jogged unobstructed to thunderous applause from the sellout crowd.
Upon leaving the field for the last time, Suzuki received emotional embraces from each teammate in front of the dugout, including tearful ones from second baseman Dee Gordon and countryman Yusei Kikuchi, who grew up idolizing Suzuki and who had just made his debut as a starting pitcher in the major leagues.
The biggest embrace awaited him inside the dugout. Ken Griffey Jr., a Hall of Famer and a beloved Mariners icon, made his way to the bench in street clothes to offer his support.
“Ichiro has had an unbelievable career,” Griffey said. “Not only in the U.S., but here in Japan. What he has done to cross barriers and bring countries together is unbelievable.”
[Keeping Score: Ichiro Suzuki Is Not Baseball’s Hit King. He Is So Much More.]
Kikuchi was barely 1 year old when Suzuki made his professional debut for the Orix BlueWave in 1992. Within two years, Suzuki had established his greatness, swatting 210 hits in 130 games in 1994 and flashing a level of speed and athleticism on the bases and in the outfield that major league scouts had rarely seen.
Suzuki was long destined to become the first position player from Japan to play in Major League Baseball, and although he did not make it to the United States until he was 27, he still collected the23rd-most hitsin major league history.
Bobby Valentine, the former Mets manager, faced Suzuki in Japan in 1995 as manager of the Chiba Lotte Marines. Before Suzuki joined the Mariners in 2001, Valentine, then with the Mets, called the outfielder one of the top five players in the world. But in that sensational rookie season, in which Suzuki batted .350 and became the second player to win the American League Rookie of the Year and Most Valuable Player Awards in the same season, Valentine corrected himself.
“I was wrong,” Valentine said at the time. “He is one of the top two.”
Barry Bonds won the National League M.V.P. that year.
Yankees General Manager Brian Cashman, who brought Suzuki to New York via a trade in 2012, issued a statement on Thursday calling him one of the greatest players in history.
“He has been married to this game for virtually his entire life,” Cashman said in the statement, “refining and perfecting his craft — and the relationship has been a beautiful one.”
Known for his strict regimens and year-round routine of stretching, conditioning and batting practice — he allowed himself only two days off in the winter — Suzuki had at least 200 hits in each of his first 10 major league seasons, including 2004, when he set a record with 262. He won two batting titles, was named to 10 All-Star teams and won 10 Gold Glove awards as he dazzled fans with his powerful and accurate arm from the outfield.
In 2016, while playing for the Miami Marlins,Suzuki tripled for his 3,000th hit. In his 18 seasons in the United States, he compiled 3,089 hits.
“Compared to what I achieved today, records like 10 years of 200 hits are small,” Suzuki said Thursday after the Mariners’ 5-4 win in 12 innings. “To think that I became inactive last May and despite no games to play in since then, I maintained my focus on coming back this season and was able to play in real games yesterday and today, that is truly something I am proud of. I’m sure in time, my records will be broken, but I find it hard to believe anyone will achieve the level of focus I did on this goal since last May.”
Suzuki was extremely meticulous as a player, carrying his specially made bats in ablack dehumidifier caseto ensure they maintained a precise weight and level of moisture. He had a carefully planned diet to preserve his wiry frame — though that often included cheeseburgers for lunch — and he tracked his weight by the half-pound. Everything in his routine was done for a purpose, and that usually meant getting hits in games.
Suzuki was also recognized for his fashion sense, including some outlandish outfits that would have teammates gawking. He charmed many of them with his wily sense of humor and well-timed off-color expressions in English. He speaks his second language fluently, but he kept Turner, his interpreter, on hand to make certain his thoughts were always precisely conveyed.
Toward the end of the 2014 season, his last one with the Yankees, he told his teammates that he wanted to play until he was 50. He got close, but after he joined the Mariners for a second stint in 2018, he played just 15 games before the team shut him down as a player. Ever the pioneer, hetransitioned into a new role as a uniformed adviserwho took batting practice but was not allowed on the bench.
He continued to maintain his fitness and prepare for games as he always did as a player, knowing that with an expanded roster for this opening series in Japan, he would be given the chance to play in the first two games of 2019 in his home country.
Suzuki was hitless in five at-bats and drew one walk in the two games against the A’s in Japan, finishing his major league career with a .311 batting average and 1,420 runs scored over 2,653 games. As for his future plans, he said he could not envision himself coaching or managing at the professional level.
“I don’t have the patience for that,” he said. “I could, however, see myself doing something with kids or somehow trying to knock down the barriers that prevent professionals from working with amateurs in Japan.”
As for what he’ll do in the immediate future?
“I definitely don’t plan on taking it easy,” he said. “I’m not one to sit still. I’m sure I’ll do my usual training tomorrow.”




Supported by
ByRichard Goldstein
Mel Stottlemyre, the Yankees’ pitching ace in their lean years of the late 1960s and early ’70s and later the longtime pitching coach for Mets and Yankees teams that won the World Series, died on Sunday in a Seattle hospital. He was 77.
His wife, Jean Stottlemyre, said the cause was complications of multiple myeloma, a type of blood cancer for which he had been treated for many years. At his death he also had the flu and pneumonia, she said. Stottlemyre, who grew up in Washington State, lived in the Seattle area.
Stottlemyre made his last visit to Yankee Stadium in June 2015, when the Yankees surprised him by dedicating a Monument Park plaque in his honor when he attended their annual Old-Timers’ Day gathering. The tribute came after their former second baseman Willie Randolph received a plaque as scheduled.
Stottlemyre, walking with the aid of a cane, told the crowd, “It’s been a thrill over the years for me to wear this uniform.” He said that if it was to be his last Old-Timers’ Day, he would “start another baseball club, coaching up there, whenever they need me.”
Arriving at Yankee Stadium in August 1964, Stottlemyre posted a 9-3 record while helping the Yankees win a fifth straight pennant. He then faced Bob Gibson, the St. Louis Cardinals’ future Hall of Fame pitcher, three times in the World Series.
The Yankees were beaten by the Cardinals in seven games, but Stottlemyre became an anchor of their pitching staff. In his 11 seasons with the Yankees, a long stretch of largely lean years after decades of dominance, he was one of their few bright spots. A right-hander featuring a superb sinkerball, he was a five-time All-Star and a three-time 20-game winner.
Stottlemyre coached the Mets’ pitchers for 10 seasons, including their 1986 World Series championship year, and the Yankees’ pitchers for another 10, during which he won four World Series championship rings. He was being treated for multiple myeloma, which affects plasma cells, for much of his time as the Yankees pitching coach.
Stottlemyre was the quiet type, but even as a rookie pitcher he possessed uncommon poise.
“Here’s a 21-year-old kid nobody knew coming out of nowhere with this great arm and super control who has all the confidence — not a big head, mind you, but a quiet self-assurance — of a Whitey Ford,” his teammate Tom Tresh was quoted as saying in the oral history “Bombers” (2002), by Richard Lally.
Years later, Stottlemyre was admired by the pitchers he coached for his optimism and his ability to relate to them. The Yankees’ David Cone once said that Stottlemyre anticipated how pitchers liked to be treated. Stottlemyre, in turn, said he had benefited from talking with his sons Todd and Mel Jr., both of whom pitched in the major leagues. “It’s like he never got older,” Cone said of Stottlemyre.
“When you’re struggling, he’s always there for you,” the relief pitcher Mariano Rivera told the New Jersey newspaper The Record in October 1998, after the Yankees defeated the San Diego Padres to begin their string of three straight World Series titles.
Dwight Gooden remembered how Stottlemyre came to the mound and steadied him when he was two outs away from a no-hitter against the Seattle Mariners at Yankee Stadium in May 1996. Gooden had walked two batters and thrown a wild pitch to Jay Buhner, putting runners on second and third with the Yankees leading by 2-0.
“There’s something about his demeanor — so trusting, so trustworthy — that makes you want to tell him the truth,” Gooden said in his memoir, “Heat” (1999), written with Bob Klapisch.
Gooden recalled Stottlemyre using his nickname while telling him: “I’m not taking you out, Doc. I’m just here to give you a breather. This game is yours, Doc. Yours unless you tell me you can’t go anymore.”
When Gooden insisted that he still had it, Stottlemyre told him, “Go get him.”
Gooden struck out Buhner and got Paul Sorrento to pop up to Derek Jeter, the shortstop. The no-hitter was his.
Stottlemyre’s fellow coach Don Zimmer recalled that after Stottlemyre revealed he had multiple myeloma in April 2000, he remained strong and steady while coaching the Yankees’ pitchers for most of the regular season, even as he received chemotherapy.
“He was a rock,” Zimmer said in “Zim: A Baseball Life” (2001), written with Bill Madden.
After a stem-cell transplant in September 2000, Stottlemyre could not return to the Yankees that season, since he risked contracting an infection. When the Yankees beat the Mets in the World Series, Zimmer called Stottlemyre at his home.
“When Mel answered the phone, he sounded ecstatic,” Zimmer remembered. “Later on that night, I found out that Mel’s brother had died earlier in the day of a brain tumor. He never said a word about it on the phone because he didn’t want to ruin the night for the rest of us. That’s what kind of a person he is.”
Melvin Leon Stottlemyre was born on Nov. 13, 1941, in Hazleton, Mo., and grew up in Mabton, Wash., the son of a construction worker. He was signed by the Yankee organization in 1961 out of what was then Yakima Valley Junior College (now Yakima Valley College) in Washington State.
When Stottlemyre joined the Yankees, Ford, the Hall of Fame left-hander, became his mentor. When Ford hurt his shoulder pitching in the 1964 World Series opener, the Yankees rested much of their hopes on Stottlemyre. He beat Gibson in Game 2, pitched to a no-decision in Game 5 and was the loser in Game 7.
The Yankees never returned to the World Series during Stottlemyre’s playing career, but he became one of the American League’s leading pitchers.
He had a 20-9 record in 1965, when he led the A.L. in complete games, with 18, and innings pitched, with 291. The Yankees were beginning to fade by then, finishing sixth in what was then a 10-team league. Stottlemyre won 12 games and lost 20 in 1966 when they finished last for the first time since 1912. But he rebounded to go 21-12 in 1968 and 20-14 in 1969.
In June 1974, while pitching against the California Angels, Stottlemyre tore his rotator cuff. Over the winter, he was advised by the Yankees to rest until at least May 1. When they released him at the end of spring training, he was stunned. The move was made by the team’s general manager, Gabe Paul, but Stottlemyre was convinced that the Yankees owner George Steinbrenner had been behind it, and it left him embittered.
Stottlemyre retired with a record of 164-139 and an earned run average of 2.97 before turning to a second career as a pitching coach. But a family tragedy took him away from baseball for a time and ultimately colored his already bittersweet feelings toward Yankees management.
In March 1981, Stottlemyre’s son Jason died of leukemia a few days after his 11th birthday. Stottlemyre left his post as a roving pitching instructor for the Mariners the next year to be with his family. Two decades later, reflecting on the possibility of a connection between his multiple myeloma and his son’s leukemia, Stottlemyre thought back to radiation treatments he had received on his shoulder from the Yankees’ team doctor in the late 1960s as a means of reducing calcification. A radiologist had advised him to stop the treatments because of potential health consequences, and he eventually did so despite what he said were reassurances from the Yankees’ medical staff that the radiation would not harm him.
“I’ve become convinced it played a role in both of the diseases,” Stottlemyre said of the radiation in his memoir, “Pride and Pinstripes” (2007), written with John Harper. “The medical care the Yankees provided was not up to the standards you’d expect in professional sports, and certainly not from one of the most successful sports franchises in history.”
After a break from baseball, Stottlemyre became the Mets’ pitching coach in 1984, Gooden’s rookie season. He did not tinker with the mechanics of the immensely gifted Gooden, but counseled him on how to handle the spotlight and saw himself as something of a father figure.
When the Mets defeated the Boston Red Sox in the 1986 World Series, Stottlemyre oversaw an outstanding pitching staff featuring Gooden, Bob Ojeda, Sid Fernandez, Ron Darling, Roger McDowell and Jesse Orosco.
Stottlemyre was fired at the end of the 1993 season and was the Houston Astros’ pitching coach for two seasons before being asked by Steinbrenner to return to the Yankees. Stottlemyre had torn up invitations to the Yankees’ Old-Timers’ Days for two decades in anger over what he considered the bad faith the team showed by releasing him in 1975. But he decided to accept the offer, joining the staff of the new Yankees manager, Joe Torre, when he came to believe that Paul, the general manager, not Steinbrenner, had been responsible for letting him go.
The Yankees won the World Series in 1996, then captured consecutive championships from 1998 to 2000, the year Stottlemyre began treatments for multiple myeloma.
Stottlemyre guided pitching staffs that included Cone, Rivera, Andy Pettitte, Roger Clemens, Mike Mussina, David Wells and Gooden, who was coming back from battles with drug abuse. Stottlemyre left the Yankees after the 2005 season and was replaced by Ron Guidry, their former star left-hander.
Stottlemyre was the Mariners’ pitching coach in 2008, but he was not retained when Don Wakamatsu replaced Jim Riggleman as manager the next season.
In addition to his wife, the former Jean Mitchell, he is survived by a brother, Jeff; a sister, Joyce Lawerence; his sons, Mel Jr. and Todd; and eight grandchildren. Todd Stottlemyre pitched for 14 seasons in the major leagues. Mel Jr., who pitched for one season, became the Miami Marlins’ pitching coach in December 2018 and had formerly been in that post for the Arizona Diamondbacks and the Mariners.
By his last few seasons with the Yankees, Stottlemyre had cemented his reputation as an outstanding pitching coach. But his resentment of Steinbrenner resurfaced in the face of criticism from him when the team was unable to make it back to the World Series. Stottlemyre was also irked by what he saw as undue interference from Billy Connors, the Yankees pitching adviser who worked out of the team’s facilities in Tampa, Fla., and was close to Steinbrenner.(Connors died last June at 76.)
In an interview with USA Today in May 2005, Steinbrenner complained that Stottlemyre had not been improving the Yankees’ pitching staff. But Torre was quick to defend Stottlemyre, who had been alongside him on four championship teams. On Monday, Torre, in a statement, called Stottlemyre “a role model to us all and the toughest man I have ever met.”
Because of an editing error, an earlier version of this obituary misstated the year USA Today published an interview George Steinbrenner. It was 2005, not 2015.
Daniel E. Slotnik contributed reporting.

Supported by
ByJames Wagner
BALTIMORE — As the longest-tenured Yankees player on their roster, Brett Gardner has gone through disappointing seasons, playoff years, World Series-title runs, and all the quirks that a 162-game campaign can offer. So when it comes to perspective, he may have the most.
And even Gardner, 35, cannot recall a time, especially only a week into the season, that 11 of his teammates have been on the injured list.
“Man,” he said, pausing as he tied his cleats in the visitors’ clubhouse at Camden Yards. “I can’t tell you if there’s been that many on the I.L. at once. But just as far as guys going down with something all within a few days of each other, it can be frustrating.”
Between the suddenly packed trainers’ room and the field, the start to the Yankees’ 2019 season has been just that: frustrating. Among the preseason World Series favorites, the Yankees dropped the first two series of the year to the rebuilding Baltimore Orioles and Detroit Tigers, teams that lost a combined 213 games last year — and could easily top that total this season. The first two home runs of Aaron Judge’s season and a go-ahead three-run blast by Clint Frazier in the eighth inning helped the Yankees overcome mistakes in a 6-4 win over the Orioles on Saturday, improving their record to 4-4.
Eight games, of course, is just a blip in the baseball season, and the Yankees are not the only team expected to contend that has sputtered out of the gate: The defending champion Boston Red Sox started 2-8 thanks to pitching woes and mental mistakes; the Chicago Cubs are hitting but not pitching, which has led to a 2-6 start; the Houston Astros, the 2017 World Series winners, had scored just 24 runs, good for only a 4-5 record.
“It’s a very long season,” Gardner said before the Yankees’ win on Thursday. “If you went 2-4 during a week sometime in May or June, it might not be a big deal. But when it’s the first six games of the season, obviously it’s all we have to judge ourselves at this point. Spring training is over.”
When the Yankees left their spring training home in Tampa, Fla., though, they already had an alarming number of key players recovering from injuries: shortstop Didi Gregorius (elbow surgery last year), relief pitcher Dellin Betances (right shoulder inflammation), outfielders Aaron Hicks (back stiffness) and Jacoby Ellsbury (hip surgery last year), and starting pitchers Luis Severino (right shoulder soreness) and C. C. Sabathia (off-season knee and heart operations).
Since opening day,they have been joined on the I.L.by third baseman Miguel Andujar (torn right labrum), outfielder Giancarlo Stanton (left biceps strain) and shortstop Troy Tulowitzki (left calf strain). Altogether, that’s 11 players and more than $87 million in 2019 salaries on the I.L. — more than the entire opening day payrolls of the Pittsburgh Pirates, Miami Marlins, Tampa Bay Rays and Orioles, according toCot’s Baseball Contracts.
“It’s really been crazy,” Tulowitzki said, adding later, “I’ve never seen anything like it.”
Injuries are inevitable during a long season, especially for a player like Tulowitzki — a 34-year-old returning from a year-and-a-half absence because he has been hurt. And even with their towering list of hobbled players, the Yankees can take some encouragement from recent history.
The last major league team to have this many players on the I.L. six games into the season was the 2016 Los Angeles Dodgers, according to Nathan Currier of the injury-tracking siteManGamesLost.com. Buoyed by a deep, $250 million roster, the Dodgers went on to win the National League West and advance to the N.L. Championship Series that year despite setting a record with 28 players on the I.L.
So, really, it could always be worse for the Yankees. At one point last June, the Los Angeles Angels had 15 players out with injury. And reinforcements are on the way: Sabathia, Betances and perhaps even Stanton are expected to return this month. Hicks is only now resuming baseball activities, so he could return closer to May, when Severino is also expected to be back. Andujar’s injury is the most concerning for the team; if he does not respond well to rehabilitation, he could need season-ending surgery.
“Those are some big pieces we’re missing,” starting pitcher James Paxton said. “It’ll be great to get those guys back when we do get them back. But for right now, I’m confident going into battle with the guys we have. We’ve got some guys that are grinders.”
The Yankees were proud of their improved depth entering this season, having bolstered the pitching staff and added infielder D. J. LeMahieu, a Gold Glove-winning everyday second baseman with the Colorado Rockies who was signed to be a jack-of-all-trades bench player in New York. But the Yankees did not expect to reach so far into that depth this early. After Tulowitzki went down, the only healthy infielder on the 40-man roster to call up was Thairo Estrada, the Yankees’ 19th-ranked prospect,who missed most of last season because he was shot in the right hip during a robbery attemptin his native Venezuela during the winter. Estrada’s stay in the major leagues lasted one game, as the Yankees swapped his spot for infielder Giovanny Urshela, a stout defender with some past major league experience who will play a lot of third base.
The star infielder Manny Machado, a free agent this off-season, would help the Yankees immensely now. But they decided over the winter that his asking price was too high — he eventually signed with the San Diego Padres for what was a record $300 million over 10 years — and they could spread their money around with various additions while relying on Gleyber Torres, Andujar, LeMahieu, and Tulowitzki.
The result was an opening day payroll of nearly $204 million — less than what it was in 2015 ($218 million) and 2016 ($226 million), according toCot’s Baseball Contracts. (The Yankees are over the $206 million luxury-tax threshold because that takes into account the entire 40-man roster, and yearly salaries are calculated differently.)
That roster — the second-most expensive in the majors, behind the Red Sox — has hobbled out of the gate, butManager Aaron Boone has maintained the long view.
“We’re always capable of going on a roll,” he said. “That’s a matter of time. That’s a matter of us starting to click all together and getting some guys hot collectively in the lineup and getting our pitchers settled in. Even banged up, I’m confident we can go on a run at any point.”
Underlying concerns remain even among the healthy members of the roster. While closer Aroldis Chapman’s velocity is slowly trending up, his fastball velocity (through the small sample of four games) was at 96.5 miles per hour entering Saturday — more than 2 m.p.h. slower than last season and 4 m.p.h. slower than 2017. Pitchers sometimes take time to build their velocity during the colder months, but Chapman has used his slider more than ever. He pitched around a single for a save on Saturday.
On offense, the team is without a portion of the lineup that accounted for 119 of a major-league-record 267 home runs last year — Andujar, Gregorius, Hicks and Stanton. With capable but less powerful hitters filling in, Boone said, the Yankees may have to rely on speed and contact for now.
And there’s catcher Gary Sanchez, who is hoping to bounce back from the worst all-around season of his career and an off-season operation on his nonthrowing shoulder. He had a team-leading three home runs but also four throwing errors, six stolen bases allowed and a few base-running blunders himself.
Given the drain of talent to the I.L., the Yankees’ margin for error has shrunk. Defensive and baserunning errors loom larger. The lineup cannot strike outa team-record 18 timesor strand base-runners at one of the worst rates in baseball and expect to win.
“Obviously with all the injuries, there’s more pressure on us,” said Luke Voit, the designated hitter, who had been slumping before he blasted a three-run homer in Thursday’s win. “Just trying to do too much instead of being myself. At the end of the day, it’s going to come around. I just had to smile and have fun.”
The Yankees could always look to outside additions to patch holes. But in the meantime, the team will need role players to contribute more than expected and its standouts to pull their weight. LeMahieu leads the Yankees in hitting (11 for 24). Torres, as he did at times last year, carried the Yankees to victory on Thursday with two critical home runs. First baseman Greg Bird, Voit, Sanchez and Gardner had batting averages less than .227. Judge has struck out a team-high 16 times. Frazier, who missed most of last year because of a concussion, had not hit a major league home run since July 28, 2017, before Saturday.
The Yankees have plenty of reasons to remain optimistic: Sixteen of their remaining 21 games in April are against teams with losing records in 2018. And before Voit helped calm a frustrated team with his three-run blast on Thursday, he joked with his teammates that a needed contributor was returning from injury.
“I’m officially taking my bat off the I.L.,” he said.



Supported by
ByHoward Megdal
PHILADELPHIA — Greg Harris, 52, and his son Thomas, 9, wearing matching Bryce Harper jerseys, settled into their seats at Citizens Bank Park more than two hours before the Philadelphia Philliesopened their seasonagainst the Atlanta Braves on Thursday afternoon.
They weren’t Harris’s usual seats: A longtime season-ticket holder, he had sold those, in Section 120, between home and first base, at a premium soon afterthe Phillies acquired Harper last month.
“I sold them for today because somebody paid me $400 a ticket for them,” Harris said. “So we’re sitting upstairs. I was willing to make that sacrifice.”
This is the level of excitement brought to the Phillies by the acquisition of Harper, the final piece to an off-season that began with the team’s principal owner, John Middleton, vowing to spend “stupid” money and that ended with the Phillies as a fashionable pick to win the National League and perhaps even their first World Series since 2008.
While acquisitions like J.T. Realmuto, Jean Segura, Andrew McCutchen and David Robertson laid the groundwork for the outsize expectations, Harper’s signing sent what had been an Eagles-first town to a level of baseball craziness not seen for a long time — at least not in this decade, since the run of the Chase Utley-Ryan Howard-Jimmy Rollins Phillies ended.
“When I was at school, my teacher comes up to me, and she’s like: ‘I just got a Yahoo Sports notification. Bryce Harper’s coming to the Phillies,’” Thomas Harris said. “And the whole class went wild and everyone was screaming and stuff. And then she was like, ‘Calm down, calm down, calm down.’ We’re like: ‘We’re not calming down. Do you realize how big that is?’”
The hype has certainly not been lost on Phillies Manager Gabe Kapler, who had to move his pregame media availability from the dugout to his office to accommodate the crush of reporters on hand for Harper’s debut. (The reporters were split into two groups to make the size of the room work.) But he isn’t worried about its effect on Harper, who has been treated like baseball’s savior since he first landed on the cover of Sports Illustrated as a teenager.
“I think if there’s anybody equipped to handle that conversation without me, it’s Bryce Harper,” Kapler said. “He’s a guy well equipped for this moment, for the biggest stage, the brightest lights. He’s been on that stage since he was 15 years old.”
The crowd in Philadelphia began its ovation during the introduction of the revamped Phillies lineup. Before the crowd had even finished greeting Segura, the team’s longtime public-address announcer, Dan Baker, lifted his tenor just a bit to reflect his sense of the moment as he announced Harper’s name, a call he had first made on radio the day after the signing.
That same day, Harris and his son walked over to the Phillies’ team store at Citizens Bank Park to get those matching Harper shirts.
“They only had adult sizes, so we had to order his online,” Greg Harris said. “But we got them immediately. We were part of therecord-breaking shirt sales.”
Harper, for his part, certainly looked ready to get started, sprinting to his position in right field, lifting his cap and giving a full bow to the standing throng in the outfield bleachers before pumping his fist in the air twice to punctuate the beginning of a season with rare expectations.
Harper finished 0-for-3 with an intentional walk, but that free pass, which drew the loudest boos of the afternoon, proved fruitful, loading the bases for Rhys Hoskins, who hit a grand slam as the Phillies won, 10-4.
When it was over, Harper enjoyed a choreographed celebration with his fellow outfielders, McCutchen and Odubel Herrera, that he said he had seen in a video game this winter.
Afterwards, Harper acknowledged some pregame anxiety but said the sound of Philadelphia, long used against Harper during his time with the Nationals, served as a balm on Thursday.
“Fans were all fired up and happy, ready to go,” Harper said during a postgame news conference. “So that gets you amped up a little bit. Introductions are always fun.”
The level of glee on Thursday, far removed from the trademark Philadelphia fatalism,reflected a shifting perspective in a citythat has seen the Eagles win a Super Bowl, at long last; Villanova win men’s basketball championships in 2016 and 2018; and now an ascendence from the 76ers and, it is hoped, the Phillies.
For Harper, who will be under contract until Harris, as Harris pointed out, will be on Social Security and his son, a third grader, will be in college, that means he will need to focus on the immediate over the long term.
“He knows himself very well,” Kapler said of Harper. “He talked about how the batter’s box is his sanctuary. So there’s a lot of distractions and people needing his attention everywhere he goes, but when he steps in the batter’s box, he rests that bat on his shoulders for a second and everything else falls away.”
Harper took his practice cuts with abandon, standing several feet in front of the on-deck circle, before striding to the plate at exactly 3:17 p.m. in green cleats that paid tribute to the team mascot and a bright white home uniform, the first of thousands of scheduled at-bats in the years ahead.
Though McCutchen homered in his first at-bat with the team, pointing to the Phillies’ logo on the front of his uniform, Harper’s first cuts yielded only a groundout to Atlanta’s Freddie Freeman. There were no boos. That’s not the mood in Philadelphia these days.



Supported by
On Baseball
ByTyler Kepner
PHOENIX — Maybe the faucets were just a little rusty. Spring training games are well underway, but, finally, baseball has opened up its money spigot.
After a winter notable for a sluggish free-agent market that still includes a handful of prominent unsigned players, cash is now flowing to the major leagues’ top stars. On Thursday, Bryce Harper became the latest in a string of players to set a new salary standard, reaching a free-agent deal with the Philadelphia Phillies for 13 years and $330 million, the most ever guaranteed to a baseball player.
Last week,Manny Machadobecame the first free agent to earn a $300 million contract when he signed a 10-year deal with the San Diego Padres. On Wednesday, the Colorado Rockies madeNolan Arenadothe game’s highest-paid position player on an annual basis, at $32.5 million per season on an eight-year, $260 million extension.
There were others receiving extensions this week: Yankees outfielderAaron Hicks(seven years, $70 million) and St. Louis Cardinals starter Miles Mikolas (four years, $68 million). And while Arizona Diamondbacks pitcher Zack Greinke still claims the highest average annual value ($34.44 million per year on his six-year, $206.5 million deal), Harper stands alone for the richest overall contract.
“I’m happy for him, and I’m happy for all players to see him get compensated fairly,” said the Milwaukee Brewers’ Ryan Braun, a former National League most valuable player who earns $21 million per season.
“For all of us as players, we want to see our best players sign the biggest contracts, and frankly I think the whole last week has been really positive for baseball players, if you look at Aaron Hicks, Miles Mikolas and Nolan Arenado,” Braun continued. “It’s been a bit of a contentious off-season, but I think for all of us as players it’s been an encouraging week to see all these guys compensated with contracts they’ve earned and deserve.”
Harper’s deal, which was confirmed by a person with direct knowledge of it who spoke on the condition of anonymity because the Phillies had not yet announced it, eclipses the 13-year, $325 million contract extension Giancarlo Stanton signed with the Miami Marlins before the 2015 season, two years before he was traded to the Yankees — Harper’s favorite team as he grew up in Las Vegas.
While the Yankees declined to pursue Harper, investing instead in pitching this winter, he attracted significant interest from the Los Angeles Dodgers and the San Francisco Giants, fueling speculation that he preferred to play on the West Coast. As it turns out, his Phillies contract does not even include an opt-out clause — the escape hatch the agent Scott Boras popularized more than 18 years ago in Alex Rodriguez’s first free-agent deal, with the Texas Rangers.
But Harper, 26, wanted clarity on his future, Boras said, and did not want the chance to opt out.
“He wanted to go to one city, stay there, build a brand and identity and recruit players,” Boras said. “He wants to tell players: ‘Come play with me.’ He knows it will help winning more if he’s with one team the whole time.”
In Philadelphia, that comment comes with a two-word translation:Mike Trout. Born and raised in southern New Jersey, where he still lives, Trout will be eligible for free agency after the 2020 season. Trout, 27, has won two Most Valuable Player Awards with the Los Angeles Angels and is the consensus best player in baseball.
A comparison of all the Major League Baseball players who signed contracts of at least $100 million.
Harper has one M.V.P. award, from 2015 with the Washington Nationals, who drafted him first over all in 2010. He has made six All-Star teams, and he recovered from a slow start last season to hit .249 with 34 home runs, producing career highs in runs batted in (100) and walks (130). But poor defensive metrics in right and center field — the result of a 2017 knee injury, Boras said — gave him just 1.3 wins above replacement, according toBaseball Reference.
Boras called Harper “the most iconic figure in the game,” but said the low WAR, more than any other factor, complicated the pursuit of the kind of contract Harper sought.
“It’s hard to get the length of contract the player wanted,” Boras said. “I could have done 10 years with opt-outs, but that’s not what he wanted.”
“I could have done $42 or $43 million in A.A.V. on a short-term deal,” Boras continued, referring to average annual value. “You really want to serve your client’s interest.”
The Phillies stayed away from Boras’s clients for years, the bitter residue of a failed negotiation in 1997 with outfielder J.D. Drew, their first-round draft choice. But with John S. Middleton as principal owner, the Phillies have now signed a prominent Boras client in each of the last two spring trainings. Last March, Middleton signed Jake Arrieta, a former Cy Young Award winner, for three years and $75 million.
“John Middleton came out two times to Las Vegas to meet with Bryce,” Boras said. “He’s a guy that illustrated to Harp that he’s about winning. He’s very involved with his franchise — and I love the fact that Bryce plays so well in that ballpark and sees the ball so well there.”
Of the four stadiums in which he has played the most games — Nationals Park, Marlins Park, the Mets’ Citi Field and the Phillies’ Citizens Bank Park — Harper has the highest on-base-plus-slugging percentage in Philadelphia, at .930. He has hit 14 home runs there, his most at any park outside Washington.
While Harper has generally struggled in Los Angeles (.670 O.P.S.) and San Francisco (.588), the value of the Phillies’ contract, understandably, was the major factor. The Giants could have sold Harper on becoming the next Barry Bonds — as a left-handed, free-agent slugger still on the front end of his prime — but they sensed the Phillies would get him.
“A lot of people thought that’s where he was going,” said Giants Manager Bruce Bochy, who met with Harper in the first of the Giants’ visits, in early February. “I don’t think there’s anybody who’d say they wouldn’t like to have a guy like that in the lineup. But I think we all felt that it seemed like that’s the direction he was heading.”
Bochy added: “I don’t allow myself to really think about it, because you can’t be disappointed. You don’t want these guys disappointed. I tell them, ‘You’ve got to be thankful for what you have versus what you don’t have.’”
What Harper has is a new address in Philadelphia — and the richest contract in baseball history, a victory for him and his peers.
An earlier version of this article misstated the average annual salary for Nolan Arenado. It is $32.5 million per season, not $33.5 million.



Supported by
Sports of The Times
ByMichael Powell
WEST PALM BEACH, Fla. — I walked into the spring training locker room of the Houston Astros with a question for the assembled players. What is going on with the slow pace of free-agent contracts this winter?
Alex Bregman, the Astros’ star third baseman, had just finished taking his morning hacks on the field and is likely to be a future occupant of baseball’s penthouse. He could earn a munificent contract of the sort handed out to Bryce Harper ($330 million) and Manny Machado ($300 million) these past two weeks. But he sees many dozens of ballplayers who have fallen short of stardom without contracts, and that angers him.
Worse, he sees teams content with mediocrity: Fewer clubs are competing to sign the stars. “A lot of teams seem fine with losing and getting TV money and making no attempt to sign players,” he said. “That is bad for the game.”
I wandered over to Josh Reddick’s locker. Lithe and a free spirit, he’s a good right fielder and a careful observer of the game. He suggested that perhaps baseball players should follow the lead of N.B.A. players and speak out.
“A lot of guys are pissed off,” he said. “There are a lot of guys who should have jobs who are just hanging there. If it takes another bad strike to change this, then that’s what we need to do.”
We have arrived at a hinge point in sports. From angry baseball players talking strike to quarterback Colin Kaepernick to running back Le’Veon Bell to the N.B.A. players LeBron James, Stephen Curry and Chris Paul, professional athletes are splendidly outspoken. They opine on President Trump and popular culture and their sport’s economics, and it is indisputably stirring to see young men and women looking beyond the horizon of wins and losses.
Yet politicization plays out in radically different ways and not invariably to the benefit of athletes. Baseball grooves on and is constrained by its traditions. It has a powerful union, the strongest in pro sports, and that coexists with the sense that individuality is suspect and no player is as big as the sport itself.
So baseball players sail toward a possible confrontation with the owners without leaders who possess the transcendent cultural cachet and business power of, say, a LeBron James.
“It feels like baseball lives in the past, and that undercuts player power,” noted Adrian Burgos, a history professor at the University of Illinois and editor ofLa Vida Baseball, which studies the Latino influence on baseball. “Whereas the N.B.A. imagines itself as the future, and it has to create a world in which players have more power.”
The N.B.A., players in many sports will tell you, stands as the zeitgeist prototype, the most free-spirited of the leagues and with the youngest fan base — the average age of an N.B.A. viewer is 37, compared with 55 in baseball. Its stars have become hybrids: players, power brokers and globe-spanning businessmen. So James, who signed with the Los Angeles Lakers with an eye toward building an entertainment empire, spent much of February trying to force the New Orleans Pelicans to trade its star center, Anthony Davis, to the Lakers.
James’s heist failed amid complaints he had stepped out of his player’s lane and tampered with another team’s star. Suffice to say James did not appear chastened and Davis could try to force a trade this summer. James has a television show, “The Shop,” on HBO, and guess who was one of his scheduled guests on the Season 2 premiere on Friday night?
Yes, the same A. Davis.
The N.B.A. life is nothing if not an intersectional experience.
Baseball and football are more tightly bound by their cultures and history. The N.F.L. long ago went all in on Death Star dominance, sated on money and nose wrinkled in distaste for dissent. The owners cut a presumably very large check to Kaepernick, who almost certainly was blackballed for taking a dignified knee during the national anthem. There is no assurance he will again run out onto an N.F.L. field.
Player solidarity in football is a barely flickering lamp. When Bell refused to report to the Steelers’ training camp last fall, The Pittsburgh Post-Gazette reported that teammates removed his name plate and plundered his locker of shoes. Bell decided to sit out the 2018 season rather than accept a constraining franchise-tag deal.
“The N.F.L. has capitalized in post-9/11 patriotism and the sense that its shield is bigger than players, and that infects the sport,” David Leonard, a professor who teaches about the intersection of race, culture and sport at Washington State, Pullman, said.
The N.B.A. is the antithesis of this. Player and even coaching personas — see Steve Kerr and Gregg Popovich’s scathing takes on Trump — have become central to its marketing appeal, a Twitter, WhatsApp, Instagrammed world of hooping and opining. Adam Silver, the commissioner of the N.B.A., may not groove on athletes’ desire to bend teams to their will, but that is woven into the league’s DNA.
Bill Russell, the 85-year-old basketball legend who took a photo of himself wearing a T-shirt with the words, “I’m with Kap,” and tweeted it out, servesas a reminder, too, that its athletes have been outspoken for generations.
“N.B.A. players are taking a role in their own marketing and their own futures,” Leonard said. “You see a concerted effort not only to wield power but to create power.”
This has not escaped the notice of baseball players. In their world, too much individuality, wearing a hat backward or tossing a bat like a baton after a home run, can draw a roll of eyes.
Reddick, the Astros’ right fielder, has watched N.B.A. players with admiration. “Basketball players are very outspoken about their opinions,” he said. “Baseball has always been about giving the generic cliché answer that keeps you guessing. Basketball players are much more outspoken and go into it with a lot of depth.”
Analytics border on Holy Writ in baseball front offices and for many sportswriters, and this too acts to strangely diminish stars even in their moment of glory. So we’re told that Harper, an intense and seemingly transcendent young star, is less than he appears because his WAR rating last year (wins above replacement and a rather subjective statistic) was low. There is the implicit suggestion that players and fans would do well to yield to numeracy triumphalism.
That insistence acts as oil poured on the bonfire of player discontent. Stars to the side, more than 70 major leaguers remain without contracts, and rank-and-file sorts have signed minor league contracts in hopes they might clamber onto a major league roster with a good spring. The players note — how to say this sweetly? — the coincidence that team computer programs seem to kick out contract offers that occupy the same narrow bandwidth.
In the 1980s, such coincidence went by the name of collusion; today, it’s apparently just artificial intelligence doing what it does.
Zack Britton, a fine relief pitcher, signed a three-year, $39 million contract this winter with the Yankees, and counted himself lucky. “These clubs are all controlled by Major League Baseball,” he said. “And they are submitting almost the same offers, which is kind of weird, right?”
Reddick has walked this modern baseball world. He played four years for the Oakland Athletics and loved his manager and the bleacher bums with whom he partied and the Bay Area. When he reached free agency and wanted his compensation, well: Hasta la vista, baby.
The Athletics pull off this tightwad act with exceedingly bright management, but it is an exception.
“Unless you’re a die-hard fan and you’ve got a date or you just want to get hammered on $9 beers, it’s hard to see why you’d keep going to the games of some teams,” Reddick said. “It’s a bummer because you are supposed to want to win games.”
The union-management agreement expires in two years. In this age of the outspoken athlete, the center may no longer hold. “In 2021,” Reddick predicted, “a lot of stuff could hit the fan.”



Supported by
On Baseball
ByTyler Kepner
This was always the logical blueprint for Mike Trout, the greatest and least complicated player in baseball. Trout would not sell himself short financially, but he also would not draw out the process of determining his future. He and the Los Angeles Angels would wait for Bryce Harper to set a contract record in free agency, and then make a deal that would break it.
That is what has happened, apparently, with Trout and the Angels finalizing a 10-year, $360 million contract extension with no opt-outs, a deal that will bring the Angels’ total commitment tonearly $430 million for Troutover the next 12 seasons, through 2030.
The agreement, which was first reportedby ESPN, is expected to be formalized soon, according to two people who had been briefed on it but were not authorized to comment publicly. It is the fourth megadeal reached this spring training, following those for Nolan Arenado (eight years, $260 million with the Colorado Rockies), Manny Machado (10 years, $300 million with the San Diego Padres) and Bryce Harper (13 years, $330 million with the Philadelphia Phillies).
Those contracts did little to quell the angst of the players’ association about the relatively subdued state of the overall free agent market. The union has become so suspicious of ownership that it has moved some camp visits outside of clubhouses this spring training, for fear of possible surveillance inside team facilities. The union is dismayed at the lackluster bidding for the sort of midlevel free agents who until recently had generated much more interest on the open market.
“What we’ve seen the last couple of years, we haven’t seen before,” Tony Clark, the union’s executive director, said on Sunday, citing “a climate that we don’t think is sustainable for the industry as a whole.”
The deals forArenado,MachadoandHarper, though, showed that teams still place a premium on elite talent — and Trout, 27, is the best of the best. The most similar players in history at his age, according toBaseball Reference, are the Hall of Famers Frank Robinson, Ken Griffey Jr. and Mickey Mantle. Trout has won two American League Most Valuable Player Awards and has been the runner-up four times. He has a .307 career average and is the majors’ active leader in on-base plus slugging percentage, at .990.
Trout’s contract had been set to expire after the 2020 season, and Harper had publicly pushed for Trout to eventually join him in Philadelphia, where Trout attends Eagles games in the off-season, traveling from his nearby hometown, Millville, N.J. But the Angels emphasized to Trout the benefits of keeping his work and home lives separate, and promoted the idea of being a one-team icon in a place where he has thrived.
In an interview this month at the Angels’ training camp in Tempe, Ariz., Trout seemed content with the team’s new manager, Brad Ausmus, and its other off-season additions.
“It’s like a whole new start,” Trout said. “I think the biggest thing is injuries. We’ve got to stay healthy, top to bottom, stay on the field and see where it goes. The chemistry’s great, a lot of new faces, a lot of new coaches, meeting a lot of new people. Everybody’s been great so far.”
The Angels have reached the playoffs with Trout just once, when theywere swept by Kansas Cityin a 2014 division series. But the team is far from hopeless, with a 584-550 record in Trout’s seven full seasons and a farm system that ranks No. 6 over all, according to Baseball Prospectus. Their stadium lease in Anaheim runs through 2020, so they could, in theory, open a new ballpark before Trout retires.
A comparison of all the Major League Baseball players who signed contracts of at least $100 million.
Since wildly overpaying for Albert Pujols and Josh Hamilton early in this decade, the Angels have added high-impact players like shortstop Andrelton Simmons, outfielder Justin Upton and the two-way star Shohei Ohtani. General Manager Billy Eppler signed catcher Jonathan Lucroy and pitchers Cody Allen, Trevor Cahill and Matt Harvey to one-year deals this winter, and he has steadily modernized the way the Angels use technology.
Still, the Houston Astros are the dominant team in the A.L. West, and Trout could have used his clout to publicly demand that the organization do more to close the gap. He never has, he said in a 2017 interview in Anaheim, because he believes in Eppler and his lieutenants.
“They’re doing a good job, trying to put the players in the right spots,” Trout said then. “You’ve got to trust it. There’s only so much that they can do.”
Had Trout played out his deal, the noise around his future would only have intensified, surely an unappealing prospect for a player who never courts controversy. Yet Trout is not exactly withdrawn. He is readily accessible to reporters, he is an active — if benign — presence on social media, and he might lead the league in signing autographs.
Trout has a few endorsement deals but does not spend much time promoting his personal brand, a source of frustration for Major League Baseball, which would rather its best player showed more interest in marketing. To Trout, though, that has never made much sense.
Trout has always seemed to recognize how good he has it, with little incentive to disrupt that life. He is dominant on the field and respected off it; comfortable with the direction of his franchise; happy in both Southern California and Southern New Jersey; and extremely well paid. Who could ask for more?
“If you were Mike Trout,” his agent, Craig Landis,once asked, “would you really wake up in the morning and say, ‘I’ve got to start changing things’?”
It was a rhetorical question, of course, and Trout has now answered with a resounding no. You cannot blame him, and you cannot be surprised.



Supported by
ByJames Wagner
Sandy Alderson,who left his post as the Mets’ general managerlast summer because of a cancer recurrence, will return to his baseball roots now that his health has improved.
The Oakland Athletics announced on Tuesday that Alderson, 71, would rejoin the club as a senior adviser in the baseball operations department, two decades after he left the team in the hands of Billy Beane.
Alderson announced on Saturday at the New York Baseball Writers’ Awards dinner, where he received an award honoring his career, that he had been cancer-free for four months. He received a standing ovation.
Alderson began his baseball career with the A’s in 1981 and was one of the sport’s pioneers in sabermetrics. Back then, he counseled Beane, his successor, whose reliance on advanced statistics kept the small-market team competitive and was famously documented in the book “Moneyball.”
“His mentorship and friendship have been invaluable to me over the course of my career, and I look forward to the expertise and perspective he will add at every level of the organization,” Beane, the A’s executive vice president of baseball operations, said of Alderson in a statement issued by the team.
Referring to David Forst, the current A’s general manager, Beane added, “David and I couldn’t be more excited to bring him back to Oakland.”
Alderson was the architect of the A’s teams that won three straight American League pennants from 1988 to ’90, as well as the 1989 World Series. He left in 1998.
“I am really excited to return to the A’s and the Bay Area,” Alderson said in the team’s statement. “I look forward to being as helpful as I can to Billy, David and the rest of the baseball operations staff.”
After his 17-season stint with the Athletics, Alderson spent seven years working in Major League Baseball headquarters and four years as the chief executive of the San Diego Padres, before going back to the M.L.B. commissioner’s office for a year.
From October 2010 until June 2018, Alderson served as the Mets’ general manager, guiding them from a period of financial austerity to the 2015 World Series,during which he dealt with his initial cancer diagnosis, and to a 2016 wild-card game.
Then came a 92-loss season in 2017, a rough first half in 2018 and the cancer recurrence. Alderson took an indefinite leave of absence, with the expectation that the Mets would find a replacement. The team hiredBrodie Van Wagenen as their new general managerin October.
In other front-office news, the Mets announced that their longtime assistant general manager, John Ricco, had moved into a newly created position with the title of senior vice president, senior strategy officer. Ricco, 50, joined the Mets in 2004 and served as a right-hand man to four general managers.
Ricco will now oversee special business projects involving the Mets, while continuing to advise Van Wagenen in baseball matters, such as overseeing salary arbitration, budget and payroll.
Follow James Wagner onTwitter:@ByJamesWagner.

Supported by
ByJames Wagner
PHILADELPHIA — While writing a sermon in September, Cheryl Pyrch, the pastor of Summit Presbyterian Church, needed an assist. On the topic of greatness and Jesus Christ, she wanted to open with recollections of greats in other spheres.
She didn’t have to look very far for a source.
Having encounteredWilt Chamberlainin passing almost 40 years ago, she decided he was the great she wanted to highlight. And details of his career — four Most Valuable Player Awards, seven N.B.A. scoring titles — were close at hand, literally and figuratively through Sports Reference, a monolith of sports data websites that just happens to rent space from the church.
“I didn’t know all this in 1980,” Pyrch told the congregation as she described Chamberlain’s awards during the Sunday service. “I got it yesterday from a Sports Reference website.”
The ubiquitous Sports Reference family of websites —Baseball-Reference.com,Basketball-Reference.com,Pro-Football-Reference.com,Hockey-Reference.com, and so on — are some of the most popular sports almanacs on the internet.
They draw users of all kinds, from people casually searching for a trivia answer to owners of professional teams. Aided by an overhaul of its mobile website, Sports Reference’s founder and president, Sean Forman, said the group of sites drew one billion page views last year, a record for the company.
Sports Reference, however, does not have the gleaming offices or huge staff of a digital titan. It has 11 full-time employees and is headquartered on the third floor of a building at Summit Presbyterian in Philadelphia, behind the 100-year-old main church and above the gymnasium, which is often used as a day care center.
“Walking through it to come in and out, sometimes you’re going through 3-year-olds tossing balls,” said Mike Kania, 38, who eight years ago became one of the company’s first employees. “I worked for AOL for a long time where we had a badge to scan at the front door, people there and a front desk. It’s a lot different from that.”
It is, in fact, a point of pride among Sports Reference employees that the sites have grown from humble beginnings into oft-used resources. Until late last year, Forman, 47, was cleaning the office and taking out the trash. (He has since hired the church’s janitor to take over those duties.)
They are among the most popular sports-related sites. Basketball-Reference trails only NBA.com, while Pro-Football-Reference is second to NFL.com, according toSimilarWeb. Nearly two decades after Forman created Baseball-Reference, it ranks third among baseball sites, behind MLB.com andMLBTradeRumors.com.(Baseball-Reference, however, is the top draw in Forman’s stable.)
The sites are not just for casual fans. J.J. Redick, the Philadelphia 76ers guard, pays for an advertising-free Basketball-Reference subscription. John Henry, the principal owner of the Boston Red Sox and Liverpool F.C., uses Baseball-Reference’s Play Index to manage statistical searches. Scott Boras, the well-known baseball agent, donated $100 to the company during its infancy because he had relied on the site’s data while negotiating a contract for Andruw Jones, Forman said.
“I use it daily,” said Thad Levine, the Minnesota Twins general manager, although his team, like many others, generates its own advanced and proprietary data.
“We went so far as to hire one of their back-end programmers,” added Levine, referring to Hans Van Slooten, who oversaw Baseball-Reference until June, when the Twins hired him for their front office.
The sites are still expanding and developing. Forman said he envisioned Basketball-Reference eventually surpassing Baseball-Reference in traffic as a result of the data revolution in the N.B.A. And over the summer, Sports Reference began another major undertaking: a soccer website, FBref.com, which the company hopes will be as comprehensive as its other sites. In a twist from its current offerings, the company is planning to make the soccer site bilingual, with English and Spanish versions.
The sites are painstakingly tweaked for updates and corrections. Some errors are reported through the dozens of emails the company receives daily. One came from the mother of Casey Fossum, a former major league pitcher. She wrote to say that her son’s birth date was wrong. It was corrected.
Other requests reveal the reach of Sports Reference.
A pitching coach sent an email asking that his Italian league statistics be added to his page so that his players would stop teasing him about being a bad pitcher. A woman wrote in to say that she was dating a person who claimed to be a former N.F.L. player but that she could not find him on Pro-Football-Reference. She wanted to know if that was because of an oversight or a lie.
“I tried to let her down as gently as possible,” said Mike Lynch, 37, whose official title with the company is managing stathead. “I said something like, ‘If he was cut in training camp, we wouldn’t necessarily have a record of him playing in a regular season game.’”
Sports Reference started with Baseball-Reference in 2000, when Forman, looking to avoid work on his doctoral dissertation on applied mathematical and computational sciences at the University of Iowa, began building a website from the CD-ROM that accompanied the printed Total Baseball encyclopedias. He hoped to make historical data more accessible.
Forman, who has contributed toThe New York Times’s baseball coveragein the past, expanded his endeavor by creating Sports Reference in 2004. Three years later he formalized loose affiliations with Pro-Football-Reference (founded by Doug Drinen in 2000) and Basketball-Reference (founded by Justin Kubatko in 2004). Kubatko left Sports Reference in 2013 because of what he called“creative differences.”
In 2007, Forman still fit the stats nerd stereotype, working out of the basement of his home and staying up until 1 a.m. updating or improving the website. The year before, he had left his full-time job of six years — professor of mathematics and computer science at St. Joseph’s University — because it was too hard to juggle both. He also needed a better place to work.
So Forman turned to his church, which had space to rent.
Sports Reference’s seven websites are usually updated automatically, mostly from official feeds of statistics that the company pays for. Some data, such as roster transactions or salary information, is input manually, and there are always bugs to fix.
Once you get beyond the basics, however, the information on the sites runs the gamut of sources.
They include a collection of old college media guides acquired from a single collector and a professor in Britain who supplies statistics of independent baseball leagues. The sites also add some things just for fun, such asOddibe McDowell’s pagelisting his utility bills from 2011 and part of 2012, in reference to a series of articlesby Deadspin.
Sports Reference’s goal is to become more comprehensive, even as sports leagues increasingly privatize their data. Eventually, the company hopes to charge for advanced features and to become less dependent on advertising, which currently generates 95 percent of the sites’ revenue. As of now, the only advanced tool that requires a paid subscription is Baseball-Reference’s Play Index. (Don’t worry:The page for the former Met Keith Hernandez’s mustache will live forever.)
That the little company in her church has become so important, with leading sports websites, earned a laugh from Pyrch. She had been to the sites once or twice, including the time she did sermon research.
“I think that both myself and most of the congregation would not realize what kind of a powerhouse Sports Reference is,” she said. “I don’t really know a lot about numbers or computers, but one billion is a lot.”



Supported by
To the Sports Editor:
Re “For Jackie Robinson’s Centennial, a Display of Rarely Seen Photographs,” Jan. 31: In my 80s now. The special section about Jackie Robinson is a forever treasure.
In my boyhood in Logansport, Ind., a childhood friend of my father’s was Johnny (Red) Corriden, who made the big leagues and was a Brooklyn Dodgers coach in the 1940s. At the end of the season, he would stop by our home in Logansport, and each visit Red would say, “Here Johnny” and present me with a brand-new official major league baseball.
This writer, only 7 when this started and 1,000 miles from Brooklyn, became a lifelong Dodgers fan. Along came 1946, and Robinson was at Montreal. Everything possible was read about him, and then came 1947. (Corriden by then was a Yankees coach.)
My local drugstore for some wild reason had a Jackie Robinson comic book for sale. With 10 cents from my allowance, I got the comic book and was reading it on the front porch when my father, a white man born in 1891, saw me with it and said, “Son, it’s all right that you root for that colored and all right that you read that comic book, but do not let anyone know about this.”
For a 10-year-old who believed that his parents were always right, there was stunning mystification. In the early spring of 1947, we rode the train to Chicago to see the Dodgers play the Cubs. We had good seats near the visitors’ dugout (somehow Corriden arranged this, even though he was with the Yankees).
As not everyone knows, Robinson played first base his rookie year. When he stepped out of the dugout, in the Dodgers’ traveling grays, and made his pigeon-toed trot to first base, all at once two things were known by me: My all-time sports hero was right before my eyes, and my father had feet of clay.
This watershed moment has affected my views about civility forever. On the 40th anniversary of Robinson’s rookie year, I sent a short note to Rachel Robinson, Jackie’s widow, simply stating that his heroism had reached and forever touched a 10-year-old a thousand miles away.
John F. Dunn
Decatur, Ill.
To the Sports Editor:
My fanatical loyalty to the distant Brooklyn Dodgers led to many fights and much peer mockery (as the Dodgers lost too many World Series) when I was 6 in a 1950 Larchmont, N.Y., neighborhood of Yankees fans.
Jackie Robinson, my hero, ran faster, hit more cannily, executed double plays and taunted opposition pitchers and infielders with greater skill, guts and swagger than anyone else in the game (to the best of my unstatistical knowledge). Stealing home, to my later Little Leaguer’s mind, was nearly impossible, but Robinson succeeded 20 times and attempted even more.
At first, I did not know his race. I did not understand such categories. He was just the greatest ballplayer. A little older, I knew better and learned that getting to first base was only one of the difficulties that faced my American hero (in every sense of that word).
So when “next year” became “this year” (some readers will understand that phrase), tears came to my eyes. When the Dodgers moved to L.A., it happened again. When Jackie Robinson died young, I wept. When I read The Times’s special section, once more I cried.
Donald Lateiner
Delaware, Ohio
To the Sports Editor:
As deserving as Jackie Robinson is of all the attention he has received, it is a shame that Larry Doby is all but ignored. Doby broke the color barrier in the American League two months after Robinson broke in with the Dodgers. He faced all the same difficulties as Robinson, overcame all the same hurdles and persevered to have a great career, helping Cleveland win the 1948 World Series. Yet we see no biopics or retrospectives of Doby. No. 42 has been retired from baseball, but No. 14 goes unhonored. Perhaps playing in New York is the reason for the difference. But whatever the reason, there is no doubt that Doby is in fact deserving of recognition to the same degree as Robinson.
Mark B. Cohn
Naples, Fla.



Supported by
On Baseball
ByTyler Kepner
The St. Louis Cardinals went three long seasons without a playoff berth. To rouse themselves from this interminable slumber, they traded for a former All-Star who had played his entire career for a West division team, winning multiple Gold Gloves but never reaching the World Series. The player was facing the end of his contract, but the Cardinals hoped to persuade him to stay for many years.
This is true of Paul Goldschmidt now. Nineteen years ago, it was true for Jim Edmonds.
The latter partnership worked quite well: Edmonds, who had come up with the Angels, signed along-term contractduring his first season in St. Louis, led the Cardinals to a division title and eventually helped themwin a World Series. The Gold Gloves and All-Star selections kept coming for Edmonds, who earned thecoveted red sports coatlast summer as a member of the team’s Hall of Fame.
“It’s Cardinal baseball, it’s the Midwest, it’s one of the best places to play in the country, and you find that out from Day 1,” said Edmonds, now a guest instructor and broadcaster for the Cardinals. “It’s a different time, a different era and I don’t know what the players are going through now, but hopefully he likes it and blends in. It’s also an organizational thing, too. Do they really want to keep him, and how does he play this year?”
The Cardinals, who last reached the postseason in 2015, very much want to keep Goldschmidt, a six-time All-Star first baseman with three Gold Gloves. Theyacquired himfrom the Arizona Diamondbacks last Dec. 5 for pitcher Luke Weaver, catcher Carson Kelly, infielder Andy Young and a draft pick, finally landing the high-impact slugger they’ve been missing.
“Anytime you complete a deal, there’s always some level of satisfaction, especially this magnitude of player — but, really, the excitement’s going to come when he gets introduced at Busch Stadium,” said John Mozeliak, the Cardinals’ president of baseball operations. “There’s a lot leading up to that, but I think he’s going to realize that St. Louis is a very special place and ultimately one that we want him to someday call home.”
Mozeliak has not yet spoken with Goldschmidt or his agent, Casey Close, about a contract extension — “Both sides will know when the time is right,” he said — and Goldschmidt declined to comment on his future. Any answer he could give would be incomplete, because he has not yet experienced life as a Cardinal.
The team has finished second in the National League in attendance in each of the last six seasons — behind the Los Angeles Dodgers — and has a 15-year streak of drawing at least 3 million fans. The Diamondbacks have not reached 3 million fans since 2002, when Goldschmidt was a high school freshmannear Houston.
“There’s a ton of support for the Cardinals organization, for the players there,” Goldschmidt said. “They love their team. There’s high expectations from the fans, and rightfully so. Hopefully we’ll play well, give them a good show and find a way to win a lot of games.”
The Cardinals last won the World Series eight years ago, a fact they emphasized on printouts taped by the clubhouse door Monday, when they held their first full-squad workout of spring training. The sheet listed a few goals — “trust, prepare, execute, celebrate” — and included three columns of championship years, with a conspicuously blank line beneath 2011.
Only one player from that World Series roster, catcher Yadier Molina, remains on the team. The Cardinals have stayed above .500 ever since — and even won a pennant in 2013 — but rivals have passed them by.
“It’s tough, man,” said second baseman Kolten Wong, who has played six seasons in St. Louis. “For me, all I knew when I first got to the big leagues was playoffs every single year. To go from that to not making it the past three years, I’m itching to get back. Everyone deserves to get back, and our fans deserve it more.”
In the seven seasons since 2011 — Albert Pujols’s last in St. Louis before signing with the Angels as a free agent — no Cardinals player has hit 30 home runs with a .900 on-base plus slugging percentage in the same season. This has been done 67 times in those seasons by 39 different players — includingfour times by Goldschmidt.
Yet Goldschmidt, 31, is more than a power hitter. He has a .297 career average and five seasons of at least 15 stolen bases, plus the three Gold Gloves. Before reporting to camp, he spoke with coaches on the phone about the finer points of base running.
“He actually initiated those, and they’re not short conversations, and they’re not forced,” Manager Mike Shildt said. “He loves it, he’s a baseball guy, and he’s got the details.”
The Cardinals turned to Shildt, an organizational lifer, after firing Mike Matheny as manager last July. The players responded with a late push for a playoff spot, finishing with 88 victories and a renewed sense of identity.
As an organization well-known for attention to fundamentals, it was startling for the Cardinals to lead the majors in errors. Yet they committed in the second half to strong defenders like Wong at second and Harrison Bader in center field, and in the winter they stabilized their bullpen with a two-year, $25 million deal for Andrew Miller.
Wherever he has gone recently — Boston, Baltimore, the Yankees, Cleveland — Miller’s teams have made the playoffs. The Cardinals have their three-year drought, but Miller has a six-year streak. He believes it will continue.
“When you’re at the stage of your career that I am, that’s where you tend to find yourself,” Miller said. “The teams that seek you out, that’s their intention: ‘Not next year, not five years down the road, but this year.’”
This year — for now — is the extent of the Cardinals’ future with Goldschmidt. In time, their owners will put a value on how much they want to keep him. On opening day in St. Louis, the fans will start their effort, too.
“Talking about it is hard to sell,” Mozeliak said. “But experiencing it is different.”



Supported by
Yankees 7, Orioles 2
ByJames Wagner
Glorious daydreams abound on opening day, when each team’s slate is clean and the season’s inevitable trials and tribulations haven’t yet piled up. But the images of winning a pennant and hoisting the World Series trophy are far more realistic for some — the 2019 Yankees included.
Their season of high expectations, at the tail end of a championship-less decade, began Thursday afternoon with a booming first chapter. With a formula they expect to ride often this year, the Yankees toppled the Baltimore Orioles,7-2, behind power hitting and pitching.
Designated hitter Luke Voit provided the bulk of the power by smashing the team’s first home run of the season, a three-run shot in the first inning. He drove in another run when he was hit by a pitch with the bases loaded in the fifth, ultimately accounting for four runs with a blast and a bruise.
There was more offense to come after his homer, but Voit’s contributions proved more than enough against the rebuilding Orioles in front of a crowd of 46,928 at Yankee Stadium.
Masahiro Tanaka, starting because of a shoulder injury to the ace Luis Severino, earned his first opening-day victory in four tries as a Yankee. He allowed two runs, one earned, and struck out five batters over five and two-thirds innings, then stepped aside for the onslaught that is the Yankees’ new and improved bullpen.
“It was an ideal way to go about a game, as far as pitching goes,” Tanaka said.
There was little anxiety for the pitching staff thanks to the Yankees’ potent lineup. After setting a major league record with 267 home runs last season, the Yankees predicted they would top that this year.
With two home runs in their first game, they are on a pace to do so. First baseman Greg Bird also homered, to right-center field in the eighth inning. The blast helped cancel out a few boos for Bird, who had struck out in each of his first three at-bats.
But on Thursday, at least, it all started with Voit. About a year ago, he was with the St. Louis Cardinals’ Class AAA team in Memphis. The Yankees, needing a first baseman because of injuries and underperformance, saw Voit as an undervalued player and acquired him in a minor trade in July.
Given a chance to play, he proved crucial to the Yankees’ playoff push. He hit 14 home runs in 39 games and started all of the Yankees’ playoff games. He battled Bird for the first-base job this year, but both ended up on the opening-day roster thanks to a nagging back injury to center fielder Aaron Hicks.
And on Voit’s first major league opening day, the Yankees trusted him with the power spot of the lineup, fourth, behind his fellow sluggers Aaron Judge and Giancarlo Stanton. After Judge and Stanton singled off Orioles starter Andrew Cashner, Voit came up and saw a low slider on his fifth pitch. Listed at 6 feet 3 inches and 225 pounds, Voit and his powerful swing sent the ball over the center-field fence.
“To have that first opening day and hit a home run is pretty special,” Voit said, “and something I’ll remember for the rest of my life.”
A couple of caveats should be noted with the victory: It was against the Orioles, who had the worst record in baseball last season. On the other hand, this Yankees squad is not yet whole.
Pitcher C. C. Sabathia is serving a five-game suspension stemming from an incident in which he threw at Jesus Sucre last fall and will have to spend addition time on the injured list, as he is still building up from off-season operations on his heart and a knee. He is expected to return sometime in April, which is when reliever Dellin Betances and Hicks are also supposed to be back. Severino is out until May. Shortstop Didi Gregorius is expected back from elbow surgery over the summer.
“It’s a long season,” Yankees Manager Aaron Boone said after Thursday’s win. “And I’d tell you that if I walked in here and we lost the game. So, sure, we want to get off to a good start and play our best baseball.”
He added: “But one game sometimes, either way, doesn’t necessarily bleed into anything. I look for individuals trying to get a few firsts out of the way so you can settle into the routine and grind of the season so it becomes more normal.”
With this core of players, the Yankees have shown tantalizing potential. They fell one game short of the World Series in 2017 but were bounced in a 2018 American League division series by the Boston Red Sox, their fierce rivals and the eventual champions.
Once the Yankees were sent packing last October, Judge said he couldn’t bring himself to the watch the rest of the postseason. His 2019 goals include winning the A.L. East, which the Yankees haven’t done since 2012, and advancing further in the playoffs.
“It’s always on your mind, especially starting a new season,” he said.
To reach that goal, the Yankees tried to build up their pitching staff. This winter, they traded prospects for starting pitcher James Paxton and spent $140 million, most of it either re-signing or adding starting pitchers J.A. Happ and Sabathia, and relief pitchers Zack Britton and Adam Ottavino.
“We won 100 games last year, and we’re even better than we were last year,” Stanton said.
Glimpses showed on Thursday. Ottavino, a newcomer who grew up a Yankees fan in Brooklyn, struck out three batters with his wicked arsenal over one and a third innings. He was followed by Britton, who worked around a walk and a hit for a scoreless eighth inning. Closer Aroldis Chapman had little issue in the ninth to close out the first of what the Yankees hope is many more wins.
“So many things factor into reaching a World Series,” said shortstop Troy Tulowitzki, another newcomer, who went 1 for 4. “It has to come together. You go through ups and down during the season, and it’s all about how you kind of ride that ship. This team has the talent but that’s only half the battle.”


Supported by
ByJames Wagner
ST. PETERSBURG, Fla. — Everything was in place at the Vinoy Renaissance Hotel for Luis Severino’s arbitration hearing Friday morning.
The panel was there, waiting to hear the cases presented by each side. Severino, the ace of the Yankees’ rotation, who was eligible for salary arbitration for the first time in his career, was at the hotel with his agents. They were prepared to make their pitch that he should be paid $5.25 million for the 2019 season. Representatives for the Yankees, who believed Severino was worth $4.4 million, were also present.
But just before Friday’s meeting, Brian Cashman, the Yankees’ general manager, called one of Severino’s agents to negotiate.
The hearing was hastily postponed, and soon the two sides had an agreement — one that underscored an increasingly wary climate between players and management across the sport.
The four-year deal guarantees Severino $40 million, according to people familiar with the deal who requested anonymity because the terms had not been made public. Instead of going year to year with Severino’s salary, the agreement buys out all four seasons in which he was eligible to go to arbitration. For Severino, who will turn 25 next week, the deal protects against injury or underperformance, and the Yankees guard against Severino’s value skyrocketing with a potential Cy Young-level season.
Severino forfeited what would have been his first season of free agency, in 2023: The deal includes a team option for $15 million that year or a $2.75 million buyout.
The contract also holds hints of players’ fears amid tense labor relations in the majors. Severino’s deal is front-loaded: He will earn $6 million in 2019 and $10 million in 2020, and then is to receive only modest raises to $10.25 million in 2021 and $11 million in 2022. In other words, he will earn $26.25 million of the $40 million guaranteed by the 2021 season.
Why? The current collective bargaining agreement between Major League Baseball and the players’ union runs through the 2021 season, so Severino is protecting himself against a potential work stoppage.
The deal is also a sign of the Yankees’ willingness to lock up the young core of players that has spearheaded their recent stretch of winning. Severino, who signed with the Yankees out of the Dominican Republic in 2012, when he was 18, blossomed into a hard-throwing ace who was named an All-Star in 2017 and 2018.
He has thrown at least 191 innings each of the last two seasons and posted a combined E.R.A. of 3.18 across both years. In that stretch, the Yankees were 44-19 in games he started.
“He’s a great pitcher,” said Manager Aaron Boone, unable to comment on the deal until it was announced later in the day. “I hope he’s here for a long time.”
Severino is the first in a long line of young stars the Yankees may try to secure for years to come. Once led by older players, the Yankees overhauled their roster in recent years and built around a core of younger homegrown players (Aaron Judge, Gary Sanchez, Dellin Betances, Miguel Andujar and Severino) or players that blossomed after arriving in the Bronx (Didi Gregorius, Gleyber Torres and Aaron Hicks).
As that core grows together, starts earning more or inches closer to free agency, the Yankees are weighing ways of keeping it together. In particular, they like three standouts who can become free agents after this season: Betances, 30; Hicks, 29; and soon-to-be-29 Gregorius, although his recovery from Tommy John surgery hurts his value.
Judge and Sanchez are 26 and will be eligible for arbitration for the first time next season, so the Yankees may wait until then to broach long-term contract talks, as they did with Severino.
But the balance in negotiations seems to be tilting toward the clubs, as free agency is no longer the hallowed grounds that players once dreamed about. Off-seasons have turned into protracted dances with teams, evidenced by the superstars Bryce Harper and Manny Machado, and many other top players, remaining unsigned as spring training begins.
One effect has been an increasing number of players signing deals considered team-friendly before reaching free agency. While that trend has drawn some scrutiny — some frowned on the Philadelphia Phillies ace Aaron Nola’s recent four-year, $45 million extension, which could end up costing him two free-agent seasons and keep him off the market until his age-31 season — some players seem to have accepted the writing on the wall about future earnings.
In Severino’s case, if the Yankees pick up his 2023 option, he will be a free agent for his age-30 season, so he can still earn more if he keeps performing and stays healthy. Patrick Corbin, whom the Yankees wooed but failed to sign this winter, signed a six-year, $140 million deal with the Washington Nationals and will turn 30 in July.
An additional benefit of Friday’s agreement for both sides: avoiding the actual arbitration hearings, which can be contentious and leave a bad taste with players who watch their team list off their weaknesses as it argues for a lower salary. The Yankeesengaged in an ugly war of words with Betances’s agent in 2017, and Trevor Bauer of the Cleveland Indians this week called an argument presented by M.L.B.’s labor-relations staff, which is also present in the hearings, “a character assassination.”
Severino, at the last minute, avoided all that. It was around 11:15 a.m. on Friday that one of Severino’s agents walked out of the Vinoy Renaissance and got into a car. Soon thereafter, Cashman emerged and also drove off. Word soon spread that the Yankees and their young ace had a new deal.


Supported by
ByDavid Waldstein
PORT ST. LUCIE, Fla. — The 2004 baseball season was a turning point for the Mets. It was the final year of Art Howe’s forgettable reign as manager and the last season that the storied lefties John Franco and Al Leiter pitched for their boyhood team.
But new beginnings also emerged that year: David Wright made his debut in July, and then in October the Mets owner Fred Wilpon brought back Omar Minaya to be general manager.
All of those men, minus Howe, gathered at the Mets’ minor league complex on Monday to watch the team’s current top pitchers — Jacob deGrom and Noah Syndergaard — throw in an intrasquad game. Wright and Minaya sat in the tower above the field while Franco and Leiter peered through a fence, all reunited to help new general manager Brodie Van Wagenen build a championship contender.
Wilpon, who is entering his 40th season as an owner of the Mets, loves having his former players back in the fold. He wants them to help re-establish a winning tradition in Flushing. Wilpon vividly recalled how Franco, Leiter and Wright had contributed to successful Mets teams, and he believes they can help foster that same culture, now, asadvisers in the front office.
In fact, that was precisely the topic of discussion within that group on Monday: How to turn a collection of individual baseball players into one winning squad?
“They probably weren’t the most talented team,” Wright said of the 1999 and 2000 Mets teams that reached the National League Championship Series and the World Series, “just as we weren’t the most talented team in 2015. But what we had was everybody pulling that rope in the same direction, guys that got to know one another on a personal level. It was important to go out and play well for one another.”
Wright said that when he joined the Mets in 2004, Franco and Leiter helped him make the transition into the nuanced and sometimes complex world of a major-league clubhouse, imparting lessons that went far beyond playing ball. Wright said he hoped to do the same with an array of younger players and minor leaguers, especially those at his old position of third base, over the next few days.
“I’m here to talk about the baseball mind-set,” Wright said. “The last thing they need is another coach. I can talk about off-the-field-type stuff, anything. I want to be available.”
Wright said that Van Wagenen had already put him to work. In December, Van Wagenen invited Wright to go to the winter meetings as part of his new role, and the rookie adviser was shocked at the heavy workload and long hours.
“The winter meetings are nuts,” Wright said.
He also said how “weird” it was to be in Port St. Lucie for the first time as something other than a player. On Monday, Wright said he fretted over what to wear now that playing games was not part of his routine. He chose a golf shirt and slacks, and looked very much like an executive.
The front-office roles seem like a natural development for all three, who exerted a particularly strong influence in the clubhouse as players — especially Franco. Wright was a quieter leader, but as he grew older he knew what was expected of him. During spring training in 2015, the year the Mets went to the World Series, Wright confronted Syndergaard, then a rookie, for eating lunch in the clubhouse during a game, instead of being in the dugout to support his teammates.
Wright also had the humility to later apologize to Syndergaard for challenging him in front of reporters that day. Syndergaard, when asked what he remembered from Wright’s days as a clubhouse leader, said he did not recall his emotions from that time. But he noted that with all of Wright’s accomplishments, includingearning more than $160 million, Wright did not need to continue punching a clock.
“The tenure and career that he has had, he could just kick back and relax and call it being an adviser,” Syndergaard said, and added, “If I were him, that’s what I would do.”
But the 36-year-old Wright,who was forced to retireafter missing virtually all of the last two seasons with back and neck injuries, still yearns to be involved, even if he will do some from California, where he lives with his wife and daughters.
From his base there, he can scout high school and professional players and provide Van Wagenen with insight about current major leaguers he played with and against, all while gaining insight into the role of an executive.
Of course, he still misses playing. But if he needed any reminders that retirement was the appropriate chapter for him right now, he got one when he tweaked his neck on the flight to Florida. He’s healed now, and back to trying to help Van Wagenen identify the winning ingredients in Queens.
“Hopefully, it will be good for the organization,” Wright said, “because I do believe there is at least a little value to what I can bring to the table.”

Supported by
ByVictor Mather
Larry Baer will take a leave of absence from his job as the chief executive of the San Francisco Giants, the team announced on Monday. Last week, Mr. Baer wascaptured on videoin a physical altercation with his wife in a public plaza that ended with her on the ground.
The Giants said that Mr. Baer “has acknowledged that his behavior was unacceptable, apologized to the organization, and is committed to taking steps to make sure that this never happens again.”
The Giants said that its executive team would manage day-to-day operations during Mr. Baer’s absence.
Major League Baseball has said it is gathering facts on the altercation.
The Giants said in their statement that they would cooperate.
In the video,Mr. Baer is seen lungingfor something in his wife’s hands. The couple said later that it was a cellphone. In the struggle, Mrs. Baer falls off her chair and onto the ground.
In a statement after the video emerged on Friday, the couple said: “Regrettably today we had a heated argument in public over a family matter. We are deeply embarrassed by the situation and have resolved the issue.”
Mrs. Baer said in a statement: “I started to get up, and the chair I was sitting in began to tip. Due to an injury I sustained in my foot three days ago, I lost my balance. I did not sustain any injury based on what happened today. Larry and I always have been and still are happily married.”
The length of the leave of absence and Mr. Baer’s future with the club are unclear. The club said, “As leaders in the community, we at the Giants hold ourselves to the highest standards and those standards will guide how we consider this matter moving forward.”
Mr. Baer was named chief operating officer of the Giants in 1996, president in 2008 and chief executive in 2012.



Supported by
ByBrad Lefton
TOKYO — Major League Baseball began its 2019 season on Wednesday in Japan with the first of two games between the Oakland Athletics and the Seattle Mariners at the Tokyo Dome. But don’t say they are playing on foreign soil.
That’s because 12 tons of clay, silt and sand mixtures were shipped by boat from the United States to make the batter’s box, pitcher’s mound, base pits and bullpens feel like home. The dirt swap was news to the veteran Seattle pitcher Mike Leake, who nonetheless gave his stamp of approval after starting the first of two exhibition games each club played against teams from Japan’s Nippon Professional Baseball as a tuneup.
“Oh, you mean we weren’t pitching on the same mound the Japanese teams use during their season?” Leake said Sunday. “It felt like the same mound that we pitch on in the States. The only thing I would say is that maybe they put a little too much water at first, so some of the clay stuck to my spikes in the first inning, but that happens at home, too. After that, it was perfect.”
For Murray Cook and his traveling crew of three, that is the highest praise. Cook has been a consultant for M.L.B. on field construction and maintenance for nearly three decades, and he serves as the unofficial head groundskeeper for any league-sanctioned event played on a diamond not ordinarily manicured by one of its 30 teams.
“The commissioner’s office and players’ association have a big plan to develop the game worldwide and with that they need fields,” said Cook, who is also the president of the commercial landscaper BrightView’s sports turf division in Pennsylvania. “So I get tasked with these fun projects from them to create these canvases for the players to go out and perform.”
He was quite familiar with the stadium for Wednesday’s game, the fifth time M.L.B. had opened a season at the Tokyo Dome — the most of any ballpark outside its 30 member stadiums in North America. A packed crowd of 45,787 came out to see what is likely to be Ichiro Suzuki’s final pro appearances in Japan. The fans were treated to an offensive showcase wonby the Mariners, 9-7.
It was a different story in 2000, when the Chicago Cubs and the Mets split a pair of games here in the first regular-season games outside North America.
Aside from thrilling plays likeBenny Agbayani’s extra-inning, pinch-hit grand slamfor the Mets, that series included embarrassing moments that baseball would prefer not to repeat: Robin Ventura twice slipped in a batter’s box that was made of the softer dirt used in Japanese baseball.
Players described it as similar to the loose soil used with potted plants, and it caused more headaches when an all-star team came over for a postseason tour in 2004. Roger Clemens’s foot was sore and Dontrelle Willis developed pain in his back, Cook said, because they were sliding more than usual on the pitchers’ mound.
Cook was camping with his family in the Blue Ridge Mountains when the league summoned him to Japan in an emergency.
“They were all complaining about how soft the mounds were,” Cook recalled. “I said, ‘Well, we can fix that.’ I came over and whipped up a concoction that got them through the rest of that tournament.”
Since then, the league has taken greater steps to ensure that Leake’s experience is the norm. Cook estimated he had been to Tokyo four times since the games were announced last spring. In between, he spent time in London, Mexico, New Zealand, the Dominican Republic and Peru — among other places — to work on fields for games, clinics and other events over the past year. His challenge is to ensure that wherever the game is taking place, the field is always up to M.L.B.’s competitive and safety standards.
There are plenty of other issues to address besides the dirt. For this series, Cook’s work began on March 4 and included helping lay a new, previously planned artificial turf surface at the arena. The bases used in Japan are also fluffier and rise to a crown, while American bases are harder and flatter. They also anchor into the base pits differently, so Cook not only has to bring bases from home but also has to change the holes into which they are fitted.
Japan also uses 12 permanent nylon markers — four around each batter’s box and four around the catcher’s box — as guides for laying chalk lines around those spaces; in the United States, a metal template is brought out before each game for the markings. In past events here, M.L.B. catchers complained that the half-inch-high tufts were distracting, and they would pull them out of the ground and toss them away. Cook now stores one of his metal templates at the Tokyo Dome, along with an array of other handy supplies.
Cook’s job may be easier in Japan than it is almost anywhere else because of baseball’s deep history here. The 12 tons of dirt for this series is a smaller shipment than previous ones because he has been able to find suitable domestic materials to complement his imported soil.
But when the Yankees and the Red Sox play a series at London Stadium in June — M.L.B.’s first regular-season games in Europe — Cook will need to export 300 tons of dirt to England to build a field entirely from scratch.
With his vast experience, Cook will be up to the task, but he noted that there was one item in his field-conversion process that still bedevils him.
While he has become an expert in the nuances of importing American soil products through customs in many countries, he estimated that Japanese security agents had confiscated seven metal tape measures from him over the years. This week, he vowed, he would remember to tuck it into his checked luggage after the Mariners and the A’s are finished.
An earlier version of this article inaccurately described the significance of games between the Cubs and the Mets in Japan in 2000. They were the first regular-season M.L.B. games played outside North America, not the first played outside the United States and Canada. A 1996 series was held in Mexico.



Supported by
rites of passage
It’s called the yips, and it’s a sudden inability to play. I had to find my way out of it.
ByNaomi Gordon-Loebl
I quit playing baseball when I was 11 years old. That was the cutoff for girls; after that point, we had to switch to softball, andI wasn’t having it.
My father tried to reason with me.
“Everybody plays softball eventually,” he told me. “All adults make the switch.”
But I wasn’t an adult. I didn’t want to pitch underhand. I didn’t want to play with a ball the size of a grapefruit. Most of all, I didn’t want the most important thing in my life taken away from me because I was a girl.
Up to that point, baseball had defined me. I had one of those T-shirts — “Baseball is life. The rest is just details.” And in my case, it was pretty much true. If anyone asked me what I was going to be when I grew up, I told them: the first woman in the Major League.
I shelved my glove, took up basketball and didn’t walk back onto a baseball diamond for 17 years.
Until one spring two years ago, when I joined a softball team.
Tryouts were on a cold Saturday morning, and as I walked over to the playground, I wondered what I was getting myself into. I had known about this league for years, but joining had never occurred to me.
Something, though, made me more open. I missed sports: the current that runs through you when you catch the meaty part of the ball with your bat; the way everyone cheers when the shortstop catches a line drive to win the game. I wanted to be in the park at dusk, that perfect time of day in summer when the sun finally stops being punishing and all of the fields look orange in the light. And I wanted the camaraderie of a team.
Still: Dreams of friendship and sunsets over baseball diamonds were one thing. Throwing a softball for the first time with three dozen strangers in finger-stiffening temperatures was entirely another.
A middle-agedwomanwith dimples pinned the number 22 to the back of my sweatshirt and sent me off to play catch. The ball was big, but it flew easily out of my hand and into my partner’s glove. It felt good to throw — familiar, even. We took turns hitting, then fielded grounders at every base. Each time, I scooped up the ball and hurled it at first. Each time, my throw went straight into the woman’s mitt.
The first month was good. Our team played once a week. After most games we’d head to a bar, where we’d drink a few beers and rehash the ump’s bad calls. Softball was turning out exactly as I had hoped it would.
And then, sometime in June, I started throwing wild.
I’m not sure how it happened. All I know is that I suddenly found myself incapable of throwing the ball.
The loss of skill was so complete that it was as if I had never been able to throw a ball in my life. Except that I remembered, so clearly that it was agonizing, a time when throwing was the most natural action in my body’s repertoire. The motion was so deeply etched in my ligaments that it seemed like the process happened entirely outside my brain.
The disappearance of something I had always been good at; the fear that it would never come back; the feeling that something valuable had been taken from me without explanation — it was like losing baseball all over again.
It turns out that the sudden inability to complete the most basic motion in sports has a name: the yips.
As I soon discovered on Wikipedia, the yips is the “loss of fine motor skills in athletes.” It occurs “without apparent explanation.” And, Wikipedia helpfully informed me, it “has no known treatment.”
Great.
I read about high-profile cases: Chuck Knoblauch, the second baseman who once hit a sportscaster’s mother in the face with a wild ball. Mackey Sasser, the catcher who couldn’t throw back to the pitcher without double-taking.
And then there was Steve Blass, the great pitcher who developed the yips and was sent down to the minors. I dug up Roger Angell’s 1975 profile of him from The New Yorker and read every word, hoping to uncover some secret that would change my own luck. There was, of course, nothing. Mr. Blass retired early and became a jewelry salesman.At first my team chalked it up to nerves.
“Naomi!” my coach shouted after I fielded a grounder and then threw it 10 feet to her right at practice. “Just relax!”
I tried. But the problem with trying to relax is that the more you try, the less relaxed you feel. I tried to take my time. I tried to be natural. I tried to focus on the mechanics; I tried not to focus on the mechanics at all. I tried to think about being loose; I tried to think about throwing hard. I tried really, really hard not to think.
Sometimes it would work for a while. I’d land a few good tosses, and hopefulness would creep in. But inevitably the anxiety would catch up to me, and soon enough a ball would sail past my partner, sending her jogging into the distance to retrieve it.
After a particularly rough game, my coach pulled me aside. I had been desperate to tell someone on the team what was happening to me: that I was under some kind of curse, that my baseball skills had apparently gone into a coma, that this wasn’t the real me. I thought this was my chance.
“You know, I’ve been having this weird problem — maybe it’s anxiety. This thing happens where I can’t throw the ball.”
Her face went blank.
“Don’t worry, bud, we all get nervous,” she said. “Just do your best.” She patted me on the shoulder and headed off.
The realization came with a thud: To my coach, I wasn’t suffering from some kind of performance anxiety. I just sucked.So again, I quit. I didn’t want to further damage my relationship to something that had once been a source of joy. I stopped playing baseball when I was 11, but I had always carried it with me as something that I was good at, something that no one could take away. Now it seemed that the opposite was true.
One weekend after I left the team, my partner and I made plans to go away with her family. Her father had been a semipro pitcher in his youth.
“You should bring your glove,” she said. “I bet my dad would love to play with you.”
A few days later, she spoke to her father on the phone.
“I told him about your problem,” she said. “He said the same thing happened to him once. And he said what you need to do is ...”
I readied myself for advice I couldn’t use: “Set your feet before you throw.” “Just relax!”
But that wasn’t what was coming.
“He said you need to find a wall with no one around, and take a ball there and throw it against the wall for a long time, over and over, until it comes back to you. All alone.”
I thought about the hours I spent as a kid throwing a ball against a wall: old tennis balls against my parents’ stoop; blue Sky Bounce balls against my elementary school building at recess. When we went to my aunts’ and uncles’ houses in the suburbs, we threw baseballs against the garage door until they left marks and we got in trouble. It was the kind of throwing I longed for now, the kind of throwing you don’t have to think about.
I didn’t bring my glove on vacation. But I did stop into a sporting goods store a few weeks ago. I asked the salesman if there were any softballs soft enough to throw against a wall, and he pointed me to a box of neon-yellow ones.
I flung one against the floor. It leapt up at me, satisfying, easily making its way back into my hand.
I bought it. It’s been sitting on my dresser for a while now.
There’s a playground down the street from my parents’ house. We used to play catch there, and basketball, and sometimes we’d skateboard. I haven’t been in years. But I remember a big, wide handball wall, too, one that seemed to be rarely used.
Maybe I’ll try it.
Naomi Gordon-Loebl is a writer and fellow at the Type Media Center.

Rites of Passage is a weekly-ish column from Styles and The Times Gender Initiative. To read past essays and for information on how to submit an essay,check out this page.
An earlier version of this article misspelled the given name of a baseball catcher who suffered from the yips. He is Mackey Sasser, not Mickey Sasser.
Supported by
Past Tense
Through images and personal essays by longtime New York Times writers, a vivid look at the man who made baseball truly American.
ByEric Moskowitz

100 Photos
View Slide Show›
He was born 100 years ago in ared-clay cornerof Georgia, though for many Americans, Jackie Robinson burst onto the stage fully formed in 1947, a 28-year-old rookie in Dodgerflannels.
That’s the enduring image, the Robinson captured on film at Ebbets Field and fixed in the national imagination: the silent but dynamic hero, broad-shouldered and trim, shattering the color barrier as he ropes another liner, dances off third or hook-slides home in a cloud of dust.
That vision of Robinson — late to the majors, but still in his playing prime — is on display in this gallery of 100 photographs honoring the centennial of his birth on Jan. 31. Many of the selections come from the archives of The New York Times, rounded out with images from other sources, such as U.C.L.A. and Ebony magazine.
Asthese photos make clear, Robinson’sdecade in major-league baseballwas just one act in a remarkably rich and complex life — one ofvision, fortitude, dignity and endurance— shaped by the currents and contours of American history even as it recast them.
There wasalso Jackie the boy,grandson of slaves, hauled cross-country as a toddler from a life of sharecropping to the promise of Pasadena by a determined single mother, a Great Migration pioneer.
And Jackie the amateur athlete, his college exploits chronicled by abooming black press. When The Pittsburgh Courier’s Randy Dixon wrote about the injustice of a segregated sport passing up a star in 1941 — “Exhibit A in So-Called Democracy, the Case of Jackie Robinson” — he didn’t even mean baseball. Robinson had just dazzled in an exhibition between college all-stars and the Chicago Bears, outshining a roster studded with N.F.L. first-round picks.
Back then, baseball was his fourth-best sport. When Lt. Jack Roosevelt Robinson faced acourt-martial for standing his ground after a civilian driver ordered him to the back of a bus at Camp (now Fort) Hood, African-American papers like The Courier identified him as a “football and basketball star” — though he was also anN.C.A.A. champ in the long jump, a certain Olympian if not for the war.
When hejoined the Kansas City Monarchs out of the Army, it was an unglamorous means to an end, enduring relentless bus rides for the$100 a weekhe could send to his mother and save for his own future,envisioning a life as a coach, teacher and athletic director.
And then he was the graying Jackie — on the far side of that fateful playing career — thefirst African-American enshrined in Cooperstown, using his baseball fame not to dabble in civil rights but todig in full-time.
Always, and especially, there was Jackie the husband and father, proud, loving, grieving — honest about the joy and pain in his private life, with his family sharing everything that came with being Jackie Robinson in a flawed nation.
As his friend the Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. — just15 when Robinson was court-martialed— would write, “back in the days when integration wasn’t fashionable, he underwent the trauma and the humiliation and the loneliness which comes with being a pilgrim walking the lonesome byways toward the high road of Freedom. He was a sit-inner before the sit-ins, a freedom rider before the Freedom Rides.”
At just 53, Robinson succumbed todiabetes and heart diseasein 1972. Though he has been gone now nearly as long as he lived, he packed so much into his half-century that his legacy continues to resonate, his foundation helping thousands of students and putting the finishing touches on a museum in Tribeca.
These are the images of a ballplayer, a change agent, a human being and humanitarian — of America, in progress.
ByClaire Smith
I did not personally feel the tectonic shift that took place on April 15, 1947, when Robinson made his Dodgers debut. Alas, I did not see Robinson’s first game, nor even his last, a decade later. I came of age years after he played his final game for Brooklyn.
But I wish I could say, with a straight face, that I actually heard Robinson’s name while still in the womb. He was, in fact, still on the Dodgers then. And yes, my mother was that big a fan of Robinson and the Dodgers and surely was urging him on out loud while she was pregnant with me. Indeed, tales of the lengths to which she and other family members went in order to listen to Dodgers games on the radio were among my favorite bedtime stories as a child.
Clickhereto read more from Claire Smith, a former Times columnist who was the first woman in the Baseball Hall of Fame.
ByGeorge Vecsey
He upgraded the game, and he upgraded my Brooklyn Dodgers, and he upgraded life in America in his 10 years in the major leagues and in his short but active career out in the Real World, pushing for opportunities for black people in all businesses.
He raised the consciousness of Americans, whether they wanted it or not, and that is good reason to honor him on the 100th anniversary of his birth.
Clickhereto read more from George Vecsey’s look at Robinson’s legacy.
Supported by
ByVictor Mather
Unanimity is a rare thing. There is always that one person who believes the Earth is flat, who prefers “The Godfather Part III” to “The Godfather,” who supports Pee-wee Herman for president.
Or who thinks Mariano Rivera doesn’t belong in the Baseball Hall of Fame.
On Tuesday, the Hall will reveal its new class of inductees, and Rivera, the superstar Yankees reliever, is certain to be among them. But there is a lot of curiosity about whether he will become the first player elected unanimously by the baseball writers, achieving something other shoo-ins have not.
Eight voters passed on Cal Ripken Jr., six on Nolan Ryan and 16 on Mike Schmidt.
In 1992, Tom Seaver came five votes short. In 1979, 23 writers said no to Willie Mays. “It’s an embarrassment to our association,”Jack Lang, the writers’ secretary and ballot-counter, said at the time.
In 1966, 20 voters decided Ted Williams wasn’t good enough. In 1962, Jackie Robinson fell 36 votes short of unanimity. Somehow, Joe DiMaggio didn’t get in until his fourth year of eligibility.
This contrarian vein goes way back. In the very first election, in 1936, Ty Cobb came up four votes short of unanimity. On the same ballot, Babe Ruth was 11 short. Yes, 11 writers did not vote for Babe Ruth for the Baseball Hall of Fame. It would be like passing on Luciano Pavarotti for the Opera Hall of Fame or on Thomas Edison for the Inventors Hall.
To be clear, it is only the writers’ branch that has kept the streak going. The Veterans Committee, a much smaller group consisting of former players, executives and members of the news media, has chosen players unanimously. And after Lou Gehrig’s death, the writers unanimously agreed to waive the waiting period and put him directly into the Hall of Fame, essentially by acclamation.
In recent years, unanimity has been getting closer. In 2016, Ken Griffey Jr. came the closest yet, getting 99.3 percent of the vote. Only three voters passed. Last year, Chipper Jones got 97 percent to lead the field.
Can Rivera do a little bit better? Ryan Thibodaux runs a website thatkeeps track of writerswho publicly reveal their votes. (The Hall does not publish individual ballots.) As of Tuesday, 180 of the 400 or so voters had revealed their ballots, which were due on Dec. 31. Of those, all had voted for Rivera.
(For the record, Thibodaux’s Hall of Fame Tracker predicts that, in addition to Rivera, these players will receive at least the 75 percent of the vote needed for induction: Roy Halladay at 94 percent, Edgar Martinez at 90 percent and Mike Mussina at 81 percent.)
Although no writer with a vote has said publicly that he or she will pass on Rivera, there are some detractors out there. Bill Ballou of The Telegram & Gazette of Worcester, Mass.,wrote that he believed Rivera was unworthyof the Hall because the closer’s role is not that important to a team.
“He was great in the ninth inning, agreed, but if he was that great, why not bring him in with the bases loaded and nobody out in the seventh or eighth?” Ballou wrote in a recent column. “Why not use him as a starter?” Plenty of Rivera’s backers have responded by noting that Ballou’s criticism may have more to do with Joe Torre’s strategic decisions as a manager than with Rivera’s talent as a pitcher.
In any event, Ballou does not want to be the voter remembered for denying Rivera a unanimous election; he said he had abstained from voting.
Over time, the absence of a unanimous inductee may have become self-perpetuating. Some voters who believe Rivera is well qualified for the Hall may be tempted to vote no because they do not want him to be the first unanimous entry after players like Ruth and Mays fell short.
It’s hard to compare this strange situation to balloting in football, basketball and other sports, because most Halls of Fame do not release voting totals, instead merely announcing each year’s inductees.
One sport recently had a unanimity breakthrough, when Stephen Currywas elected most valuable player of the 2015-16 N.B.A. seasonby a count of 131-0. George Washington is the only president to win the Electoral College unanimously.
So can Rivera pull a Washington?
A record 652 saves, 13 All-Star selections and five World Series titles loom pretty large. But somewhere, someone may be lurking: a reliever hater, a Yankees hater, or a writer with a cockeyed sense of history or an ax to grind.
It takes only one.



Supported by
ByMatt Stevens
Larry Baer, the chief executive of the San Francisco Giants, has been suspended without pay until July over a video that shows him involved ina public altercation with his wife, the commissioner of Major League Baseball announced on Tuesday.
Mr. Baer has been on a leave of absence from the team since March 4, time away that the league said would now be converted to an unpaid suspension. During the approximately four-month suspension, which goes through July 1, Mr. Baer “shall have no involvement in the operations of the Giants.” The team will be put under the control of someone selected by the team’s ownership group,a statement from Major League Baseball said.
In the meantime, Mr. Baer must be evaluated by an expert to determine an appropriate treatment and counseling plan, the statement said.
The baseball commissioner, Rob Manfred, said league investigators had reviewed video footage of the March 1 episode, in which Mr. Baer was seen lunging for a cellphone in his wife’s hand and forcefully grabbing her. They struggled, and she fell to the ground.
In a statement on Tuesday, Mr. Manfred said that he had met with Mr. Baer and that he had concluded that Mr. Baer’s conduct was “unacceptable under M.L.B. policies and warrants discipline.”
“In determining the appropriate level of discipline, I find that Mr. Baer should be held to to a higher standard because as a leader he is expected to be a role model for others in his organization and community,” Mr. Manfred said. “Based on my conversation with Mr. Baer, it is clear he regrets what transpired and takes responsibility for his conduct.”
The board of the San Francisco Giants, speaking on behalf of the team’s ownership, said in a statement that it believed the discipline imposed by the commissioner was appropriate. The team said that its acting chief executive, Rob Dean, would serve as the interim “control person” until it designates someone permanently.
Mr. Baer, who in addition to leading the Giants’ executive office isone of the team’s principal owners, will continue to serve as the team’s chief executive and president after he returns from his suspension, the team added.
“I respect and accept the commissioner’s decision,” Mr. Baer said in his ownstatement. “I made a serious mistake that I sincerely regret and I am truly sorry for my actions.”
The punishment came as the sports world waits to see how the N.F.L.’s commissioner will reprimand the owner of the New England Patriots, Robert K. Kraft, who has been accused of soliciting prostitution at a massage parlor in Jupiter, Fla. Mr. Kraftpleaded not guiltyto two first-degree misdemeanor charges late last month.
The situation involving Mr. Baer and the allegations against Mr. Kraft have drawn attention to how team owners and executives are punished after being accused of misconduct, compared with players, for whom fines and suspensions may carry a greater impact.
After video of the encounter, which was firstposted by TMZ Sports, surfaced publicly this month, Mr. Baer and his wife, Pam, initially issued statements denying that a physical altercation had taken place. The video appeared to show them arguing in a public plaza. Ms. Baer sat in a chair, and her husband stood next to her. And then Mr. Baer was seen lunging toward her, grabbing her and setting off the struggle, during which she fell to the ground and screamed, “Oh my God!”
The police and Major League Baseball quickly pledged to investigate what had taken place andMr. Baer apologized. Three days after the confrontation,the Giants announced that Mr. Baer would take a leave of absencefrom his job as chief executive.
In mid-March, a coalition of women’s groupsposted an open letteronline that called on Mr. Manfred to commit to “firm and appropriate action in disciplining” Mr. Baer. The mayor of San Francisco, London N. Breed, endorsed the call for a serious penalty.
After the suspension was announced, the coalition, #DoWhatsRightMLB, said it appreciated Mr. Manfred’s reprimand.
“M.L.B. is showing why it is regarded as a leader in advancing cultural change in professional sports by not tolerating violence against women,” the coalition said in astatement.
Ms. Breed agreed, saying in a statement that the league had “sent a clear message that violence against women is unacceptable in any form.”
Last week, the San Francisco District Attorney’s Office determined that the evidence in the case did not support filing criminal charges against Mr. Baer, a spokesman said Tuesday.
Mr. Baer joined the Giants as the club’s marketing director in 1980, left the team to attend Harvard Business School and then served in positions at Westinghouse Broadcasting and CBS,according to a biography.
He returned to the team as a limited partner of the ownership group, and was named chief operating officer in May 1996, president in October 2008 and chief executive in January 2012.



Supported by
ByThe Associated Press
LAS VEGAS — Don Logan spent years trying to get a new minor league ballpark in this gambling city, so the president of the Las Vegas Aviators understands what the Oakland A's are going through in their quest for new digs in the Bay Area.
After all, he's had sewage in his dugout, too.
The A's are still contending with antiquated plumbing at the Oakland Coliseum, the team's home for the past 51 years. Their efforts to get a new stadium have floundered over the years, though recently there has been some momentum toward a new home field.
The club's top minor league team? Well, that's another story.
The Triple-A Aviators open at home Tuesday night in what might be the best ballpark in all of minor league baseball, a $150 million palace complete with swimming pool in right center, celebrity chefs overseeing the grills, and player comforts that rival the bigs.
If players have to spend time in Las Vegas on their way to the top, at least they'll be doing it in style.
"I think I can promise you the locker room facilities just by themselves are far superior here than in Oakland," Logan said.
Funded in part by an $80 million naming rights deal with Las Vegas tourism officials, the appropriately named Las Vegas Ballpark is a big investment for minor league baseball. The 10,000-seat ballpark replaces Cashman Field, which opened in 1983 and — in a bit of serendipity — was briefly the home of the A's themselves when they had to play their first six games of the 1996 season in Las Vegas because the Coliseum was being remodeled for the Raiders.
Logan was there for that series, as he has been for almost every game at Cashman since arriving in 1984, the year after what was then the Padres Triple-A team began play in Las Vegas. He was instrumental in trying to land four spring training teams for the city in the 1990s, and is in the conversation whenever talk turns to a possible major league franchise in Sin City.
But while he has seen just about everything in minor league baseball, Logan says he has never seen a ballpark like the one his team opens in this week.
"This is going to be as nice as any ballpark in the country," Logan said. "There isn't anything we haven't thought of."
That includes the pool, a concept first introduced by the Arizona Diamondbacks, which will be especially popular on summer nights when the temperature doesn't drop below 100 degrees until the games are over. Set amid a forest of towering palm trees, it rents for around $2,000 a game, and Logan predicted it will be filled almost every night.
So will the seats — which are made of mesh to help with the desert heat — and the party decks, which are modeled after those at the minor league park in Charlotte, North Carolina. Fans enjoying the game on the left field party deck will get the bonus of a view of the glittering hotels of the Las Vegas Strip in the valley below.
Logan, the 2018 Pacific Coast League executive of the year, said the team and its architects also borrowed from design elements from ballparks in El Paso, Texas, and in Columbus, Ohio, which has been the top-ranked minor league ballpark in many surveys.
"Its reign as the top ballpark in the minors is about to end this season," Logan said. "It is cool, but it's not this cool."
The old ballpark was located in a declining neighborhood near downtown, while the new one is in the suburban master planned community of Summerlin, with the new practice facility for the NHL's Vegas Golden Knights reachable with a big shot over the left field scoreboard.
It's prime real estate and players will also like that they can walk to the clubhouse from the Red Rock hotel-casino across the street, where visiting teams will stay. Fans can also bet on the game at the casino's sports book, which is offering lines on all Aviators games.
Ticket buyers will find it just as inviting. Besides the swimming pool, there are 22 suites, a wall full of craft beer taps, and a club level complete with a show kitchen for cooking displays. Giada de Laurentiis is one of the celebrity chefs, with others to come. The team also has its own beer, a seasonal ale.
"We've spent an inordinate amount of time on food and different types of beers," Logan said. "The food options and food experience here will be better than most anywhere in baseball, if not better."
Looming over it all will be a $4 million video board that is the largest in the minor leagues. This is Las Vegas, after all, so there has to be some glitz especially considering the city also has a new arena for the Golden Knights and is building a $1.9 billion stadium for the Raiders that will open next year.
That's a lot of competition for the sports dollar, but the Aviators figure to find their niche on the minor league level.
Big league good, even without a big league team.
Supported by
ByJames Wagner
TAMPA, Fla. — Near the end of his batting practice on Thursday afternoon, Gary Sanchez sent a home run off the left field scoreboard at George M. Steinbrenner Field. The sparse crowd watching from the stands applauded. Some cheered his name.
Few Yankees players are entering spring training as much an enigma as Sanchez. Will he be the All Star power-hitting catcher whose offense outweighed his defensive lapses, as he was in 2017? Or will he repeat 2018, the worst all-around campaign of his young career? Or will it be something in between?
For one, the Yankees said Sanchez, 26, was in better physical condition than he was last year. He hadsurgery on his nonthrowing shoulder in Novemberto remove tissue that was causing discomfort.
“I feel normal,” Sanchez said in Spanish on Thursday. “Almost back to 100 percent.”
Still, to be cautious, the Yankees will hold Sanchez out of spring training games until around March 1. Sanchez refused to attribute his poor 2018 season at the plate to his shoulder, but the results were clear: After hitting .278 with 33 home runs in 2017, he mustered only a .186 average with 18 homers last season. He also missed 57 games with two occurrences of a groin injury.
“Last season was tough with a lot of obstacles,” he said. “But that already passed. I won’t think about the shoulder.”
Although Sanchez’s name surfaced in trade rumors during the off-season, Yankees General Manager Brian Cashman has been steadfast in supporting him. Good-hitting catchers are hard to find, especially as the offensive production from that valuable position has trended down over the years.
The Boston Red Sox may have won the World Series with a platoon of light-hitting, defensive-minded catchers, but the Yankees stuck by Sanchez. He led the majors in passed balls in each of the previous two seasons, but the Yankees started him behind the plate for every playoff game in 2018.
“Being a young player behind the plate is a challenging position, especially when you consider the guy is truly a two-way player and carries as much of a load as he does offensively,” Manager Aaron Boone said. “Because of the demands that come with being behind the plate, it doesn’t always happen quick for a catcher at a young age. That’s why a lot of times, you see a lot of catchers get to the big leagues typically a little later than most guys, because there’s a lot that goes into that position that’s not just physically demanding.”
Boone lauded Sanchez’s physical condition as the best it had been in years, adding that Sanchez had graded well in conditioning tests, such as vertical jump, so far in spring training. He also applauded Sanchez’s frame of mind.
While his managerial predecessor Joe Girardi, a former catcher,grew publicly frustrated with Sanchez’s defense, Boone, a former infielder, has taken a different approach. To foster their relationship and lift Sanchez’s confidence, Boone visited him in his native Dominican Republic during the off-season and had dinner with Sanchez and his wife.
“We’ve talked a lot about baseball and things beyond baseball,” Sanchez said. “We always talk about improving the team and me.”
Boone added: “I do feel like there’s been a growth and maturity there that comes out when I’m around him and talk to him now. There’s a real hunger to go out and show the world what a real player he is.”
Asked about improving his defense, Sanchez said fans too often focused on bad more than good. (Some advanced metrics rate Sanchez’s pitch-framing skills and throwing arm much better than his blocking.) He said his goal this year was to improve over all — not simply on defense. Boone said the Yankees’ catching coach, Jason Brown, is trying different stances and positioning with Sanchez behind the plate based on game situations.
“I feel good,” Sanchez said. “That’s most important. I have to stay healthy. I can repeat a good season if everything goes well and I can help the team on both sides — defense and hitting.”
INSIDE PITCH
Dellin Betances, one of the Yankees’ top relief pitchers, will not report to spring training for a few more days — at least until his wife is discharged from a hospital,Aaron Boonesaid. Betances’s wife, Janisa, gave birth to their son, Dellin Jr., on Wednesday.
Follow James Wagner onTwitter:@ByJamesWagner.



Supported by
ByJames Wagner
TAMPA, Fla. — Over the winter, there was an unusual sight in the offices of Yankee Stadium. For a few days, amid the busy period as front-office employees reshaped rosters with trades and signings, Carlos Beltran was sitting among them, learning how to use the club’s internal networks to view video and file scouting reports.
In December,a year after considering him for their managerial vacancy, the Yankees hired Beltran, a nine-time All-Star who spent two and a half seasons with the Yankees, as a special adviser to General Manager Brian Cashman. While front-office positions like special adviser or special assistant can often be nebulous roles handed to former managers, coaches or players who assist at their leisure —Alex Rodriguez, Mariano Rivera andDavid Wright, to name a few — Cashman said Beltran was approaching his job with a full-time student’s mind-set.
“Some parachute in and out, which is great,” Cashman said. “But some are heavily invested, and he is heavily invested.”
Beltran, 41,retired in 2017 after finally winning a World Series, with the Houston Astros. The title capped what some believe is a career with Hall of Fame credentials: 435 home runs (fourth most by a switch-hitter), 2,725 hits and three Gold Glove awards in addition to his All-Star selections.
And after earning more than $220 million over 20 years in the major leagues, Beltran could be doing anything now, such as sitting on the beach in his native Puerto Rico. But he has chosen to work in the Yankees’ front office, writing his version of scouting reports and counseling the younger players throughout the organization.
“I had a career in baseball, I played at a high level, and I made a lot of money in the big leagues, but man, I want these kids to accomplish their dreams,” he said in Spanish during spring training at the team’s facility in Tampa, Fla. “Those were my dreams, too.”
Before the Yankees settled onAaron Boone as their replacement for Joe Girardi before the 2017 season, Cashman asked Beltran to interview for the manager opening. Beltran had just finished playing, and thus had no background in management, but Cashman admired Beltran for his experience, his commanding presence and his genuine personality.
“There’s passion and joy he brings every day,” Cashman said. “He’s capable of anything he wants to do.”
So Cashman contacted Beltran again, this time about a front-office position. Beltran, who lives in New York, told Cashman what he was interested in working on, and Cashman gave him the freedom to do so. For Beltran, the chance to learn the intricacies of the front office from Cashman, who has won four World Series during his two decades as the Yankees’ general manager, was enticing.
“Now it’s my turn to ask a lot of questions, see what interests me and knock on the needed doors to learn baseball from another point of view,” Beltran said.
For Beltran, that view is from the stands, where the scouts sit and analyze the Yankees’ minor league teams during the season. It’s a different perspective, but Beltran gave himself plenty of training for his new job during his playing days. On road trips, he often spent traveling time watching video of the opposing team’s pitchers and hitters on his iPad and then shared his written notes with teammates and coaches. If his team was trading for a new teammate, he would call friends on the player’s former team to get the lowdown on the new acquisition and his personality.
“I’m passionate about this,” he said. “Since I lived the game, I don’t just talk about the visual aspects, but the feelings of the player or what he might be thinking in difficult situations that sometimes analytics cannot see. The front office looks a lot at the numbers, but I’m talking about the mental side that has value. It’s a cool combination.”
Beltran spent the winter writing and filing notes on several dozen players, mostly on prospects in the Yankees’ system but also some major leaguers. It took him 90 minutes to watch video on a player and write up his thoughts, he said. He averaged two per day.
“He’s breaking swings down and he’s breaking down the pitching mechanics,” said Matt Daley, the Yankees’ assistant director of pro scouting. “He’s getting pretty detailed. It’s good information.”
Beltran has also given the Yankees his perspective on how prospects can be helped to develop, particularly those from Latin America. As a player,Beltran encouraged clubs to hire Spanish-language interpretersto prevent messages from getting lost in translation between players and the team or reporters. Language barriers still persist today, he said, and can be factors in players’ growth.
“He’s speaking from the perspective of a guy who’s just off the field and sees it through a player’s lens, which is a unique aspect,” said Tim Naehring, the Yankees’ vice president for baseball operations. “We don’t have many other guys writing reports or putting their opinions down coming from a teammate’s side of things.”
Beltran will also counsel players throughout the season, as he did during two trips to the Yankees’ spring training this year. He will juggle that plus time at home with his wife and three young children and his baseball academy in Puerto Rico.
“Now, it’s about how I can impact the younger players,” he said. “If they can get something out of one conversation or one bit of advice, then at the end of the day, that’s your legacy.”
Among the players Beltran has advised are infielder Gleyber Torres, 22, and outfielder Estevan Florial, 21, the team’s top prospect, who broke a wrist during spring training. Torres, who is from Venezuela, said he had sought out Beltran for tips on improving his focus and taking better care of his body.
“I’ll keep talking to him and, if anything is needed, I have the trust to ask and know he’ll have an answer,” Torres said.
Florial, who is from the Dominican Republic, said Beltran had advised him on how to better use his legs in his swing and how to sharpen aspects of his defense. “To take the time to help someone who isn’t even a big-leaguer is really great,” he said.
So how do all these responsibilities fit into Beltran’s future? Asked if he wanted to run a team one day, either as a manager or as an executive, Beltran would say only that he loved baseball and wanted to learn new skills.
“This will help me if in some future I want to manage, then I understand how an organization thinks, how to develop an organization, and how they evaluate players,” he said. “But in the future, if I say that managing isn’t for me, maybe I want to be more involved in a front office, I have more tools.”



Supported by
ByAndrew Keh
The archetype of the Olympian is evolving, as evidenced by the potential arrival of a new sort of athletic competitor at the Summer Games: B-boys and B-girls.
As part of an effort to appeal to younger fans, the organizing committee for the 2024 Games in Paris announced on Thursday that it would recommend break dancing — yes, the street dance form with moves like flares, headspins and windmills — as a new sport to be added to its program.
The proposal — which also includes a recommendation that skateboarding, surfing and climbing, which will be introduced next year at the Tokyo Games, remain on the program — will be formally presented to the International Olympic Committee executive board at the end of March. The I.O.C. is not expected to confirm the events program for the 2024 Games until December 2020.
Break dancing was enthusiastically received when it made itsdebut at the Youth Olympic Gameslast summer in Buenos Aires. The eventual medalists there hailed from Russia, France, Japan, South Korea, Canada, Italy, Austria, Vietnam and Argentina — a vivid sign perhaps of how extensively the activity has spread since its beginnings decades ago in New York City.
“Breaking has two elements,” Nakari Shigeyuki, a Japanese teenager known as Shigekix who won a bronze medal at the Youth event, told Olympic.org in October. “One is sports, and one is arts. We need the stamina of athletes, but we also need to be artists, and express our feelings.”
The sport’s potential moment in the global spotlight arrives as the I.O.C. continues its efforts to engage new fans — particularly young ones — in a sports landscape flowering with alternatives to the traditional Olympic program.
To that end, the I.O.C. created new rules recently to allow host cities to recommend new sports for the Olympics program. Organizers for the 2020 Games in Toyko proposed baseball/softball, karate, sport climbing, surfing and skateboarding, which the I.O.C. eventually approved. (Because host city recommendations are valid for one Olympic Games only, karate and baseball/softball will not return in Paris.)
Paris 2024 organizers said their aim was to include “sports that can be shared on social media, sports that are a means of getting around, forms of expression, lifestyles in their own right, sports that are practiced every day, in the street and elsewhere.”
The organizers said their values led them to “sustainable and socially responsible” sports that do not require permanent facilities; sports that will engage young people and those in urban communities; and sports that are culturally relevant to France.
Another initiative in that vein will be the opportunity for amateurs to run the Olympic marathon course after the official race has ended (which is, in essence, how most major marathons in the world operate, with a group of professional competitors preceding a larger, amateur field).
In their break dancing proposal, Paris 2024 organizers said there would be men’s and women’s events with a total of 32 athletes who would officially be referred to as B-boys and B-girls.
The competitions, meanwhile, would be referred to as “battles” and feature dancers taking turns performing dance moves and spins on the floor. Each routine would be graded, the organizers said, on criteria “such as technique, variety, performance, musicality, creativity and personality.”



Remembering Mel Stottlemyre, Don Newcombe, King Kong Bundy and many others who died this year.
Marilynn Smith, 89
An LPGA Founder and Champion
Harry Howell, 86
Rangers Defenseman
Julia Ruth Stevens, 102
Babe Ruth’s Daughter
Eusebio Pedroza,
Featherweight Boxer
King Kong Bundy, 63
Professional Wrestler
Ted Lindsay, 93
Detroit Red Wings Star
Don Newcombe, 92
Gene Littler, 88
Golfer With a Gorgeous Swing
Frank Robinson, 83
Baseball's First Black Manager
Bob Friend, 88
Fred Thompson, 85
Champion of Women in Track and Field
John Coughlin, 33
Skating Champion
Mel Stottlemyre, 77
Yankees' Ace
Produced by Daniel E. Slotnik, Amisha Padnani, William McDonald and Dan Wakin.
Supported by
ByTerence McGinley
Times Insiderexplains who we are and what we do, and delivers behind-the-scenes insights into how our journalism comes together.
Last year The New York Times introduced Past Tense, an initiative to revisit history through a present-day lens. Its projects begin in The Times’s photo archive, affectionately known as the morgue, where more than six million pictures are held.
The first project was “California: State of Change,” a portfolio of the state and the mentality it represented during the rapid growth of the 20th century. More recently, picture essays of Fidel Castro, fitness trends and the rise of the New York pizza slice were published.
Its latest endeavor: 100 pictures for what would have been the 100th birthday of Jackie Robinson, the first black player in Major League Baseball, who endured racial venom with stoicism and proved a genius on the basepaths in Brooklyn Dodger white. “For sociological impact,” The Times declared inRobinson’s 1972 obituary, he was “perhaps America’s most significant athlete.”
The project, “42 at 100,” reacquaints readers with the many dimensions of the Hall of Famer and civil rights icon. There is Robinson the officer in the United States Army, and Robinson the corporate executive who voted for Richard M. Nixon in 1960. We meet him in a family photo, as a boy in Pasadena, Calif. As a four-sport star at U.C.L.A. On a picket line in Cleveland. On his lawn in Stamford, Conn., hosting a jazz benefit for the N.A.A.C.P.
“We wanted to show the entirety of Jackie Robinson,” said Brian Gallagher, the deputy editor of Past Tense.
The digitization of The Times’s photo archive is continuing, and the Past Tense team searched the morgue by hand for pictures of Robinson. “This was a big opportunity,” said Veronica Chambers, editor of Past Tense. “Being that this happened in Brooklyn, we knew it was something we could find in the Times narrative.”
To fill out a comprehensive portrait of Robinson’s life off the baseball field, the team reached outside of its own collection, to the archives of U.C.L.A., Ebony Magazine and The Pittsburgh Courier, a leading black newspaper in the 20th century.
A digital slide show and the pictures selected for today’s 24-page broadsheet print section present an opportunity to run photos that appeared in The Times 70 years ago in a new context, at a much larger scale. There are words, too, including personal essays from the former Times sportswriters George Vecsey and Claire Smith (a pioneer in her own right:the first woman electedinto the writers’ wing of the Baseball Hall of Fame), and excerpts from the work of the Pulitzer Prize winner Dave Anderson, who died last year (and wrote Robinson’s obituary).
There is a scene at the end of the 2013 Robinson biopic, “42,” that takes place after the Dodgers clinched the National League pennant in 1947, the year Robinson broke the color barrier. He picks up a copy of The New York Times. A banner headline reads, “Hail to Those Brooklyn Bums.”
This is a historical inaccuracy: The Times washardly that effusivein writing of Robinson’s major league debut.
The news was covered, to be sure. After the Dodgers signed him to their minor league team, the Oct. 24, 1945,headline read: “Montreal Signs Negro Shortstop.” Afterhis first minor league gamein Jersey City, the headline on April 19, 1946, was: “Montreal Winner as Robinson Stars.” In 1947 The Times also reported that the St. Louis Cardinals playersconsidered strikingas long as Robinson was in the lineup against them, and that hereceived threatening lettersto “get out of baseball.”
But the restrained tone in those sports pages does not match the way Robinson was exalted in the black press, and the way America celebrates his legacy today.
“You can see history taking shape, and we really didn’t deal with it that day,” Jay Schreiber, a 27-year veteran of the sports desk, said of the day Robinson signed his contract. Mr. Schreiber, who retired in 2017 and edited today’s special print section, said journalism works differently today.
“Now, we would connect all the dots: Why are you signing him?” Mr. Schreiber said.
That’s part of the reason The Times started Past Tense: to tell “the stories of the past, with the wisdom of today,” Ms. Chambers said. “We are showing him in a way The Times might not have shown him in his lifetime. We now know more about what we did, and how we missed.”
When the clock strikes midnight, Jackie Robinson’s 100th birthday will end, and Black History Month will begin. Once again, he leads the way.
Follow the@ReaderCenteron Twitter for more coverage highlighting your perspectives and experiences and for insight into how we work.
Supported by
ByThe Associated Press
LOS ANGELES — Joc Pederson and Enrique Hernandez each hit two of the Los Angeles Dodgers’ eight home runs, which set a major league record for opening day and tied the franchise mark for any game, in a 12-5 victory over the Arizona Diamondbacks on Thursday.
Hernandez, Austin Barnes and Corey Seager all homered in the fourth inning to chase Arizona ace Zack Greinke.
Max Muncy, Cody Bellinger and Hernandez then connected in the seventh for the power-packed Dodgers, whose pursuit of a third straight National League pennant got off to a thrilling start.
It’s a moment when they show up, got ‘em saying WOW.#OpeningDayLApic.twitter.com/w7skqOKKId
Adam Jones and Christian Walker went deep for the Diamondbacks, but the eight homers their pitchers gave up set a team record for the most allowed in a game.
The Dodgers broke baseball’s previous opening day record of six homers, set by the Mets in 1988 and matched by the White Sox in 2008.
Los Angeles also equaled the franchise mark set against Milwaukee on May 23, 2002, when Shawn Green hit four of the Dodgers’ eight.
The Dodgers finished second in the majors last season, behind the Yankees, with 235 homers, and they were even more potent in their first regular-season game under the new hitting coach Robert Van Scoyoc. All eight hoers were hit by players who returned from last season for the Dodgers, who had only two new position players on their opening day roster.
It was more than enough support for Hyun-Jin Ryu, who yielded four hits and struck out eight over six stellar innings as Los Angeles’ first opening day starter not named Clayton Kershaw since 2010. Kershaw’s franchise-record streak of eight consecutive opening day starts ended because of left shoulder inflammation.
Ryu, who retired 13 straight during one stretch, became the second Korean-born pitcher to start on opening day in the majors.
Meanwhile, Greinke’s latest return to Dodger Stadium was a debacle.
The $206.5 million right-handerallowed four homers for the fifth time in his career, but only the second time this decade. The Dodgers also hit four against Greinke, their former star, on Sept. 5, 2016, in Chavez Ravine, where Greinke has allowed 14 homers in 34 innings since his big-money move to Arizona.
Arizona reliever Matt Koch allowed the Dodgers’ other four homers over a seven-batter stretch in the sixth and seventh, abruptly toppling the majors’ opening day power record.
Pederson delivered as the Dodgers’ leadoff hitter. After doubling and scoring in the first inning, he hit one of Greinke’s curveballs 420 feet to straightaway center in the second.
Hernandez drove a two-run shot to left in the fourth. Barnes followed with a solo shot to left — and two outs later, Seager chased Greinke with his first homer since April 28.
Seager was back in the Dodgers’ lineup for the first time since missing nearly all of last season because of Tommy John surgery.
After Pederson hit a two-run shot off Koch in the sixth, the Dodgers reached historic homer territory with shots by Muncy, Bellinger and Hernandez in a four-batter stretch of the seventh.



